_	The Kirkland City Council allowed TC4 to move to Kirkland Congregational in February under the condition that SHARE sign an agreement to not locate in Kirkland before August, 2006.
_	In November 1786, Joseph II made his support dependent on the condition that the archbishops gain the consent of their suffragan bishops, the superiors of the exempt monasteries, and the imperial estates into whose territories their spiritual jurisdiction extends.
_	To avoid unnecessary bloodshed, Mstislav and Rededya, who possessed an extraordinary physical force, decided to have a personal fight, with the condition that the winner would be considered the winner of the battle.
_	One week before Wang's death the Chinese government offered to allow Wang to return to China on the condition that he not publish articles critical of the Chinese government or meet with local dissidents, but he refused.
_	The king also promised to protect the humans living around the lake, on the condition that the tranquility of his water abode never be disrupted.
_	The sorcerer accepts on the condition that he be allowed to challenge any opponent of his choosing, anytime and anywhere he chooses.
_	Oscar, while hesitant, agrees to go along with it on the condition that he and Yoder complete their original mission to evacuate the other survivors.
_	Cooper agrees to convey the offer to the President on the condition that the Brotherhood arrests their founder, Magneto.
_	As a compromise however, they tell the boys they can make the trip on the condition that they get a job to pay for it.
_	They had a lease from the government of Hawaii on the condition that the ditch be built within two years.
_	He donated a parcel of 6,000 toises (yards) to his main noblemen, who built pavilions there, on the condition that they stuck to the layout, materials and main dimensions laid down by the architects Androuet du Cerceau and Claude Chastillon.
_	However, the WPM does cause rank reversals when it is compared with the weighted sum model (WSM) and under the condition that all the criteria of a given decision problem can be measured in exactly the same unit.
_	He was elected president to succeed Edgar Shannon in 1973 and took office a year later on the condition that he only serve for ten years; he extended his term by one year to oversee the completion of the University's first capital campaign, which began in 1981.
_	This section was amended in December 1844 to permit a free slave to be resold on the condition that the slave owner agree to remove them from the territory at the end of the contract, which was held with the provisional government.
_	His widow, Betty, willed the property to the state of California upon her death in 1944, under the condition that polo be played on the field every year; it is home to the Will Rogers Polo Club.
_	In 1311 (1893/1894) or 1312 (1894/1895) he was appointed Mufti of the Hanafis by Sharif Awn ar-Rafiq, on the condition that for assistance he consult with his father Shaykh Abbas and with Shaykh Ahmad Abu al-Khayr Mirdad, who had declined the Sharif's offer to take the post.
_	She offers to give the drug to the Narn, but only on the condition that Na'Toth is executed and her remains presented to her.
_	In the case where "R" is the ring Z of the integers, this is equivalent to the condition that no prime number divides all the coefficients of "P".
_	He ends up getting arrested, but Nina arrives to bail him out on the condition that he stop ruining the wedding.
_	Perhaps the closest Los Angeles came to regaining the NFL during this period was in 1999, when the NFL approved a new franchise, the league's 32nd, for Los Angeles, on the condition that the city and NFL agree on a stadium site and stadium financing.
_	The Government of Bengal accepted the demand with the condition that a public contribution of Rs.30,000/- be deposited for the proposed College.
_	All permission was granted on the condition that Sir Robert be responsible for maintenance!
_	Instead in the Qur’an Allah orders the believers to follow the apostle and the Ulul-Amr, and joins that obedience to obedience to Him, with the condition that no difference of opinion exists between Ulul-Amr and the Messenger, in any matter: ""O you who have believed, obey Allah and obey the Messenger and those in authority among you.
_	The following month, AMPAS and the MPAA reached an agreement in which Academy members would receive the screeners on the condition that they keep them out of reach from people unaffiliated with AMPAS.
_	Scott agrees, only on the condition that this time, he drives.
_	The Council agreed to provide a plot on the condition that Lafayette himself would be buried there upon his own death.
_	Catherine II of Russia accepted the petition under the condition that the peasants resettle in the newly conquered territories from the Ottoman Empire that were named New Russia (today in the Southern Ukraine).
_	Holkar tried to persuade Jawahar Singh to make peace on the condition that Najibuddaulah would pay the whole expenditure for the war.
_	In 2006, the Mississippi Legislature's State Bill 2803 officially returned control of the site to the Luke Family, and T. W. Luke deeded it to the State on the condition that it be maintained as a park.
_	However, as he had been a close friend of Horatio Nelson and had supplied his fleet, he was eventually granted a site to build a house in the "Alameda" on the condition that it be ""an ornament"" to the square.
_	The court passed an order saying that the movie had prima facie similarities to Sathish' script, but allowed the making of the Tamil version "Papanasam" to proceed, on the condition that the makers of "Drishyam" produce a 10 lakh bank guarantee before the court to ensure the compensation.
_	At the end of his term as proconsul, having now met the condition that there be a minimum of ten years between elections as consul, Caesar intended to stand for the consulship "in absentia", and upon being elected go straight from his proconsular command into the second consulship.
_	The murder of Brother Donnchad at the abbey of Lios Mor led Colgu and Abbot Segdae to send Fidelma to investigate but on the condition that Eadulf accompany and assist her (see "The Chalice of Blood").
_	He removed there with his whole school, and his salary was greatly increased on the condition that he took no fresh pupils.
_	The definition of PES provided by environmental economics is the most popular: a voluntary transaction between a service buyer and service seller that takes place on the condition that either a specific ecosystem service is provided or land is used in a way to secure that service.
_	He requested and was granted a short truce, but only on the condition that he surrender if not relieved by 11 July.
_	It must satisfy the condition that formula_59
_	The band only released their music on CD, under the condition that it continued to be available online for free.
_	Paddon stated that in declining to race it was on the condition that Goodsell would get the right of first challenge.
_	She has remained open to a role on the condition that she likes the story.
_	In 2004, in an episode of "The Mighty Boosh", "Nanageddon" (Series 2, episode 11), the character Vince Noir offers Howard Moon the opportunity to spend the evening with two goth girls, on the condition that he dresses like a goth.
_	When Theresa returned from Bermuda having drunkenly wed Julian, Ethan forgave her and restored their relationship under the condition that there be no more lies; but Theresa kept one more huge secret from him—she was pregnant!
_	Plath's grandfather in Wisconsin, John, agreed to finance Plath's pursuit of higher education on the condition that he became a Lutheran minister.
_	Now trapped, they agree to give themselves up on the condition that they are granted an interview with a "Rolling Stone" reporter to tell their story.
_	Reznor threatened to take the album to another label if necessary, at which time Interscope agreed to release it, on the condition that the band remove some photos from the album sleeve.
_	After his mother collapsed from a weak heart, Batman talked Bork into surrendering himself to the authorities on the condition that they help her to get well.
_	A small parcel of land near Council Rock was presented to the Village of Cooperstown in 1957, on the condition that it remain open to the public as a park.
_	The Specials on the condition that she bleached her hair blond, but she declined.
_	Asserting that it would have to sell or shut down the station without one, Bell organized a petition proposing an exception to the ownership cap (similar to one that the CRTC granted Cogeco in its purchase of Corus Québec) that would allow it to maintain ownership of CKGM, under the condition that Bell maintain the TSN Radio format on the station and provide $245,000 in funding for local amateur sports and scholarships in sports journalism over a seven-year period.
_	Violante was freed around 1358/59, and soon had Isabella released, on the condition that Isabella renounced her rights to Majorca.
_	Beginning in the 1920s, however, Emperor Haile Selassie allowed non-Orthodox missionaries into Ethiopia, on the condition that they would not translate their works into Amharic and would focus only on the non-Amharic-speaking population.
_	His vision of Paulinus was afterwards made the means of his decision to embrace Christianity, on the condition that he survived and achieved power.
_	Domingo is eventually freed and offers to have Doggett bailed out as well, under the condition that Doggett help him perform his criminal tasks.
_	On the condition that Marcia's father consented to the match, Cato agreed to divorce Marcia, who then married Hortensius.
_	He had two black servants—one free and one a slave (in his will, Carroll bequeathed his slave, Charles, to his nephew, Daniel Brent, on the condition that Brent emancipate Charles within a year.
_	She allowed the release under the condition that the label would have to include a letter written by Aguilera in each album released.
_	She promises Lajo will bear children if Lajo will agree to come to Kali Pahari where Neola will grant her wish, on the condition that if she bears a son she can keep him but if she gives birth to a daughter the child will be Neola's property and should be handed over to him.
_	It was instituted on the condition that a foundation a medal is awarded in alternate years for the best dissertation involving original historical research, together with a sum of money to defray the expenses of publication.
_	This action granted the Utah Territory statehood in 1896 on the condition that polygamy was banned in the state constitution.
_	While on leave he offered to resign on 25 May 2015 on "just terms" and on the condition that the State Government agreed to a reform agenda for the courts, such as implementing a judicial commission.
_	He rigs the lottery so that she wins $100,000,000, on the condition that she leaves the United States and never returns.
_	Following the sale of the company, Ross was asked to return to the Motown label with the condition that she have shares in the company as a part-owner.
_	He afterwards declined an offer to resell it to an American for thrice the price he paid, and sold it one week later to the French government for the same 6000 francs, on the condition that it was to be placed in the Louvre.
_	After being released from prison on the condition that he be repatriated, he and his wife settled in Tijuana, Mexico where he actively advocated for the land rights of veterans of the Mexican Revolution and started another radio broadcast show.
_	He promised to expel the rebels from Delhi, on the condition that Dholpur be restored to Vinayaka-deva.
_	She was sold under the condition that she wouldn't be used for transportation.
_	In 1948, President Harry S. Truman granted executive clemency to Dasch and Burger on the condition that they be deported to the American Zone of occupied Germany.
_	Brian demands Helen come inside, but she agrees only on the condition that Amanda and Tara are let outside.
_	Knigge accepted, on the condition that he be allowed to choose his own recruiting grounds.
_	The United States, a big source of monetary aid for Haiti, said that Duvalier should be less brutal than his father had been, and granted a large annual aid package under the condition that Haiti improve its human rights situation.
_	With this agreement, the EU was given the possibility to use NATO assets in case it wanted to act independently in an international crisis, on the condition that NATO itself did not want to act – the so-called "right of first refusal".
_	On 14 June 2013, Peter Jackson and Don McLardy made a plea to the AFL to receive emergency funding in order to reshape the entire board and football department on the condition that they provided a detailed plan that would be strictly carried through.
_	The construction permit was granted only under the condition that once operational, the number of people living in the approach path would be lower compared to the situation surrounding the three existing airports — Tegel, Schönefeld and Tempelhof.
_	One can employ the idea of the delta function to impose the condition that the Hamiltonian constraint should vanish.
_	Seats are allocated to constituencies, each entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province does not exceed two times that of any other.
_	When Cathy protests, the creature stands and acknowledges both her and the judge by name, leading the judge to overturn his ruling and award temporary custody to the university under the supervision of Dr. Webster, with the condition that should the creature exhibit any violent behavior, he will be institutionalized.
_	Horwitz told Rabbi Shlomo he would marry Chaya Rivka, but only on the condition that he be allowed to isolate himself all week, returning to his family only for Shabbat and Yom Tov.
_	M.Mus. graduates who wish to pursue graduate studies in an area that is not directly connected with music may be conditionally admitted to PhD programs in areas such as women's studies or sociology, subject to the condition that they complete a list of qualifying courses.
_	Local magnates were able to gain ownership of this land on the condition that they would make it arable.
_	Horonuku, having discussed the subject with other chiefs of his tribe, put a proposition to the government – that the land be bequeathed to the nation as a national park, on the condition that the government should remove from the mountains the remains of their famous predecessors, including Mananui, and erect a suitable tomb.
_	The Arab rulers allowed the natives freedom of religion on the condition that they paid a tax.
_	He paid 12,000 thalers for his release on the condition that Heller resign the post of chief rabbi of Prague and leave the country.
_	After hearing Yuki's request to kill Honey, she willingly accepts, but on the condition that Yuki takes care of Miki in her stead.
_	However, Lin Xiangru quickly persuaded the furious king that there could be a real swap on the condition that his life be spared.
_	Thorgeir accepted responsibility for deciding whether Iceland should become Christian, with the condition that both parties abide by his decision.
_	Lightning agrees to commit this task, on the condition that Bhunivelze ensure the rebirth of Serah's spirit.
_	The election was required to take place no later than the sixtieth day from the date of expiry of parliament on the condition that it was not held between 1 July and 31 August, setting the latest possible election date for the Parliament on Thursday, 30 June 1994.
_	William Shatner sold the rights to Marvel for a comic book series under the condition that it be set only 50 years in the future.
_	Stratonice was induced to betray both the fortress and the fortress’ treasures into the hands of the Roman General Pompey, on the condition that Pompey should spare the life of her son.
_	The building was the expatriate home of a rich Irishman who left it to the Départment of the Essonne in 1863 on the condition that it be turned into an "asylum for the mad".
_	A very petulant Dejiko stands her ground, and the tutor finally relents and lets Dejiko and Puchiko go outside the castle grounds, on the condition that they take Gema with them as a chaperon.
_	Bob offers him a million dollar three-fight contract on the condition that he leave Marty.
_	Worse, her show will be reformatted and improved only on the condition that she makes a follow up piece on the story.
_	Flamininus of the allied forces arrived with 4,000 more men and the Spartans decided to surrender the city on the condition that the garrison could leave unharmed.
_	Yassin was released by Israel in exchange for two Mossad agents who had been arrested by Jordanian authorities, on the condition that he refrained from continuing to call for suicide bombings against Israel.
_	During this time the prince repeatedly offered to free the king on the condition that Andriamasinavalona accept to transfer power to him, which the king repeatedly refused.
_	Terrified by the intense firepower of the grenadiers, the troops of the Castle of Mers el-Kebir capitulated, on the condition that they would be allowed to retreat to Algiers.
_	She accepted the position, but only on the condition that it was part-time, allowing her to continue operating her allergy clinic.
_	Following his win, Okada accepted Devitt's challenge on the condition that he first defend his IWGP Junior Heavyweight Championship against Okada's manager Gedo.
_	She donated the Adile Sultan Palace to the state on the condition that it be converted into the first secondary high school for girls in the Ottoman Empire.
_	The deal with Alfa included the condition that he would not use the Ferrari name on cars for four years.
_	As a result, he has suggested that these flutes should be described as improved flageolets, and has proposed the condition that true recorders produce a tone (rather than a semitone) when the seventh finger is lifted.
_	Audi approved Gumpert's involvement in this project, on the condition that, if they did eventually develop a new supercar, it would not be a prototype, but a series product.
_	Though sceptical, the students ask if they can join Hans and film his hunt, to which he consents on the condition that they do as he instructs.
_	The office was held upon the condition that they bore the ancient arms that they had inherited from "Marbhachair Chamuis".
_	The creature, having become lost during his journey between dimensions, addresses them, assuring them they'll be freed on the condition that they help him to achieve his goal - reuniting him with his eight other companions, all of whom were inhabitants of their universe, each carrying an essential element which, when joined together, would result in the annihilation of our universe.
_	However, the condition that causes this repetition has not been fully analyzed.
_	At dinner, Nagma gives her consent to Sardar to sleep with other women but with the condition that he won't bring them home or dishonour the family name.
_	If we introduce an intensional conditional operator then we can say that the starving ought to be fed "only on the condition that there are in fact starving": in symbols O(A/B).
_	She accepted the position out of personal friendship with Louise and the condition that she would be allowed to delegate her tasks to one of the ladies-in-waiting when her private life demanded to, and she normally left the daily affairs to others.
_	With the dissolution of the monasteries by King Henry VIII, the Royal Charter of 1539 ensured revenues were granted to the bailiffs and commonality of Colchester on the condition that they founded a school; this was then enacted by the Charter of Queen Elizabeth in 1585, on condition that at least £13 6s 8d be set aside annually for the schoolmaster.
_	Elena agrees on the condition that they go to a particular beach resort, knowing Nino will be there.
_	Seats are allocated to constituencies, each entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province does not exceed two times that of any other.
_	These were to replace camel transport, on the condition that drivers would be found locally, as no transfers from other campaigns were possible.
_	However, text adventures, with or without graphics, eventually proved to be commercially unsuccessful in the Spanish market, and Aventuras Dinamic was bought by "Andrés Samudio", so he could create "Aventuras AD", on the condition that he would produce the games, but Dinamic had to distribute them, and so it was.
_	In August 2017, it was reported that Khan had agreed to be a part of Race 3 on the condition that choreographer turned director Remo D'Souza would be the one to direct the film.
_	He accepted the call to ascend the throne of his fathers upon the condition that he complete his service with G.B. Ollivant as he was due for retirement by 1982.
_	Warner agreed to the scene on the condition that it be shot in three hours, so "that the extras were through by lunchtime."
_	Hay suggested that the US$30 million plus Boxer Rebellion indemnity money paid to the United States was excessive, in 1909, President Roosevelt then obtained congress approval to reduce the Qing Dynasty indemnity payment by $10.8 million USD, on the condition that the said fund was to be used as scholarship for Chinese students to study in the United States.
_	In January 1970, when Carl Wayne left the Move, Lynne accepted Wood's second invitation to join the band on the condition that they focus their energy on the new project.
_	Upon learning that Greg's real first name is Gaylord, being presented with proof from Pam that he did in fact pass the test, and seeing how his own actions have upset his own family, Jack rushes to the airport, convinces airport security to release Greg (on the condition that he must promise to always tell the truth) and brings him back to the Byrnes household.
_	The Charter Schools admitted only Catholics, under the condition that they be educated as Protestants.
_	He agreed to serve as the director upon the condition that UNICEF serve the children of "ex-enemy countries," regardless of race or politics.
_	Aleksandar Malinov who assumed office immediately afterwards pursued secret negotiations with Britain, offering Bulgaria's exit from the war with the condition that Bulgaria fully retain eastern Macedonia.
_	In August 1860, Lewis transferred the recommended land to John Pipher with the condition that he should give a warranty deed for the land to the city.
_	Gen. Benjamin Huger to assist, under the condition that they would have to be returned if they were not engaged by 2 p.m.
_	The Vasavi Shakti had been granted to Karna by the god Indra, but under the condition that Karna could only use it once.
_	In 1919, he donated his collection to the Greek State, on the condition that a Sino-Japanese art museum be opened in Corfu.
_	Therefore, he decided to disinherit her and to bequeath all of his fortune to the State, under the condition that it be used to establish a modern high school that would offer an excellent education and in which no women would be allowed.
_	Lasker took the job on the condition that he would serve no more than two years.
_	During the Cold War, Mondpaca Esperantista Movado (MEM) was able to conduct official activities on behalf of Esperanto in East Bloc countries on the condition that it must support their Communist governments and the Soviet viewpoint.
_	Article 7: In the case of a permanent visa or residence permit, foreigners remain bound to the condition that allowed its grant for a period of two years, and the condition contained in your passport and Alien ID card (CIE).
_	She agreed on the condition that she was given a more complicated job.
_	The horse theft case had been held over for re-trial by order of the pre-constitutional court, and the alleged cow thief was cleared on the condition that he pay court costs.
_	In other words, there exists some element L of X satisfying the condition that whenever L ⊆ L for some element L of X, then L = L.
_	She was also able to get teachers to agree to teach in the college with the condition that for the first year they would only receive Rupees 20 to Rupees 25 per month.
_	[2] By 1879, the Library Association was facing financial difficulties and offered to transfer ownership to the City of Sacramento on the condition that it be made free.
_	The tender for the construction was awarded to John Dobbie of Balmain for £6,475 on the condition that the new office be erected in twelve months.
_	Park was chosen by FIFA to host three matches for the 1966 World Cup on the condition that the Witton Lane Stand became all-seater.
_	K-Man agreed under the condition that the General would help him locate his wife.
_	This was arranged under favorable terms, with the land donated and the buildings sold at cost, on the condition that Wood and Gregory continue operating the school for at least 10 years.
_	In the municipality of Nea Alikarnassos, efforts to relocate a Romani settlement to make way for Olympic developments were halted by the Magistrate's Court of Heraklion, which ruled twice, in 2000 and 2001 respectively, that the relocation plans were "abusive", and that relocations could only take place under the condition that the new settlement location be provided with adequate housing and infrastructure to ensure a decent standard of living for its inhabitants.
_	The Mishnah taught that even if a landowner said, “I am harvesting on the condition that whatever I forget I will take,” the landowner was still subject to the law of the forgotten sheaf in (and anything the landowner forgot belonged to the poor).
_	To Whittemore's surprise, Camp agreed to coach the team himself, on the condition that he finish the season at Yale first.
_	Mathieu catches Morhange singing to himself, discovers he has a wonderful singing voice, and awards him solo parts on the condition that he behaves.
_	Börringe Priory was secularized the same year and became an estate which the king gave to the Brahe family with the condition that the former nuns were to be cared for, essentially a home for honourable and noble women.
_	He is indeed released, under the condition that he does not have any contact with Deanna or the hockey team members.
_	The nobles informed Rabodo that she would have their support as queen on the condition that she would accept to abide by certain articles that would form a new contract between rulers and ruled in Madagascar:
_	On September 3, 1902, the contract between the city administration and the horsecar company expired and the entire horsecar street rail system, including track, carriages, horses, maintenance buildings and other equipment, became property of the city of Saint Petersburg - on the condition that the city would pay for the takeover over the period of 12 years.
_	Chu Ming-ming is promoted by her boss, Carol, to be her personal assistant on the condition that Chu is single, thus, can be called upon at any time.
_	Each constituency is entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province does not exceed two times that of any other.
_	These titles and their accompanying tenure include the condition that he cannot have any salary, influence, or opinions.
_	Vinnie gives Tiffany Wellard on the condition that Whitney and Liam wash his car every day until he says otherwise.
_	KC, who feeds him rotten Tomatoes then frees him on the condition that he owed him.
_	An example would be the Federal Government offering grant money to fix highways on the condition that states enforce the drinking age.
_	Meanwhile, the Grand Duke of Baden had joined with Bavaria in requesting the armed intervention of Prussia, which Berlin granted on the condition that Baden would join the League of the Three Kings.
_	Belolo gave the rights for free on the condition that the Navy help them shoot the music video.
_	An example of a humanitarian licensing mile stone is i.e. the condition that on or before the date of the first phase of a clinical trial for a new drug, the licensee will have identified a generic manufacturer in a middle-income country to produce the licensed technology at a reasonable price for developing countries.
_	Jia Kui could not hold up against the attack, so the people in Hedong Commandery offered to surrender to Guo Yuan on the condition that he would not harm Jia Kui.
_	It purports to explain the origin of the Proto-Germanic long consonants "*kk", "*tt", and "*pp" (Proto-Indo-European lacked a phonemic length distinction for consonants) as originating in the assimilation of "*n" to a preceding voiced plosive consonant, under the condition that the "*n" was part of a suffix which was stressed in the ancestral Proto-Indo-European (PIE).
_	Green pledged a $70 million gift in November 2007 to Oral Roberts University (ORU), enough to retire much of the university's debt, on the condition that the university show good governance.
_	Trip negotiates with the overprotective Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon to take Lux to the homecoming dance, on the condition that he finds dates for the other three sisters.
_	In East Stirlingshire's case, a league vote was held and concluded in favour of the club retaining full member status with the condition that it did not finish last the following season in 2008.
_	This placed him in controversial circumstances, and he was fortunate that the French Consul intervened on his behalf at the King’s Ministerial Council; and, according to Lafontaine, due to the Consul’s representations, King Ferdinand II (1810-1859) eventually made a royal decree: "I consent to M. Lafontaine remaining in Naples, on the condition that will he not restore sight to the blind, or hearing to the deaf".
_	The government allocated $350,000 to construct two 150 × 4,000-ft. hard-surfaced runways, taxiways, a fence, and airfield lighting on the condition that the City and County procured a total of 604 acres.
_	On July 30, Peter IV "el Cerimoniós" gave the place to Raimon de Riusech taking it from Joan Eximenis d'Urrea, with the condition that if he had no male descendents it would be given back to the crown, but in the end it was sold to Xàtiva, with the king's approval on February 19 of 1353 as a barony.
_	Wise kept pressing, and eventually Panavision turned over the 30mm lens on the condition that Wise signed a memorandum in which he acknowledged it was imperfect.
_	Soon after Qazi Irfan Siddiqui decides to make Kabir Nayyab Qazi (Vice President to Qazi) on the condition that Rukhsaar must be married off given her constant interference in Kabir and Zara's life.
_	At the meeting, he assures Tattaglia there will be no retribution for the death of Sonny, on the condition that Michael be allowed to return to America.
_	Those left-libertarians who support private property do so under the condition that recompense is offered to the local community.
_	Such appeals are subject to the condition that all avenues of domestic remedies within Liechtenstein have been exhausted.
_	Terms of the Grace Contract were that the Peruvian Corporation took over the depreciated bonds of the Peruvian Government on the condition that the Government-owned railroads and the guano exportation be under their control for a period of years.
_	When Falkberget wrote a sequel called "Den nye Bør Børson jr." for the magazine "Arbeidermagasinet" in 1927, he set the condition that the story should not be issued in book form.
_	In the Netherlands, Philip II had bequeathed his remaining territories in the Low Countries to his daughter Isabella of Spain and her husband, Archduke Albert, under the condition that if she died without heirs, the province would return to the Spanish Crown.
_	At first Rodger Bird declined to assist with the writing a book about his high school career, but six months later he agreed on the condition that the book also discusses the Selvys and other famous athletes from CHS.
_	For the 2004 Olympics, the IOC allowed women's sabre to be contested at the Olympics but only under the condition that the number of fencing events being contested (individual and team) remain at ten.
_	This agreement was bound by the condition that these delegates would have to stay in the camps until the end of the war.
_	This was agreed, on the condition that Wentworth abandon his claim against the British government.
_	In 1957, Pola was offered a position on the voice faculty at the Tokyo University of the Arts, and the post of Artistic Director of the Fujiwara Opera, with the condition that he master the Japanese language.
_	The Board of Trustees allowed female students largely due to Julia S. Tutwiler, with the condition that they be over eighteen, and would be allowed to enter the sophomore class after completing their freshman year at another school and passing an exam.
_	He tried to stop the proceedings of parliament for an unknown reason on 25 October 1669, but the following day he retracted his objection on the condition that the Połock Voivodeship be exempt from taxes for a period of six years.
_	If the defendant is repairing a complex product that has at least two replaceable component parts, permitting disassembly and re-assembly, then they may claim a defence under s72 of the Act, on the condition that the repair is for the purpose of restoring the complex products’ overall appearance.
_	The government of the Northwest Territories agreed to provide services in French under the condition that the federal government absorb the cost and fund the development of Native communities.
_	Zorrilla officially received the lands in 1895, with the condition that he would have to cede, free of charge, the sections where the tracks of the Ferrocarril del Sur would be built.
_	According to the same source, when Edmund ' Cumbria to Máel Coluim mac Domnaill, he had done so on the condition that the latter would be his ' ("co-worker", "even-worker", "fellow-worker", "together-wright").
_	Afzal Khan agreed, on the condition that the meeting would be arranged with two personal bodyguards on each side.
_	Colsman, who became the airline's first general director, managed to secure the cooperation of Albert Ballin, the head of the Hamburg America Line who offered 100,000 Marks a year to promote the enterprise on the condition that his offices had exclusive rights to sell tickets, and Colsman had little difficulty in raising the necessary three million marks capital.
_	Sam and Quinn go on their free dinner on the condition that it soooo isn't a date.
_	After viewing the video, the children were given misinformation about the event either verbally or written based on the condition that they were placed in.
_	Ocelot agrees to join his new employer's project under the condition that Snake/Big Boss participates as well.
_	Their political role and the making of heir to confirm the support of Orléans by Guelders were implied conditions of their marriage; also was a big part of her dowry, about 30,000 Ecus, been paid by the Duke of Orleans with the condition that they would have to be repaid in the absence of male heirs.
_	For example, if an influencer has 200,000 followers on Instagram and a company gives them a product on the condition that he exposes it to his audience, this company would be making an investment of the cost of a product in exchange for reaching at least the large most followers of the public figure.
_	Proteus syndrome is the condition that Joseph Merrick, whom Hurt played (renamed as John Merrick) in "The Elephant Man", is thought to have suffered from, although Merrick's exact condition is still not known with certainty.
_	The fourth time, after Ralambo had instructed his servant to carry her to him by force, the princess agreed to marry on the condition that it be done properly with the consent of her parents, a condition to which the king agreed.
_	The Texian Army commander, Stephen F. Austin, later released all of the men, on the condition that they leave Texas and vow to stop fighting Texas residents.
_	Partly funded by the Australian Government on the condition that a portion of the power would be used for export industry.
_	The king married the daughter, on the condition that she never meddled in his affairs; if she did, she would have to return home, although he would give her one thing, whatever she valued most in the castle.
_	He graduated with a degree in History in 1912 and was offered a teaching position at Eton College on the condition that he first spend a year in Germany.
_	The couple offered to take a pay cut to finance filming, on the condition that Desilu would retain the rights of each episode once it aired.
_	In 1912, Alexander was reported to have gained the reluctant consent of Emperor Nicholas to marry the wealthy Marianne Friedländer-Fuld, but only on the condition that the union would be considered unequal, with none of his titles being passed onto his wife or possible children.
_	Harper accepted the proposal, with the condition that the paper would be financially autonomous from the University.
_	The Lieberman clause, developed by Rabbi Saul Lieberman, does not deal with secular law, but instead inserts, at the time of marriage, a "halakhic" stipulation that the marriage is only valid on the condition that the man gives a "get" within 6 months of any secular court's divorce.
_	The song received positive reactions from teenage listeners, and a scout from Highland Records offered the group a recording contract, under the condition that the company take possession of the master recording, and that David Ponce be named as the author of the song, as he was the eldest member of the group.
_	The system of patroonships enabled Amsterdam investors to obtain large tracts of land on the condition that fifty families settled within those lands within four years.
_	To earn money, he tutored French Creoles in English; he taught the language to Natalie Bauché de St. Martin on the condition that she teach him French.
_	Gustav III paid her debts with the condition that she established her own separate court at Fredrikshof Palace.
_	Devi agreed on the condition that she would stay permanently at a place of her choice.
_	Peter Foley (Rex Lease) is a beneficiary of his grandfather, who leaves him $800,000 in his will, on the condition that he gets married.
_	In 1331 Edward III granted her petition "to ease the king's conscience" and allowed her to recover the lands on the condition that she should pay a fine of 10,000 pounds, later reduced to 5,000 pounds, in instalments.
_	At swordpoint, he decides to spare her life under the condition that she will lie with him and bear him a son.
_	Cusick accepted the position with the condition that he would resign if he was not given the job permanently by March 31.
_	In "On the Harmony of Woman" Perictione I outlines the condition that enable women to nurture wisdom and self-control.
_	Perhaps for these reasons, Scott died in 1910 with no heirs or colleagues and he bequeathed his estate to the City of Detroit with the condition that the fountain include a life-sized bronze statue of him.
_	The conspirators decided to transfer the crown to Radama's apparent widow Rabodo, on the condition that power would be henceforth shared jointly between the monarchy and the nobles, symbolically represented in Rainivoninahitriniony's marriage in September 1863 to Rabodo, who took the throne name Queen Rasoherina.
_	After "The Silmarillion" was published in 1977, Christopher Tolkien consented to a Swedish translation only on the condition that Ohlmarks have nothing to do with it.
_	Ismail was also offered a seat on the Federal Legislative Council by Onn, but on the condition that Ismail join UMNO.
_	From the Frobenius theorem, one recognizes the condition as the opposite of the condition that the distribution be determined by a codimension one foliation on the manifold ('complete integrability').
_	The Council's members were willing to agree, but only under the condition that Germany let its concessions be made public.
_	On 28 May the Democratic Left (DIMAR) however repeated their previous stance, that it would only work with SYRIZA to form a "left government", on the condition that there were guarantees of staying within the eurozone, and this would according to DIMAR require SYRIZA to drop their idea of a unilateral cancellation of the "memorandum" (a nickname for: "The bailout deal that the previous Greek government agreed to implement with EU, ECB and IMF").
_	the twelve remaining teams were drawn in next three rows under the condition that there were not too much country in the same confederation were drawn in the same pool.
_	Later, in October 1914, Congress passed the Clayton Act, making it an antitrust violation to sell goods on the condition that the buyer not deal in the goods of another seller.
_	The KYES acquisition was completed on June 27, 2016; it had been approved on June 17 under the condition that KYES not affiliate with a network that would make that station one of the top-four stations in the Anchorage market.
_	Rachel schemed to get Steve away from Alice by making the condition that Steve could only see Jamie in her presence.
_	However, in December 2014, the party agreed to support the process on the condition that the PKK unconditionally disarms.
_	The set Hom("Y", "X") of morphisms of algebraic spaces is then defined by the condition that it makes the descent sequence
_	The patentee's exclusive licensee sold dry ice to its customers with an implied license to use the container invention without the payment of royalty, but subject to the condition that the customers use the dry ice only with containers from a designated source and that they use the containers only with dry ice bought from the licensee.
_	Nucky comes to work and is surprised to see Jimmy, who agrees to Nucky's offer on the condition that Nucky also employ Richard and keep their work a secret.
_	However, the appellate court did allow the case to be retried in district court on the condition that no claims regarding advertisement and promotion could be made.
_	They both find Anu in a miserable state with Uncle Peter and bribe the uncle for a sum of 15,000 rupees on the condition that he signs the documents and is no longer Anu's legal guardian.
_	Initially clubs arranged all their own fixtures with the condition that they had to play teams they do play both home and away.
_	Phil Gould offered Taumata a lifeline in the off-season and signed Taumata for another year, stating that it was his final chance to stake a claim for a first-grade jumper, with the condition that he undergo intensive counselling and labouring work.
_	He arranged a recording session for the following day, on the condition that Cale would be allowed to add accompaniment to the tracks.
_	It may have been the condition that afflicted the young Arthur, Prince of Wales (the elder brother of Henry VIII of England) and his wife, Catherine of Aragon, in March 1502; their illness was described as "a malign vapour which proceeded from the air".
_	At her departure from Sweden in July 1594, she was granted Linköping, Söderköping and Stegeborg on the condition that she respect the Protestant belief within these feifs.
_	After the wedding, she decided to approach Katherine with the idea of turning her recently published autobiography into a film; Katherine complied under the condition that her collaborator, Amber Moore, co-write the movie with her.
_	In 1957, Bill Braum purchased his family's ice cream processing business based in Emporia, Kansas, as well as its "Peter Pan" retail ice cream chain; ten years later, the Peter Pan stores were sold, under the condition that the Braum family not sell ice cream in Kansas for ten years.
_	(4) Urvashi's dilemma: Kalidasa adds complexity confronting the character of Urvashi by introducing the condition that when Pururava sees the face of their son, Urvashi will return to the heaven.
_	In 1615 Amar Singh I, the son of Pratap Singh accepted Mughal suzerainty and one year later Jahangir, as a goodwill gesture, returned him Chittor Fort under the condition that it will never be repaired, as the Mughals feared that it might be used a bastion for future rebellions.
_	Another way is to add the condition that the support of "f" is contained in a countable union of products of sets of finite measure.
_	Lawful enslavement was restricted to two instances: capture in war (on the condition that the prisoner is not a Muslim), or birth in slavery.
_	On June 22, 2006, the Knicks fired coach Larry Brown, and owner James Dolan replaced him with Thomas on the condition that he show "evident progress" or be fired.
_	Billionaire tycoon Ross Perot made a donation of US$10 million, on the condition that it be named in honor of Morton H. Meyerson, the longtime patron of the arts in Dallas.
_	George was willed $6 million on the condition that, "after the space of five years continuously he shall abstain from the use of spirituous, vinous, and malt liquors to the extent that he shall not during this period have been intoxicated."
_	Impressed by Fr. Francis’s wish to work for the encounter between Christianity and Hinduism and by his determination to start a Christian monastic foundation rooted in the ashram tradition of India, Pandit Nehru, who was then the prime minister of India, approved the application on the condition that he not proselytize.
_	It was then turned into a storehouse for a rent of $1 per year, on the condition that the new lessee would fund a new roof for the building.
_	Phryne purchases some of Amelia's sketches, commissions a painting from her, and locates Mr. William McNaughton's will, which allows an inheritance to his wife and daughter on the condition that they do not marry.
_	Count of Toulouse, father of Raymond of Saint Gilles, bequeathed all his possessions to his eldest son William, on the condition that if William were to die without a son, the properties would then pass to Raymond.
_	Though agreeing on the condition that he brings his "family", Eiji manages to trick Belle into saving everyone.
_	He left it all to his friend, Mr F. G. Heathcote on the condition that he took the name of Sinclair (which he did) and that he lived in the Castle for at least 3 months of each year (which he also did).
_	Wayne quit the band, just before "Shazam" was released, and was replaced by Jeff Lynne who, having previously rejected Wood's first invitation to join The Move because he wanted to stay with The Idle Race, agreed to join on the condition that they retire The Move and focus full-time on ELO.
_	Turning first to Martel, who quickly rebuffed him, Dr. Bishop was able to persuade James C.M. Hanson to go on the condition that Martel would also be persuaded to attend.
_	He meets with Caesar, who allows them to work on the generator on the condition that they surrender their guns.
_	Bruce offered to transfer the station and instruments for the sum of 5.000 pesos, on the condition that the government committed itself to the continuation of the scientific mission.
_	Reluctantly, Jim agrees on the condition that Teilani be beamed up immediately.
_	As a reward, he was given some territories under the condition that he had to repopulate them with Christian settlers.
_	The Board granted his request on an experimental basis and on the condition that the program would be self-supporting.
_	In 878, Wilfred separated the "pagus" of Besalú from the County of Girona and granted it to him as a county on the condition that it would continue in the descendants of Wilfred.
_	Mr. McMahon made the match official under the condition that if Reigns failed to win the title, he would be fired.
_	Mikey agrees to become his trainer on the condition that Scallion does everything he says.
_	Devonshire accepted on the condition that his tenure would last only until the end of the parliamentary session.
_	Additional pressure came from the Kress Foundation, who offered to donate three collections valued at over $2 million on the condition that DAM construct a new building to house the works.
_	Their request was approved on the condition that any extension of the SADF's operational capacities in Angola remain strictly covert.
_	It secured additional funding from the city of Leuven on the condition that the festival would focus on local talent.
_	With an annual call, these awards are directed to all persons who have obtained a PhD at a European university in any area related to the fields of activity of the company under the condition that the degree must have been completed within the same year of the call.
_	As filming of the first season was nearing completion, Discovery greenlighted production on another Rowe project, "Dirty Jobs", under the condition that Rowe choose only one show on which to appear on camera.
_	Siriya is not pleased with this turn in Sira's vocation, but comes to accept it on the condition that he works with her and not Jumbo.
_	Early 16th-century copperplate inscriptions of the King Vijayabahu VII detail the land grants made by the king in the town on the condition that the recipient paid ten "fanams" a year to the Vishnu shrine.
_	Sunde had agreed to participate on the condition that the father Nicklas Jangestig would not take part in the debate.
_	However, Lord Thomas ultimately grants permission for the expedition, on the condition that Summerlee accompany Challenger to act as "a critical eye".
_	Subsequently, a spectator at the lecture, Oscar Perreault (Jacques Lessard), proposes to pay the expedition's expenses to Mongolia, on the condition that the scientists capture a living dinosaur and to exhibit it to the public wherever he wishes; and that his associate John Roxton (David Nerman) goes along to represent his interests.
_	Mierlo set his seal to the "Satisfactie van Haarlem" wherein he promised that the Catholics of the city of Haarlem would swear allegiance to Willem the Silent rather than Philip II of Spain, on the condition that the Catholics would keep the same rights as Protestants.
_	The All-Americans agreed to rematch the Staleys on December 4, again in Chicago, on the condition that the game would be considered a "post-season" exhibition game not to be counted in the standings; had it not, Buffalo would have had an undefeated season and won the title.
_	The property was placed on the market with the condition that it could only be used for tourism or leisure activities, which limited its potential sale price.
_	Fleetwood asked him to join Fleetwood Mac and Buckingham agreed, on the condition that his music partner and girlfriend, Stevie Nicks, be included.
_	He was offered a pardon on the condition that he disavow his faith.
_	In the early twentieth century, McGill donated the land to the City of Westmount on the condition that it become a bird sanctuary.
_	There is no evidence that he was ever consecrated, although he received the post of penitentiary major on the condition that he receive priestly ordination, which he did in 1502, assuming the post on December 7, 1503; he would remain penitentiary until his death.
_	The Trust which governs the island agreed to having them removed on the condition that they are not killed.
_	Charges against Combs were dismissed on the condition that he have no further legal issues with drugs for two years.
_	Following the revolt, a deputation of islanders presented the island as a gift to King Frederick III on the condition that the island would never be ceded again.
_	A few days later Vane captured a sloop and placed Yeats aboard as Captain, on the condition that Yeats continue to sail with him.
_	She had fallen in love with Art from a distance and sought him out in her currach, but when she met Conn and learned he was without a wife, agreed to marry him instead, on the condition that Art be banished from Tara for a year.
_	$3 billion worth of funding out of a total cost of $8 billion for the Melbourne Metro Rail Project rapid transit rail project was allocated in the budget on the condition that Victoria fund an equal amount.
_	After the threat of being banished, Linnington was ultimately allowed to stay, on the condition that he reformed his behavior.
_	They are defined by the condition that the coefficients of the highest-order derivatives be positive, which implies the key property that the principal symbol is invertible, or equivalently that there are no real characteristic directions.
_	Kiedis gave full creative license to Carolan on the condition that he "make us [the band] look like the Gods of Funk."
_	Karl Arnold, the Prime Minister of North Rhine-Westphalia, agreed with the other Prime Ministers of the German states to accept the "International Authority for the Ruhr" on the condition that other coal and steel locations in the West of Europe were put under the same control.
_	Phillips was chosen by 21 of the 39 GOP precinct representatives in the 67th district on the condition that he would seek reelection in 2012.
_	In 2012, a decree in Paris allowed cyclists in that city to turn right or, if there is no street to the right, proceed straight ahead on red, under the condition that they "exercise caution" and yield to pedestrians, after road safety experts deemed the measure would reduce collisions.
_	LAX accepted, under the condition that the Six Sides of Steel would be electrified, a match that played into the LAX's favor with its Mexican wrestling heritage.
_	On October 17, 1781 the Cracow city authorities gave Witkowski permission to "perform comedy under the condition that he pay fifty Polish zloty a month to the municipal treasury.
_	Those led to it being sold to Roy Moskoff, once again for $1, on the condition that the house and outbuildings be moved across the street and rotated.
_	Ukraine agreed to guarantee the unimpeded transit of natural gas on the condition that Gazprom would guarantee and supply the technical gas that was required for the system to function, but this was rejected by Russia, as it considered this the responsibility of Ukraine.
_	Here the particles interacting with one another will move along geodesic lines; consequently, in this case the condition for a synchronous reference system does not contradict the condition that it be comoving with the matter.
_	Returning to the present, Gibson releases Spencer on the condition that he assist the FSA against the threat to Ascension City.
_	Iraq was granted official independence on October 3, 1932 in accordance with an agreement signed by the United Kingdom in 1930, whereby the United Kingdom would end its effective mandate on the condition that the Iraqi government would allow British advisers to take part in government affairs, allow British military bases to remain, and a requirement that Iraq assist the United Kingdom in wartime.
_	He relents, on the condition that she wear a carnation.
_	Apollo was furious, but Eros protected Zephyrus, as the act was committed in the name of love, on the condition that the wind god served Eros forever.
_	Evans accepted the job, on the condition that he could retain his position as a sportswriter.
_	She promises not to turn Taverner over to the police on the condition that he spend the night with her.
_	He returned in May 1982 – after approximately 14 months of being away – on the condition that the group reconsider their rehearsal and touring policies and refrain from "Las Vegas-type" engagements.
_	When Amber chases him down he relents once more on the condition that they carry their affair in total secrecy.
_	A group of blues musicians were given a one-hour radio spot on the condition that they gain a sponsor.
_	They gave him gold to go away, which he could not carry, but he said he wanted to stay in her service, because his friends would be ashamed of him, to carry so little; they urged him to go, and he went on the condition that the dragon carry back the gold for him.
_	In 1794, while President, to resolve his dilemma over slavery, Washington attempted to lease property at Mount Vernon to English farmers on the condition that former slaves would work as paid free laborers.
_	Jeanne refused an offer of matrimony issued by King Philip II of Spain who had hoped to marry her to his son, on the condition that she return to the Catholic faith.
_	In 1801, Samuel Oldknow, then the Chairman of the Peak Forest Canal Company, offered an Edward Stelfox £50 towards the cost of building two lime kilns on the banks of the Ashton Canal on the condition that he burned limestone brought along the Peak Forest Canal.
_	In 1883, Summerlin came to a city council meeting and offered the land around the lake on the condition that it be beautified and turned into a park.
_	St. Katherine Drexel, who was canonized in 2000 by Pope John Paul II, gave St. Benedict's Church $1,500 to help build the current church building, with the condition that a certain amount of pews would be reserved for African-American parishioners, encouraging the church to have an integrated congregation during the time of racial segregation in the southern United States.
_	Parole camps were set up by the Union Army for its own soldiers who had been captured by the Confederacy, and then released on the condition that they would honor the terms and conditions of their parole.
_	On December 31, 1862, an enabling act was approved by President Abraham Lincoln admitting West Virginia, on the condition that a provision for the gradual abolition of slavery be inserted in its constitution (as Rev. Battelle had urged in the "Wheeling Intelligencer" and also written to Lincoln).
_	Her interracial parents, Leo (Richards) and Justine (Lacey), let her attend, under the condition that she must return by midnight and call if she's going to be late.
_	The Raja of Ladakh sued for peace and, since Ali Sher Khan's intention was not to annex Laddakh, he agreed subject to the condition that the village of Ganokh and Gagra Nullah should be ceded to Skardu and he (the Laddakhi Raja) should pay annual tribute.
_	Toni agrees on the condition that they both help her train and that her partner will be Mona.
_	When she takes the fall for a shooting in the 15 Division, her job is questioned, but they give it back to her with the condition that she will be treated as a new rookie.
_	Emmerich and Devlin wrote the script on spec, with the condition that the screenplay would return to the filmmakers if the studio did not immediately approve it.
_	The library is grown under the condition that is of interest.
_	The Adams group imposed the condition that the Baptists keep at least one professor employed continuously in the college department.
_	MINURSO's mandate was extended on the condition that both parties would submit proposals to be agreed upon in order to resolve problems relating to the implementation of the Settlement Plan and an overall durable solution concerning the political status of Western Sahara.
_	It exists under the condition that the permittivity of one of the materials forming the interface is negative, while the other one is positive, as for example the interface between air and a lossy conducting medium such as the terrestrial transmission line, below the plasma frequency.
_	The Dutch government was too impoverished and depleted to argue, and agreed with the condition that they be allowed to continue to use the Cape for repairs and refreshment.
_	In 1847, the SER unsuccessfully challenged the condition that the line between Ashford and St Leonards be completed first.
_	Achsah and John Carnan were the parents of Charles Carnan Ridgely (1760-1829), whose uncle Capt. Charles Ridgely III (1733-1790), willed the estate of Hampton Mansion to, on the condition that he take the surname of Ridgely.
_	Flanagan had agreed to participate in the film under the condition that his death be included in the final project.
_	1998-2001 DP took part in a centre-right governing coalition in the municipality, on the condition that a plebiscite would be held on bifurcation.
_	His other daughters have refused to take him in, so he has no choice but to accept Maggie's offer which comes with the condition that he must surrender control of his entire business to her and her husband, Will.
_	There is a popular belief which has come down to people through the centuries that in a village Ghanghu of Churu, King Ghangh loved and married an Apsara (nymph) on the condition that he would not visit her palace without prior information.
_	Jake is resistant to the plan, at first, but ultimately relents, though he does so under the condition that he recruits Rachel and Marco to the plan.
_	However, a plea bargaining deal with state and federal prosecutors reduced this considerably, on the condition that he provide evidence against the officials he had bribed with regards to his property development projects.
_	Charles fell in love with her and courted her for several years until she agreed to a relationship on the condition that she remain financially independent and retain her job at the telegraph office in Hällestad rather than being "kept" by him.
_	Stewart's bequest part-funded the replacement sculpture, "Flour Power", on the condition that the installation be permanent, and that the land be known as Stewart Plaza.
_	She is ready to give her an invitation, but only with the condition that she fulfills a journalistic task.
_	For this theory one can add the condition that the characteristic is "p", a prime or zero,
_	The suspects were released on the condition that they remain available to police.
_	After "The Silmarillion" was published in 1977, Christopher Tolkien consented to a Swedish translation only on the condition that Ohlmarks have nothing to do with it.
_	Growing desperate, Frank made a deal with the Venom Symbiote, the symbiote would allow him to kill Fisk and 'win' his war on crime, on the condition that Frank would kill one target for the symbiote.
_	Jed pleads very intensely and Seth eventually agrees to give them the address under the condition that they do not tell anyone that she gave it to them.
_	In Greece in pagan antiquity, Plato in his "Republic" suggested that the ideal ruler would be given absolute power only upon the condition that he did not want it.
_	In that document, Sancha de Aibar, mother of King Ramiro I, grants some land to Ramiro I's daughter Sancha on the condition that she leave them to the nuns of Santa María on her death.
_	Like Irene 50 years before her, Theodora presided over the restoration of icon veneration in 843, on the condition that Theophilus not be condemned.
_	Ever since the reign of Emperor Severus Alexander (222–235 AD), lands on the frontiers of the Roman Empire which had been taken from enemies, were granted to Roman soldiers and their heirs on the condition that the duty for military service to the Emperor would also be hereditary and on the condition that the lands would never be sold, but would remain in the family.
_	Seward married the Judge's daughter, Frances, in 1824 on the condition that they would live with Miller in his Auburn home.
_	In early 2006, Chris Byrd sued Don King for breach of contract and the two eventually settled out of court under the condition that Byrd would be released from his contract with King.
_	In the late 1960s, he sold of land to an oil company, on the condition that they would not drill within sight of his home.
_	He was also still a strong opponent of the Roman Catholics, for it was by his advice that the Elector of Saxony declared himself ready to send deputies to a council to be convened at Trent, but only under the condition that the Protestants should have a share in the discussions, and that the Pope should not be considered as the presiding officer and judge.
_	Permission was given, on the condition that several specialized instructions would be removed.
_	The Other Mother invites Coraline to stay forever, under the condition that a pair of buttons will be sewn over her eyes.
_	The Ashanti territories became part of the Gold Coast colony on 1 January 1902, on the condition that the Golden Stool would not be violated by British or other non-Akan foreigners.
_	Brenner accepts under the condition that he will be allowed to select his own team.
_	Later she had bestowed her fortune on the Roman people on the condition that a rite named after her were held yearly.
_	The Queen of the fairies commuted Iolanthe's sentence of death to banishment for life on the condition that Iolanthe left her husband and never communicated with him again.
_	Rogers agreed on the condition that his image would be placed facing the House Chamber, supposedly so he could "keep an eye on Congress".
_	One year later, in 1207, Henry I the Bearded gave to Władysław the Duchy of Kalisz, but with the condition that in case he could recover the south Greater Poland lands, Kalisz will then return to Silesia.
_	Clear descriptions of some syndromes, such as the condition that would later be termed schizophrenia, have been identified as relatively rare prior to the 19th century, although interpretations of the evidence and its implications are inconsistent.
_	Number 18 answers some of Jason's questions about where she is from, where she has worked, and how long she has been working, but only on the condition that Jason pay 100 baht for each response.
_	The following week, Triple H issued a challenge to Lesnar, requesting a rematch with him at WrestleMania 29, which Lesnar accepted on the condition that he could choose the stipulation.
_	Gould agreed to help him, on the condition that he gave Gordon-Gordon $1 million in negotiable stock in what he called "a pooling of interests":
_	When the hospital sought to expand in 1884, Lankenau sought money from his brother-in-law, Anthony J. Drexel, who agreed on the condition that Lankenau will his art collection to Drexel University.
_	Wilson attempted to break into movies by re-writing a low-budget comedy on the condition that he could direct it.
_	After defeating Yama in battle to the point of death, Shiva then revived him, under the condition that the devout youth would live forever.
_	Mr. William grants George permission to make the movie, with the condition that it will be filmed in India.
_	Khidr warned that he would not be able to remain patient and consented on the condition that Moses would not question his actions.
_	This grant was made on the condition that the lands would pass to the couple's joint heirs, but if they were childless to Joan's heirs from any later marriages.
_	They were planning to release an entirely instrumental album, but Roadrunner insisted that the contract was only valid under the condition that they hired a vocalist.
_	In return, Baji Rao II would have to live in a place assigned by the British along with his retainers on the condition that he would never return to his homeland at Pune.
_	Attorney Jan Eagleman offers to represent the family, on the condition that they participate in a mock trial in a new reality courtroom show called "Mock Trial with J. Reinhold".
_	Our experience indicated that in a large majority of cases the volume of river water would exceed 8 times the volume of effluent, and that the figure of 2–0 parts dissolved oxygen per 100,000, which had been shown to be practicable, would be a safe figure to adopt for the purposes of a general standard, taken in conjunction with the condition that the effluent should not contain more than 3–0 parts per 100,000 of suspended solids."
_	Both and are algebraic groups, because the condition that a matrix be orthogonal (i.e., have its own transpose as inverse) can be expressed as a set of polynomial equations in the entries of the matrix.
_	After a period of four years failing to sell the script to various studios McLoughlin and Hawes found a group of Mormon investors who were willing to finance the film for one million dollars on the condition that they started filming in three weeks.
_	The Association accepted the application, after adding the condition that no person who served on the former committees of North Melbourne or West Melbourne could serve on the new committee, and accepting the assurances of the new committee that it was loyal to the Association.
_	The Emperor gave Mendoza 2000 men and 13 ships on the condition that within two years Mendoza should transport 1000 colonists, build roads into the interior, and construct three forts.
_	Eventually, international diplomatic pressure especially from Diego Arria, then Governor of Distrito Federal of Venezuela, and United States Secretary of State Henry Kissinger resulted in the sudden release of Letelier on the condition that he immediately leave Chile.
_	When these dealings were brought to the Queen’s attentions, William Davison was given orders by Elizabeth to approach the States and amend the terms of the monetary assistance that England would give through Prince Casimir of the Palatinate, who was receiving funding from England in increments of £20,000 for soldiers to help the States, requiring now that it would be on the condition that the States can no longer deal with the Duke if a second £20,000 were to be sent.
_	Jubeh has not played baseball since the accidental death of his father, but after Ishihara threatens to kill Shinosuki he agrees to play on the condition that the prison food is improved and all the players are pardoned of their crimes.
_	The studio executives offer to let Comic Book Guy direct the sequel, on the condition that Comic Book Guy lie to the fans and say he liked the film.
_	As for Theophilus, given the condition that he was in, the Canadian Baptist Ministries took Theophilus under its care right from the time of his education in the mission schools, the sudden death of his parents one after the other within a span of ten days, and the time when he was stricken with tuberculosis.
_	It did this by providing financial grants to states (using the section 96 grants power), on the condition that they did not collect their own income taxes.
_	They agree to race Will on the condition that the winner is entitled to both Tug and the password that allows a rider to control Tug.
_	The Source agrees on the condition that Phoebe remain in the Underworld under his command, though he secretly orders her to be killed.
_	However, in 1997, Page changed her mind and agreed to a television interview for the aforementioned "E! True Hollywood Story" on the condition that the location of the interview and her face not be revealed (she was shown with her face and dress electronically blacked out).
_	The Crown offered free land on the condition that new settlers swear their loyalty to the Spanish Crown and allegiance to the Roman Catholic Church.
_	Bozorg Agha uses the influence he has amongst the coup heads to set Farhad free on the condition that Shahrzad agrees to break her engagement to him and marry the nephew of Bozorg Agha, Ghobad.
_	In 1979, they decided to sell the remaining 288 acres to Anne Arundel County on the condition that the land be used as a park.
_	He gave the land to the railway under the condition that the town were to be named after him.
_	In 1923, at a time when the home nations had withdrawn from FIFA, the FAI was recognised by FIFA as the governing body of the Irish Free State on the condition that it changed its name to the Football Association of the Irish Free State.
_	Since the State of Mexico invested the money in the project, INAH ceded management rights to the state, with the condition that research and security of the site would continue.
_	The condition that the automorphism group is finite can be replaced by the condition that it is not of arithmetic genus one and every non-singular rational component meets the other components in at least 3 points .
_	He was returned again in 1774 alongside his eldest son, John; the Prime Minister was disgruntled that he had not returned his own favoured candidate and Fownes Luttrell resigned on the condition that the Government's candidate would not interfere in the future without his permission.
_	In 2014 it was for senior men aged 17 years and older with the condition that players of the Australian Ice Hockey League that are 20 years and younger must have played less than 6 games to remain eligible.
_	She reluctantly accepts, on the condition that she'll hand over her business to Mads in exchange of stock in Skjern's businesses.
_	Yang agrees on the condition that she may take a new photo with Shawn.
_	Eventually, Ysbaddaden relents, and agrees to give Culhwch his daughter on the condition that he completes a number of impossible tasks ("anoethau"), including hunting the Twrch Trwyth and recovering the exalted prisoner, Mabon son of Modron, the only man able to hunt the dog Drudwyn, in turn the only dog who can track the Twrch Trwyth.
_	The building was sold in 1968 on the condition that the lobby not be altered, which it has not been to this day.
_	Rex made the deal, however, and in exchange the Kid got to officially use the symbol and name Superboy (on the condition that half of all the profits from any merchandising would go to charity).
_	CASE was selected on the condition that it will only be constructed if the European Space Agency selects ARIEL.
_	Touched by the fact that the two try to protect the each other by taking the blame, Chief Stone decides they have suffered enough and lets them go on the condition that they promise not to avenge her.
_	She asks Nishi if she can write about The Baron, to which Nishi grants his consent on the condition that he will be the first to read the finished story.
_	In August 2011, four months before the hearing is to take place, the prosecutors and defense lawyers talked over a plea deal that would allow the three men to walk out of prison, on the condition that they plead guilty but can maintain their innocence.
_	For example, Mohammad bin Hasan quotes Aboo-Hanifeh that in case someone constructs a qanat in abandoned land, someone else can dig another qanat in the same land on the condition that the second qanat is 500 zera’ (375 meters) away from the first one.
_	The Elevens (Japanese) population from Île de la Cité, an Island in Paris where they have been exiled by Britannia, were recruited by the EU with the condition that they and their families would be granted EU citizenship if they join the military.
_	Warhol agreed, but only on the condition that Viva take off her blouse for the role.
_	Henson's decision to end "The Muppet Show" after five years, the poor reception to "Raise the Titanic", and a decision that, effective from 1 January 1982, ATV Midlands would be permitted to keep its licence only on the condition that it terminate its association with Grade and ITC (ultimately leading to its re-branding as Central Television).
_	Lady Shiva accepts on the condition that they would have a duel to the death a year later.
_	She agrees, on the condition that they sleep in separate areas of the farm.
_	The Belgian queen agreed to let the Efteling use her story, on the condition that a contribution to charity would be made.
_	The second period is from 1984 to 1988 when farmers were allowed to enter urban areas on the condition that they provided their own food.
_	Many of the newspapers were disenchanted with Santa Anna's deployment of General Martin Perfecto de Cos, who had been paroled back to Mexico after the Siege of Bexar on the condition that he no longer take up arms against Texians.
_	On 28 November 2010, the "New York Times" media company published information acquired by WikiLeaks that in 2009, the United States officials offered Slovenia a meeting with Barack Obama under the condition that the country accepts one of the Guantanamo Bay detainees.
_	In the early 1980s, a group of researchers and scientists including Mathilde Krim, Ph.D., then a researcher at New York's Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, formed an informal study group to investigate the condition that came to be known as AIDS.
_	In 2013 Smith directed a horror film called "Tusk", which was inspired by a story Smith and Scott Mosier read about a Gumtree ad for a man who rents out a room in his house for free, on the condition that the respondent dresses as a walrus for two hours per day.
_	If we drop the condition that the realization of the polyhedron is non-degenerate, then we get the so-called degenerate uniform polyhedra.
_	Lyndall then offers her paramour an alternative – she will leave the farm in his company, that very night, on the condition that he releases her whenever she asks.
_	The first documented Pitres were two brothers (Marcellino Pitre = Martin Pitre, Saturnino Pitre = Francisco Pitre) who settled and according to the Royal Decree of Graces of 1815, "Those who immigrated to Puerto Rico were given free land and a "Letter of Domicile" with the condition that they swore loyalty to the Spanish Crown and allegiance to the Roman Catholic Church.
_	In May 2009, MTR eventually agreed to offer the disabled concessionary fares with HK$2 million sponsorship from Transport and Housing Bureau and under the condition that Legislative Council amends the "Disability Discrimination Ordinance".
_	Seats are allocated to constituencies, each entitled to an initial minimum of 20 seats, with the remaining 39—29 until 2007—allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in any given province did not exceed three times that of any other.
_	Under the condition that the category result is rarely affected, the extraction of feature subset is needed.
_	Betab accepted the challenge on the condition that he should be suitably rewarded and produced a master piece in the process - "siyah bakhtam wa az bakhte khaesh khursandam /chara ki bakhte man wa zulfe yar hum rang ast" (authentic English translation ????).
_	Chief Maikeli Vukuwale's son was Isei Tokovou born in 1893 who gave the Tui Viwa title to Semisi Ravusou on the condition that Ravusou and his family remain part of the Methodist Church of Fiji and Rotuma.
_	He responded in September 1341 that he would not report to Cairo unless the leading emirs of the sultanate appeared before him in al-Karak and gave him their oaths of loyalty and on the condition that his other brothers imprisoned in Qus would be relocated to al-Karak.
_	Darrell was willing to join, but on the condition that Mustaine also hire his brother Vinnie on drums.
_	He was succeeded by his nephew Charles Anthoni Johnson Brooke, who in turn was succeeded by his son, Charles Vyner Brooke, on the condition that Charles Anthoni should rule in consultation with Vyner Brooke's brother Bertram Brooke.
_	He accepted on the condition that he could resign following a possible victory of the Liberal Party in the forthcoming legislative elections.
_	On 8 October 2012, it was announced that MTG would buy TV 2's share of TV 2 SPORT, however the deal did not go through until 19 December 2012 when the Competition Authority approved the deal, on the condition that MTG would abide by certain rules until major football TV rights (Danish Superliga, UEFA Champions League) are renegotiated in 2015.
_	In 1893, the College began receiving a "Grant-In-Aid" from the government on the condition that 10 pupils receive science scholarships from elementary schools on the results of an examination.
_	At the "Deutsche Rugby Tag" (DRT) in mid-July 2012, the "DRV" announced that it was able to avoid insolvency and regain its annual grants from the German government on the condition that it sticks to a strict financial plan that would see the "DRV" debt free by 2018.
_	When the two metrics formula_33 are those induced by norms formula_34 respectively, then strong equivalence is equivalent to the condition that, for all formula_11,
_	He allowed the Siddis to retain control of Janjira on the condition that they would accept Abdul Rehman as the ruler.
_	In 1616, after a treaty between Jahangir and Amar Singh Chittorgarh was won back to him by Jahangir on the condition that it will be repaired.
_	Jacob's sons answered with guile, saying that they could not give their sister to one not circumcised, and said that they would consent only on the condition that every man of the town became circumcised, and then the two people might intermarry and live together; otherwise they would leave.
_	Hamor and Shechem reported that Jacob's people would only do so on the condition that every man of the town was circumcised, and they argued that the men do so, for Jacob's animals and wealth would add to the city's wealth.
_	The major agrees with the condition that the name should be changed to Minas Tênis Clube, and that the club's first president should be appointed by the then governor of the state, Benedicto Valladares.
_	She told her father to accept the marriage proposal with the condition that the marriage would follow Hindu tradition and customs.
_	Fractional linear transformations use four complex parameters, "a", "b", "c", and "d", with the condition that "ad"−"bc" is non-zero.
_	He was released after 18 months in captivity, under the condition that he would raze Enger Castle.
_	He offers Danila a job, but Danila refuses and is released on the condition that he will find another job within a week.
_	The trio agreed, but on the condition that Tozawa-juku would have to disband if his team lost.
_	Most warriors known as the noble sons of servants were descended from freemen or liberated serfs who received estates from Béla IV in Upper Hungary on the condition that they were to jointly equip a fixed number of knights.
_	Among the locations that granted permission for filming was Columbia University, which allowed its Havemeyer Hall to stand in for the fictional "Weaver Hall", on the condition that the University not be identified by name.
_	After Mrs. Wrigley's death in 1958, the property was presented to the City of Pasadena with the condition that the house become the permanent base of operations for the Tournament of Roses.
_	Canada sold India the reactor on the condition that the reactor and any by-products would be "employed for peaceful purposes only.".
_	Fang Lizhi who had a great deal of influence amongst the students, worked as a mediator between the government and students in Hefei and was able to get the students to go back to class and end their sit-in on the condition that the Anhui officials would forward the student demands to the Shanghai government.
_	He agrees with the condition that he can put a variety show on the Springfield Bowl.
_	Roopmati agreed to go to Mandu on the condition that she would live in a palace within sight of her beloved and venerated river, Narmada.
_	A young 16-year-old girl, Zhu Yingtai, managed to convince her parents to send her to college at Hangzhou on the condition that she went in the guise of a man.
_	She agrees to do this on the condition that they withdraw the execution order for Kogami.
_	When he awakens, Walt offers to surrender himself on the condition that the money be kept for their children.
_	When she won a contract with a recording company, her father agreed to let her sing on the condition that she would record in a burka and not allow herself to be photographed.
_	He had been treated kindly by Muhammad after the Battle of Badr, being a poor man with daughters, he had no means to pay ransom, he was released after Battle of Badr, on the condition that he would not take up arms against Muslims again.
_	He agrees on the condition that he will have final cut.
_	Eleanor married in Valencia on 27 August 1349 to Peter IV of Aragon, on the condition that he renounce all rights to any Sicilian Crown.
_	Tiede was released from his life sentence on $10,000 bail in May 2014 with the condition that he live with Linklater in Austin, Texas.
_	Davis was released after five days in jail under the condition that she not interfere with the efforts of her deputy clerks, who had begun issuing marriage licenses to all couples in her absence.
_	A slight variant is to drop the condition that the function formula_42 be continuous but still require that it and its
_	Furthermore, the commission suggested lifting the moratorium imposed on abortion research at that time under the condition that no inducements were offered to subjects to undergo an abortion for the purpose of research.
_	Carmela gives in on the condition that he go to Meadow's apartment after the concert and return home the following morning.
_	He accepted the position as foreign minister on the condition that he was able to return to his post as consul general in Antwerp.
_	In 1934 the British Government offered Cunard loans to finish "Queen Mary" and to build a second ship, "Queen Elizabeth", on the condition that Cunard merged with the then ailing White Star line to form Cunard-White Star Ltd.
_	On April 23, Rozelle announced that he would leave the decision up to Kosar, but permitted Minnesota to persuade Kosar to enter the regular draft with the condition that they could not negotiate a potential contract with him.
_	Schöchle convinced Baden-Württemberg's Minister of Finance Karl Frank to help fund the venture in 1952 on the condition that the city of Ludwigsburg would also assist, a stipulation to which Lord Mayor Elmar Doch and the town council agreed.
_	After dating for a few weeks, Victoria says she will only marry Ted on the condition that he end his friendship with Robin.
_	Fletcher is allowed to return without being de-energized and adjusted, on the condition that he tell no one the truth he has learned, and convinces his wife that everything he has already told her "was" due to a temporary psychological fit.
_	It was announced in November 2012 that Shirley Jones will guest as Anne, one half of a couple that agrees to purchase Grayson's former house under the condition that they be welcomed into the Cul-de-Sac Crew.
_	Note also that this solution can only satisfy the condition that "no thread shall be allowed to starve" if and only if semaphores preserve first-in first-out ordering when blocking and releasing threads.
_	The identity of these individuals is unclear, but Tresham was promised freedom on the condition that over the next three months his father pay £2,100 to William Ayloffe, to "save his lyef attainder in bloode."
_	This required the approval of the other university clubs, which agreed on the condition that Phillips end his McGill career, which he did.
_	Instead Gregory consecrated Abbot Yvo (Evêne) of S. Melanii, one of the procurators sent to Rome, and he also bestowed on him the pallium of a metropolitan archbishop, on the condition that he would submit to the judgment of the Holy See when the long-standing case of the right of Dol to be a metropolitan and use the pallium was finally decided.
_	That the application of Mr J Young & Co, on behalf of the Friern Manor Dairy Farm Co Ltd, for the consent of the Council for the erection of an addition to the rear of number 127 Hanley Road, Stroud Green, to abut on Crouch Hill, be granted subject to the condition that the addition therein referred to be commenced within six months and completed within 18 months from the 30 day of September 1890.
_	"Twin Peaks" producer Robert Engels agreed to help write it on the condition that Lynch and Frost approved the project; Haley said: "[Engels] and I had a number of discussions about what the story would be.
_	Paramount Home Entertainment agreed to package it with the box set, also on the condition that Lynch and Frost approved.
_	Congress had originally approved the idea of a plebiscite for the creation of a Constituent Assembly on the condition that Congress itself would not be dismissed.
_	In 2015 Joan Weill, a former college trustee with a long history of philanthropy benefiting the college, offered a $20 million donation on the condition that the institution change its name to Joan Weill-Paul Smith's College, a change that would have violated Phelps Smith's founding bequest, which required that the school be "forever known" as Paul Smith's College of Arts and Sciences.
_	Marduk confidently assures the other gods that he will defeat Tiamat in short order, but presents the condition that he will be proclaimed supreme god—and be given authority over even Anshar—if he succeeds.
_	The judge suspended the sentence and put Thomas on probation for three years on the condition that Thomas pays four years of back taxes, files and pays all future taxes, and obeys the law.
_	Anonymous sperm donation occurs under the condition that recipients and offspring will never learn the identity of the donor.
_	Despite his anger at the wedding, Eleftherios Venizelos permitted, initially, that Aspasia and her mother moved to the Royal Palace with the condition that the marriage not be made public.
_	Despite remaining unenthusiastic with the script, Kanter agreed to commission it as a film on the condition that he reserve the right to select a "" director.
_	In spite of the borrowings from boys' public schools it is said that Dr Wood, formerly of Bedales school, accepted the post of Headmaster only on the condition that Brockenhurst remained co-educational rather than becoming boys only as had been proposed.
_	Trystane also allows Bronn to go free under the condition that he allow Areo Hotah to strike him in the face in revenge for being struck by Bronn earlier.
_	An "equivalent" definition of IP replaces the condition that the interaction succeeds with high probability on strings in the language with the requirement that it "always" succeeds:
_	At first, Miki hesitated to agree to the request out of her desire to become a nun, but eventually she consented, on the condition that even when married she would be allowed to continue her Buddhist prayer.
_	The contract had a no-trade clause that was activated on the condition that San Jose made the playoffs.
_	Sam agrees on the condition that they visit the house where the murder occurred.
_	It was built with $10,000 left to the village for the purpose by a local bank president, on the condition that matching funds be raised.
_	From statements made by Secretary of State Shultz, the Soviet leadership came under the impression that the US would cease military shipments to the mujahideen immediately after Soviet withdrawal, with the condition that the USSR "front-loaded" its withdrawal (i.e. withdrew the majority of its troops in the beginning of the process, thereby complicating redeployment).
_	Peter York, president of the EMI Christian Music Group, suggested Griffin record a gospel album, and she agreed under the condition that Buddy Miller work as producer.
_	Faure accepted, as well as Giscard on the condition that Chaban-Delmas also withdrew himself.
_	Even though the school does not offer Advanced Placement courses, you are allowed to take college classes with dual-enrollment at SPCC with the condition that you have a good GPA.
_	Broadhurst expressed interest in producing Bradley’s play, "The Woman on the Index", and Bradley agreed under the condition that she would assist with the direction.
_	Many believe he had improved on his 2016 Mr Olympia condition, but he was still far from the condition that had made him a big name in bodybuilding in the 90s and early 2000s.
_	She returns his promotion on the condition that he personally handles a pro bono case.
_	When the group later attends another party, the two of them agree to continue their sexual relationship on the condition that nobody finds out.
_	He had apparently donated $2 million to ART on the condition that if he could raise more money from others before June 1, 2015, they would return the contribution.
_	He was offered principalship of the college under the condition that he would not take part in politics.
_	He offered to transfer the charter and assets of Brandon College to the town of Sharon on the condition that a building for the new school, to be named Madison College, be provided.
_	He is given human form to woo and marry her on the condition that she remain true to him.
_	They decided to send Valerius and Horatius to the Aventine on the condition that the decemviri resign.
_	The decemviri agreed to step down on the condition that they would get personal protection against any reprisals.
_	The chemical potential is found from the condition that the number of particles is related to the wavefunction by
_	Langtons was given to Hornchurch Urban District Council by Varco Williams and his daughter in 1929, under the condition that the building must be kept as it was and used for council purposes and that the six acres (24,000 m²) of grounds remain open to the public.
_	Darryl T. Craxton, an agent of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, offers to get him out of trouble with the IRS on the condition that Easy investigate an espionage problem at a major aircraft manufacturer.
_	Azula offers to tell Zuko what was written in the letters, on the condition that he lets her accompany him on his search for Ursa.
_	They offered the children the opportunity to continue playing, but on the condition that if they lost the challenges they would lose all the prizes they had already won.
_	Golitsyn Hospital (Голицынская больница) was built with a 900,000 rouble private endowment of the late Prince Dmitry Golitsyn (1721–1793), on the condition that the hospital would remain free to all, regardless of wealth or creed.
_	The Henderson's donated a substantial portion of the start-up funding while the property itself, which was located on an unused section of the Butts Farm west of Boca Raton, was donated by the ARVIDA corporation and the Butts family with the condition that a [[Christian]] school be established there.
_	It is when Graciela in desperation openly asks Alejandro for financial help, that he agrees to support the Mendoza with their debts on the condition that she overlooks his illegitimate birth and allows him to get to know her daughter, to see if he can get her to fall in love with him.
_	Law stated: "Descendants of families proscribed by the revocation of the Edict of Nantes will continue to benefit from the benefit of 15 December 1790 Law, but on the condition that a nominal decree should be issued for every petitioner.
_	Based on the terms of the accord, the Netherlands was granted the right to trade within overseas territories controlled by the Spanish Empire under the condition that it acquire an express license from the King of Spain.
_	Osamu originally wanted for Yūma to be the team captain, but Yūma only accepted joining Tamakoma Branch with the condition that Osamu was the captain.
_	Influenced by various financial scandals and accidents, along with the report of the Committee on Standards in Public Life, the bill was introduced to Parliament by Richard Shepherd and given government support, on the condition that it become an amendment to the Employment Rights Act 1996.
_	Baradaeus travelled to Alexandria in 576 and agreed to acknowledge Peter as Pope of Alexandria and Paul's deposition on the condition that Paul was not excommunicated.
_	After seeing the condition that his wife is in, James expresses the regret that he bothered to come home, and he attempts to ignore her as she continues her remarks, which include blaming him for Jamie's drinking.
_	Some students who are invited to attend IMSA are admitted on the condition that they successfully complete a two-week, intensive preparation course, known as EXCEL, over the summer.
_	Despite his disgust, Jack offers Paul £10,000 that he has received from the house, on the condition that Paul faces prison.
_	His home country, where he did all his artistic work, offered him places as a Professor of Painting at its Art Universities, with the condition that he becomes a communist.
_	In 1956, the airport's ownership was transferred to the Omak City Council under the condition that it be maintained properly.
_	Later, some towers along the wall were let to private citizens, on the condition that they assisted in maintaining stretches of the defences.
_	Charles I gave the Park to William Trumbull on 28 March 1629, in recognition of his service as ambassador to the Archduke Albert of Austria, Regent of the Netherlands, and later as Clerk of the Privy Council, on the condition that he maintain a herd of 200 deer for the King's recreation in the deer park.
_	Hội agreed to defend Saigon at the UN in New York on the condition that a fact-finding mission would be allowed to enter the country and freely see the truth for themselves.
_	The Smothers Brothers were told by the network that they could have Steinberg on the show again on the condition that he would not repeat the sermons.
_	Perry accepts, on the condition that Meg does a real interview with him so he can set the record straight.
_	Lu clear his name on the condition that Lu helps him find his ex-wife, Li Xia, and the Rakshasa Tablet (), the cult's sacred artefact.
_	However, Julius Rosenwald, wealthy co-owner of Sears, Roebuck and Company in Chicago, soon afterwards became Reshevsky's benefactor, and he guaranteed Reshevsky's future on the condition that he would complete his education.
_	Almond concurred with McClure's decision on the condition that the US 2nd Infantry Division would only retreat so that Wonju could be controlled by UN artillery fire.
_	Nuada accepted, on the condition that Sreng fought with one arm tied up.
_	The Doctor, who suspected this, agrees to help Varos on the condition that Peri and Areta are returned unharmed.
_	Eager to make up for his mistake, Gordon agrees to Joe's request to secretly help configure Westgroup's mainframes for time-sharing, on the condition that Mutiny be the first client at a discounted rate.
_	Ukraine agreed to guarantee the unfettered transport of natural gas on the condition that Gazprom would guarantee and supply technical gas for Ukraine's gas transit system to function; this was denied by Russia.
_	The collective published it with the major publisher Simon & Schuster only on the condition that they would have complete editorial control and that nonprofit health centers could purchase copies at a significant discount.
_	Warren was not able to buy his land outright until 1821, when a compensation claim by the heirs of Frederick Philipse, the local landowner whose holdings had been confiscated by the state for his Loyalist sympathies during the war, was settled on the condition that all leaseholds be abolished.
_	Nick lies to Dot that he had promised to send money to Sandy on the condition that she named their daughter Dorothy after her grandmother, so that Dot will trust him and bond with his daughter; Dot does not know Dotty's real name.
_	In 2011, Bose donated a majority of the company's non-voting shares to MIT on the condition that the shares never be sold.
_	Shearer accepted the surprise offer on the Monday on the condition that he could bring in Iain Dowie as his assistant.
_	Mumm-Ra later had the Mutants release them on the condition that they work for him to battle the ThunderCats.
_	He approaches Dharamdas and arranges their marriage on the condition that Shekhar move in with his family, to which Dharamdas and Shekhar agree.
_	In 1974, after he had served less than five years of his 12-year sentence at Federal Correctional Institution in Petersburg, Virginia, the United States federal government released him on the condition that he help the federal authorities, without pay, to investigate crimes committed by fraud and scam artists, and sign in once a week.
_	The Eighth Doctor faces the Daleks again in "Legacy of the Daleks" (1998), when he returns to Earth in the aftermath of the Dalek Invasion, although in this case the Daleks are basic versions who have been reactivated by the Master (whom the Doctor unintentionally confronts out of sequence), the novel concluding with the Daleks being destroyed and the Master being left in the condition that he was seen in during "The Deadly Assassin".
_	Badoglio's successor in the field, Marshal Rodolfo Graziani (known as 'The Butcher of Fezzan'), accepted the commission from Mussolini on the condition that he be allowed to crush the Libyan resistance unencumbered by the restraints of either Italian or international law.
_	In 1926 Otto Schreier would generalize this result by removing the condition that the free group be finitely generated; this result is now known as the Nielsen–Schreier theorem.
_	Therefore, the quadrilateral has largest area when the three factors in the area formula are individually maximized, with "p" = "q" = 1 and sin("θ") = 1. The condition that "p" = "q" means that the quadrilateral is an equidiagonal quadrilateral (its diagonals have equal length), and the condition that sin("θ") = 1 means that it is an orthodiagonal quadrilateral (its diagonals cross at right angles).
_	His employment by Ephron Vestrit was on the condition that he was able to control those habits.
_	The then Governor of Rosario interceded in the dispute, giving the land to both clubs, under the condition that they had to merge into one.
_	Vincent agrees to enter the Nightmare of his own will and climb the final tower on the condition that all men would be freed if he succeeds.
_	On 13 July 1956, she was sold to Companhia Nacional de Navegacao Costerira, Patrimonio Nacional, of Brazil, for $693,682, under the condition that she be used for coastal shipping.
_	The military government appointed Zinsou to the position, but he accepted only on the condition that a referendum regarding his appointment be held.
_	This is equivalent to the condition that formula_26.
_	Since the formula_27 is the speed of a shallow gravity wave, the condition that formula_28 is equivalent to stating that the initial velocity represents supercritical flow (Froude number > 1) while the final velocity represents subcritical flow (Froude number < 1).
_	Following King Gyanendra's suspension of Parliament and government takeover during the Nepalese Civil War, mass protests led to him to re-instate Parliament and end the war fought by the government against the Communist Party of Nepal (Maoist), on the condition that the constitution would be re-written.
_	The funding was accepted by the agency on the condition that Hell Pizza's executives, staff and managers do sexual violence awareness and bystander intervention training provided by the Sexual Abuse Prevention Network.
_	After a thorough review by the U.S. FDA in 1999 and 2000, the agency released a guidance document for reprocessed SUDs that began regulating the sale of these reprocessed devices on the market, under the condition that third-party reprocessors would be treated as the manufacturer and would meet the same criteria as the original equipment manufacturers (OEMs) of the medical device.
_	He ordered the release of Vaikundar immediately upon the condition that he would restrict his activities and preaching only to his caste.
_	The contract was worth $1.4 million with $550,000 guaranteed on the condition that he made the Rams 53-man roster.
_	When the employers offered to arbitrate, but only on the condition that the union agree to the open shop, the union struck every West Coast port on May 9, 1934.
_	`In 1956, Laurance Rockefeller's Jackson Hole Preserve donated its extensive lands on the island to the United States' National Park Service, under the condition that the lands had to be protected from future development.
_	She eventually agrees on the condition that he drop his evil ways, and the two begin earning money through recycling.
_	The search for the first head coach saw the team court then-Northwestern University head coach Ara Parseghian, who, according to "Minneapolis Star" writer Jim Klobuchar—the Vikings' first beat reporter for that newspaper—visited team management in the Twin Cities under the condition that his visit was to be kept secret from his current employer.
_	As the difference between the two concepts is currently becoming less clear, law professor Allison Christians deplores the condition that morality is being cited as a criterion instead of the rule of law.
_	Agni swears to protect his kingdom on the condition that the king should sanctify pleasure out of pure love a legitimate action in his kingdom.
_	However, with the divorce of Rizvi and Noor Jehan in 1955, Noor Jehan had to write off her share of the Shahnoor Studios to Shaukat Hussain Rizvi in the divorce court, to get the custody of her daughter, Zile Huma and also agree to the condition that she would not shoot films in this studio again.
_	His manager Stikkan responded enthusiastically to Ted's song, with the condition that Ted should speed up the arrangement of the song for the Eurovision Song Contest.
_	At a meeting in Tangiers in early 1293, Abu Yaqub agreed to assist Muhammad II recover Tarifa from Castile, but on the condition that Tarifa would be turned over to Marinids, in return for which the Marinids transfer their claims to Algeciras and Ronda to Granada.
_	Lara agrees to help them, with the condition that they release her old flame Terry Sheridan (Gerard Butler), who is familiar with Chen Lo's criminal operation.
_	In 1996 Missanabie Cree First Nation received a letter from Canada accepting the claim, with the condition that Ontario, also a signatory to Treaty 9, be at the table.
_	A forest diagram is one where all the internal lines have momentum that is completely determined by the external lines and the condition that the incoming and outgoing momentum are equal at each vertex.
_	In 1996, the U.S. Navy was considering reclaiming the vessel and placing it in the care of the Carnegie Institute with the intention of moving the ship to Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, on the condition that a metallurgical analysis found that the hull was in sufficient condition to be re-floated.
_	The Marshall–Lerner condition (after Alfred Marshall and Abba P. Lerner) is the condition that an exchange rate devaluation or depreciation will only cause a balance of trade improvement if the absolute sum of the long-term export and import demand elasticities is greater than unity.
_	He never joined the party and only agreed on the condition that the Navy's size be maintained and that he not be expected to attend any cabinet meetings of a political nature.
_	The bid that was submitted to the NLL was approved on the condition that an arena lease is obtained and 2,500 season tickets are sold.
_	In 1925 Charles bought Preston Manor from his wife's trustees and made provision in his will that, subject to the respective life interests of himself and Ellen, Preston Manor and four acres of adjoining land should pass to Brighton Corporation by deed of gift on the condition that it be preserved in its historic condition and be used as a museum with exhibits relevant to Brighton and Sussex.
_	In 1886, Dorcas Chapin, the widow of Chester W. Chapin, bequeathed $25,000 of her husband's will to Springfield Hospital on the condition that an equal sum be raised.
_	After repeatedly seeking to have Irwin fired, he offered his resignation from the team late in the season on the condition that he still was to receive his 1915 salary.
_	The duo released "Club Can't Handle Me" in 2010 under the condition that Rida would collaborate on a song for Guetta's fifth album "Nothing but the Beat".
_	Fury secured Marie's release on the condition that she joined his new team of Ultimates, which led to S.H.I.E.L.D. scientists granting her superhuman abilities.
_	The city surrendered on the condition that it would not be sacked, and when the fighting stopped, the soldiers were turned lose.
_	Katurian calls to the detectives, announcing his intention to confess to the crimes on the condition that his stories are preserved.
_	It is believed that her deformity was not a cause of the condition that led to the decision to euthanize her.
_	...that the strikers return to work at once as a body, upon the condition that they be restored to their former positions, or, in the event of failure, to call a general strike.
_	The agreement for Nine to air the American series included the condition that they must produce their own local Australian edition of "Survivor".
_	It allowed the King of Portugal to benefit from a certain portion of the ecclesiastical revenues of his kingdom, and it carried the condition that he should send good missionaries to his new subjects, and that he should provide with a fitting endowment the dioceses, parishes and religious establishments established in his acquired territories.
_	This estimate however is subject to the condition that the Standard Model is all there is, and no physics beyond the Standard Model come into play at these energy levels.
_	These lists would be independent in the first round, but would support (or merge) with a Socialist-led list in the runoff on the condition that the centrist MoDem doesn't do likewise.
_	A prerequisite requirement for the enforcement of a contract, amongst other things, is the condition that the parties to the contract accept the terms of the claimed contract.
_	The ground on Paulista Avenue had been donated to the City Hall with the condition that the view to the downtown area and the valley of the Nove de Julho Avenue be preserved.
_	The charges were later dropped on the condition that Slater keep out of trouble for six months.
_	She received this title and fief "suo jure" on the condition that she made the King's illegitimate son, Christian Gyldenløve, her heir.
_	On July 7, Judge Gregory C. Flynn released Remy on a $500 bail, paid by his mother, Phoebe Remy, on the condition that move back into his parents' home and observe a curfew keeping him indoors from 6 p.m. to 6 a.m. while awaiting trial.
_	Press and camera crews were allowed to enter the church at the permission of the family, under the condition that no details of the eulogy be released in public.
_	Upon graduating high school, billionaire PayPal co-founder and investor Peter Thiel awarded LeGate—then aged 18—with a Thiel Fellowship, a US$100,000 grant given annually to around 20 people under 20 years of age on the condition that they drop out of school in order to pursue an entrepreneurial path.
_	Seabury was consecrated in Aberdeen on November 14, 1784 on the condition that he study the Scottish rite of Holy Communion and work for its adoption, rather than the English rite of 1662.
_	Miller, whose first stint as writer had brought "Daredevil" from the brink of cancellation to the top-sellers lists, agreed under the condition that artist David Mazzucchelli would work from full scripts.
_	The court decided in the magazine's favor, ruling that journalists are entitled to legal immunity on the condition that their stories are based on a reasonably believable source, rather than hearsay or fabrication.
_	The condition "ad" − "bc" ≠ 0 is equivalent to the condition that the determinant of above matrix be nonzero, i.e. that the matrix be invertible.
_	Jones was granted immortality on the condition that he could return to shore once every ten years.
_	On 5 February 1959 Sendwe brought the BALUBAKAT into Tshombe's Confédération des associations tribales du Katanga (CONAKAT) party on the condition that it be able to maintain a significant amount of autonomy.
_	In July 2009 and November 2010, La Familia Michoacana offered to retreat and even disband their cartel, "with the condition that both the Federal Government, and State and Federal Police commit to safeguarding the security of the state of Michoacán."
_	A king sent his twelve sons out to find brides, laying on them the condition that their brides could spin, weave, and sew a shirt in a day, and giving them each a mail coat and a horse.
_	During this talk, the Latinos and Italians renew their alliance on the condition that the Italians kill Redding.
_	In an attempt to deal with the food crisis, Phillip in 1789 granted a convict named James Ruse the land of Experiment Farm at Parramatta on the condition that he develop a viable agriculture.
_	The Sisters were approved to raise funds with the condition that any money raised would go towards opening a hospital in Oklahoma City since the newly established and rapidly growing Oklahoma Territory did not have a hospital and its citizens were dying from lack of care.
_	He agreed, but under the condition that he could list the car's faults as well as its positives.
_	Intuitively, the condition that "U" be simply connected means that "U" does not contain any “holes”.
_	Though his family was quite poor, Woodcock's grandfather offered to pay his tuition if he went to Cambridge University which he turned down due to the condition that he undertake seminary training for the Anglican clergy.
_	Formally, it is the set of portfolios which satisfy the condition that no other portfolio exists with a higher expected return but with the same standard deviation of return.
_	At all events Sir Gerard Moore got the Abbey lands, “the church, cemetery, 5 cottages and 2 gardens in the town of Gallen, 40 acres of arable land, 30 of pasture, wood, and underwood in Gallen, with tithes and alterages of the rectories and vicarages, etc., on the condition that he paid an annual rent of £3-12-2, and maintained a horseman forever on the same.”
_	However, Bracelin continued to allow the coven to meet at the Witches' cottage, on the condition that they paid rent on the plot of land upon which it was situated.
_	According to tradition, Jesse Kirk, Kirksville's first postmaster, shared a dinner of turkey and whiskey with surveyors working in the area on the condition that they would name the town after him.
_	Gabriel and Rutherford decided they would continue; Banks agreed on the condition that they find a new drummer that was of equal stature to the rest of the group.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province did not exceed two times that of any other.
_	Eight years later, he donated one hundred "aranzadas" of hillsides to Don Romero Díaz with the condition that in the space of one year, he would clear this land and plant it with vineyards.
_	Another March 14 MP Boutros Harb said that he does support Suleiman’s call to hold a national dialogue but on the condition that it addresses the issue of non-state arms, in reference to Hezbollah's arsenal.
_	In an interview with W in June 2013 it was made known that the song was inspired by a 'diss' from a major fashion designer during Paris Fashion Week, where West was informed that he’d be invited to a widely anticipated runway show only on the condition that he agree not to attend any other shows.
_	After landing a job at the prestigious "Vivant" she learns some stunning news from her editor: actress Evelyn Hugo, who became famous in the 1960s, has agreed to an interview with "Vivant" under the condition that Monique is the one to do the interview.
_	His wife and daughters subdivided the farm property, which they continued to live on, and leased the mill to an Isaac Merritt and Charles Frost in 1845, on the condition that the two built a cotton mill and housing at their own expense within a decade.
_	She ultimately helps Ahsoka escape on the condition that she would be exonerated.
_	A meeting of the Senate, on the 10 December, voted for the St Lucia site on the condition that the city council provided access.
_	In the following 3 months some 2000–2500 of them died in the concentration camps, the rest were released under the condition that they leave Germany.
_	At elimination, the unsafe contestants were Fred, Lara-Kristin, Saskia, Sophie and Laura Penelope, who was originally safe from elimination but landed in the bottom for refusing to have her dreadlocks cut, and was given the choice of staying in the competition on the condition that she allow her dreadlocks to be cut, or going home.
_	At the end of that period, Kermoulés promised to hand Brest castle over to the besiegers' if no other help reached its defenders by then and under the condition that the place could not be re-supplied.
_	Almost a year has passed since the trip to Romania, and Judy decides to take Vlad to school with her one-day, under the condition that he stay silent.
_	However it was not until 1892 that the Council was formally vested with the title to the land, on the condition that the whole area remain a recreation ground and be used for no other purpose.
_	Kamata agrees to the challenge, but on the condition that the race take place on DK's mountain.
_	The sale of the Corus Québec stations to Cogeco has been approved by the CRTC on December 17, 2010, on the condition that Cogeco-owned CJEC-FM and Corus-owned CFEL-FM and CKOY-FM (since re-called CJTS-FM) be sold to another party by December 2011.
_	The committee, notably Rustin, agreed to move the site on the condition that Reuther pay for a $19,000 sound system so that everyone on the National Mall could hear the speakers and musicians.
_	His father provided £5,000 – but with the condition that Conway and Hughenden were first sold.
_	Desperate, Joe convinces his wife of the merits of moving to the United States and she agrees to the move on the condition that they have a house in the country as well as their original apartment in New York City.
_	In the aftermath of the events, she wrote an essay titled "Why Me?", which was published in 1992 by "Esquire" on the condition that "there be no cover lines, no publicity and no photos".
_	The Charter Schools admitted only Catholics, under the condition that they be educated as Protestants.
_	Prince William was set free, on the condition that he had to surrender the fortresses of Megali Maina, Mystras, Geronthrae and Monemvasia, as well as surrender hostages including Lady Margaret, Baroness of Passavas.
_	Iron Fist offers to train Power Man, and the latter accepts his offer on the condition that his mother is taken care of.
_	Brown stated he agreed under the condition that the song would only be an album cut and not a single as he still had hopes of releasing the song as a radio single himself.
_	After meeting his muse Eurydice somewhere between life and death he regains his humility and is allowed to return to the land of the living, on the condition that he does not look back.
_	The company proposed to donate the house to the local chapter of the Daughters of the American Revolution on the condition that funds were raised for its restoration.
_	He only agrees to date her, on the condition that his friendship with Laura remain intact.
_	Such a relationship between the non-parent life partner and the child may be continued if the parent-partner dies (under the condition that the other parent has also died), is considered unknown, or has lost their parental responsibilities due to child abuse.
_	However, the non-parent life partner can also ask for the establishment of partner-guardianship while the parent-partner is alive under the condition that the other parent is considered unknown or has lost parental responsibilities due to child abuse.
_	Orange only decided to support the idea on the condition that the Council would budget spending $500,000 for an Emancipation Day parade at the Lincoln Theatre, of which Orange in on the board of directors.
_	The trustees sought out Cox to argue the case in the Supreme Court, Cox who had already prepared a brief on the issue in the "DeFunis" case, agreed to take the case on the condition that other lawyers take primary responsibility for preparing the brief, something highly unusual for Cox who normally carefully supervised and revised anything that went to the Court under his name, but necessary because of the work involved on the Massachusetts court reform committee
_	After the surprising success of the band's 1996 album "Regretfully Yours", they were given more financial support from their recording label Elektra Records, on the condition that they created more radio-friendly songs.
_	Those left-libertarians who support private property do so under the condition that recompense is offered to the local community.
_	The Ottoman garrison of the fortress capitulated on the condition that they were allowed to freely leave for the Ottoman Empire.
_	This is equivalent to the condition that "A" is a tree and that for every edge "e" = ["u", "z"] of "A" (with "o"("e") = "u", "t"("e") = "z") such that "u" is closer to "v" than "z" we have ["A" : ω("A")] = 1, that is "A" = ω("A").
_	The length of the period of the transition path to a sustainable situation is only limited by the condition that vital environmental functions must not be irreparably damaged.
_	On 16 November 1992, Bergen City Council voted to allow the tunnel, under the condition that the tunnel project financed a new football field.
_	He was released in 1221 on the condition that the couple separate and that Bouchard get absolution from the pope.
_	Robertson talks about Hudson joining the band on the condition that the other members pay him $10 a week each for music lessons.
_	Pahor stated that he will "study the French suggestion for a compromise, but only under the condition that the documents which were prepared by Croatia for the accession negotiations don't prejudge the state border and that both the European Commission and the Council of EU understand that stance".
_	As a result, in June AD 4, Augustus adopted Tiberius on the condition that Tiberius first adopt Germanicus.
_	By the rank–nullity theorem, this is equivalent to the condition that the left and equivalently right radicals be trivial.
_	One problem was that the rule made no exceptions for cases where it was obviously intended for the third party to claim a benefit, such as the young couple in "Tweddle v Atkinson", or the widow in "Beswick v Beswick", where an uncle gave his nephew a business, on the condition that the nephew would pay the uncle a certain amount per week, and in the event of the uncle's death, give a lesser amount to his widow.
_	Finally she agrees to tell him the whole story, under the condition that he never publishes his story—unless she dies.
_	The lyric concerns a man's entreaties to his girlfriend's young siblings not to reveal his courtship of their elder sister and to leave them alone, at some points, even bribing them with things like "candy and a quarter" and "a movie", on the condition that they "keep a secret".
_	One of his uncles who had fled to the U.S. in the 1960s offered to arrange the family's boatlift to Florida — on the condition that all or none of the family go.
_	Blood agreed on the condition that Churchill be assigned as a journalist; to ensure this, he gained accreditation from "The Pioneer" and "The Daily Telegraph", for whom he wrote regular updates.
_	Protestors at Brightlingsea found themselves being bailed on the condition that they did not attend any live export protests or related meetings.
_	A deal was struck under the condition that the team would change their name to Bridlington Town AFC, essentially bringing the old club back to the town.
_	When Eddard Stark arrives to lift the siege, Stannis knights Davos as reward for his aid, but also insists that Davos have four fingers removed as punishment for his years of illegal smuggling; Davos agrees, on the condition that Stannis removes the fingers himself.
_	He offered D'Oliveira work as a coach for the SASF on an annual salary of £4,000—a vast sum for a professional cricketer at the time—on the condition that he took up this role immediately at the end of the 1968 season, and thereby made himself unavailable for the MCC tour before selection took place.
_	The Chairman will only grant Joe's request on the condition that he meets his challenge - coaching the reservation's struggling high school lacrosse team, which competes against the better equipped and better trained players of the Prep School league.
_	Among its provisions was the transfer of the lands around the lake from the Onondaga Nation to local salt producers on the condition that the salt would be produced for the common use of everyone.
_	Matlock agreed on the condition that he was paid beforehand.
_	In 1880 he was given the original farmhouse estate of Headley Court, formerly the main manor of the village, and its remaining , by his father, on the condition that he would make a career in banking rather than become a farmer.
_	The $50,000 grant was on the condition that the citizens of Lincoln would raise $25,000 towards the new building project.
_	The Heritage Lottery Fund was willing to put up £1,750,000 for the complete restoration of the Dome but only on the condition that the trust raised £500,000 itself first to demonstrate sufficient local interest to make the project worthwhile.
_	Orphaned Sanjeev lives with his comically parsimonious paternal uncle, Maniram, who offers to look after him on the condition that a contested Last Will and Testament, will benefit him.
_	The Union fishermen returned to work under the condition that halibut prices increase to one and a quarter cents per pound of halibut, exceptionally close to their original request of one and a half cents per pound.
_	Tongafusifonua allowed him to take the fishhook, under the condition that he could find it in his collection of countless hooks.
_	Julian arranges for Miguel to be released from prison on the condition that Kay end her relationship with Miguel, but Kay is unable to honor her end of the bargain.
_	The next morning Richard grudgingly sends Harris and Jill to the top of the hill to call the bus driver back, on the condition that the rest participate in a team-building game of paintball.
_	These men were then taken to compounds outside of Kirkuk, where they were endured brutal conditions including torture, and were held until mid April whereupon most were released, although on the condition that they could not return to Kirkuk.
_	Stepanyan accepted the position on the condition that he will be able to leave the public office as soon as the country adopted a new Constitution which would become the basis of the legal system of the independent Republic.
_	Previously Thomas Derrick had been convicted of rape but was pardoned by the Earl of Essex himself (clearing him of the death penalty) on the condition that he became an executioner at Tyburn.
_	In 1892 she received permission from the General Secretary of Public Instruction to register officially as a female student in order to attend classes on the condition that her presence not distract male students.
_	On the condition that it would be used for public markets, they gave the government a small, oblong, strip of land (that had made up part of the formal gardens), which was first named "New Market Place" and from 1847 became known as Place Jacques-Cartier.
_	Dropping instead the condition that multiplication is commutative leads to the concept of a "division ring" or "skew field".
_	The IBA imposed the condition that for the 1980 franchise round a company could only own one franchise, although it could earn up to 30 percent of another.
_	This includes entrusted to the tribe in 2007 by the State and Federal governments as part of the New Carissa oil spill settlement, on the condition that the Siletz Tribe will manage it solely as a marbled murrelet habitat.
_	This was granted on the condition that there was to be no impropriety or violence when electing an abbot, and that those who donated money to the abbey could be buried within it, regardless of whether they had been excommunicated.
_	Just two weeks later, Sleževičius was asked to lead the government again, which he accepted only on the condition that the Council of Lithuania elected a president to replace it as the collegial head of state.
_	Following these arguments, the Court found that according to Article 2 of the Directive sounds may constitute a trademark, on the condition that they may also be represented graphically.
_	Quack left his legacy to the municipality of Nijmegen under the condition that a fountain, the Marie Adolphron named after his sister, would be erected.
_	The prince agrees, on the condition that his bronze ring be found and returned to him.
_	Joseph offers the Deputy the option of walking away with their friends unharmed on the condition that they leave him and Eden's Gate alone.
_	He accepted the honour only on the condition that he be allowed to curate a show of contemporary sculpture which resulted in a groundbreaking survey of some of the period's most exciting sculptors.
_	In 2010, he took part in the tripartite negotiations with Cuban President Raúl Castro and Roman Catholic bishop Jaime Ortega that resulted in pardons being granted to 52 Black Spring prisoners on the condition that they go into exile in Spain.
_	Permission was given since driving is not deemed a contact sport, and on the condition that Seddigh would confirm to dress-codes.
_	Jennings okayed the project on the condition that a couple of Glaser tracks be included.
_	The 1949 London Declaration ended this, allowing republican and indigenous monarchic members on the condition that they recognised the British monarch as the "Head of the Commonwealth".
_	MGM president John Symes greenlit the project on the condition that Wright and Glassner worked together as executive producers of the new show.
_	For sufficiently smooth functions on the real line, the Legendre transform of a function can be specified, up to an additive constant, by the condition that the functions' first derivatives are inverse functions of each other.
_	Her parents go back to Rahul to talk about marriage once again but to their shock he only agrees to marry her on the condition that he will divorce her in two days.
_	He approached Sir Richard Branson to be the project champion who agreed, on the condition that other record companies chipped in.
_	At the end of 2261, the Earth Alliance entered the Interstellar Alliance, whose purpose was to promote peace, prosperity and understanding among all the member worlds, on the condition that every race agreed and accepted the Interstellar Alliance code of conduct.
_	Between September 2003 and April 2004, the RIAA, through its Clean Slate Program, offered individual file sharers amnesty for past infringements, "on the condition that they refrain from future infringement," and delete the infringing material.
_	Departure from the town was only possible on the condition that property was renounced and transferred to the "Serbian District of Zvornik".
_	The head of the group employs Karharias to kill an Englishman, but on the condition that he "do it dead".
_	Sethi claimed that the league had signed foreign players with the condition that if their team reached the final that they would have to travel to Lahore, although this claim was rebutted by agents whose clients had agreed that they would only travel to play the final in Pakistan if the security advice prior to the final was favourable and who could not be forced to travel.
_	Dennis also imposes the condition that Aimée be placed in the casket rocket headed for space instead of the ex-astronaut, whose body is relinquished to the pet crematorium.
_	For instance, the condition that a graph does not have any isolated vertices may be expressed by the sentence
_	During the 2008 Rajasthan Assembly elections, the group supported the Indian National Congress on the condition that the party would give a specified number of tickets to Rajput candidates.
_	Eventually, Sophie decided to let Gwen and Will adopt the baby, on the condition that Sophie be a part of her life.
_	Moog Music allowed use of the name for the band on the condition that they precede it with "The".
_	Seven years after becoming involved with the club, Walker bought La Hague Manor for £1.2 million, leasing it back to St George's Preparatory School on the condition that part of the site was developed into a new stadium for the club.
_	Cutter becomes touched by her change of heart and drops his scam against Rex, and lets her go to Brazil on the condition that he can come along with her on the trip.
_	They were later released unharmed on the condition that they pay court costs and leave the area within ten days.
_	W.D. Hamilton gave the following basic explanation in his 1967 paper on "Extraordinary sex ratios", given the condition that males and females cost equal amounts to produce:
_	Eventually, when Kō asked him to draw for her, he told her he would, on the condition that she became his girlfriend.
_	The uncle will leave Brewster 7 million dollars, but only under the condition that he keeps none of the grandfather's money.
_	After a dispute, Hamburg decided to release him under the condition that he returned after Belgium's first two group games.
_	Knorr agreed to let her go under the condition that Suesan allow her to remove the bullet from her back so it could not be used as evidence in the event that Suesan reported the abuse.
_	She initially refused, but after further pressure, she accepted on the condition that she be allowed to work independently.
_	A few days later, Jay Z spoke out again stating that his deal with Barneys would continue as planned, with the condition that he be placed in a leadership role on a committee specifically organized to deal with racial profiling in the store.
_	Under the new policy, the Japanese community was allowed to practice its traditions, culture, and religion relatively unharassed by the government, planters, and Americanizing Christian organizations, on the condition that they did not interfere with the white community.
_	However, a further vote a week later reinstated all three officials, on the condition that they put themselves up for periodic elections.
_	The efforts seemed to be on the brink of failure when Evans was able to persuade Congress to grant "the company" 900,000 acres (3,600 km²) of land on the condition that the company build a line connecting the Union Pacific line with the existing Kansas Pacific line, which then extended only as far west as central Kansas.
_	Note that in the theorem stated here, we have imposed the condition that if formula_2 is not defined on a bounded domain, then formula_2 shall decay faster than formula_14.
_	Rowling allowed Cuarón to make minor changes to the book, on the condition that he stuck to the book's spirit.
_	However, both were granted pensions on the condition that they were to be available if they were needed.
_	They were even allowed to wear the "Yajnopavita" (sacred thread) and other caste markings by special dispensation of Pope Gregory XV in 1623, on the condition that these were blessed by a Catholic priest.
_	Incentives are provided on the condition that throughout the ten-year period the dwelling is rented at 20 per cent below the market rate to eligible low and moderate income households.
_	According to their traditions, the community were Brahmins who converted to Islam on the condition that they would remain the genealogists of the Brahmin.
_	During the Red River Rebellion Bannatyne agreed to serve as postmaster in the Louis Riel's Provisional Government of Red River Settlement in 1869 on the condition that the rebel government seek terms with the Dominion of Canada.
_	Raza Khan was appointed as the vice chairman of the Handloom Corporation on the condition that the Samajwadi Party would reconsider their candidates fielded in Moradabad and Bareilly for the 2014 Indian general election.
_	It is often claimed that the building of Stockport’s railway viaduct was on the condition that any passenger train using the structure is required to stop at Stockport station.
_	In 1953, the Forest Service gave McCoy the permit on the condition that he develop the mountain as a ski resort.
_	He offers to spare his former instructor on the condition that he returns to Shaolin for the remainder of his life.
_	On 5 June 1181 the three brothers Fernando, Juan and Pedro and Suero Meléndez granted an estate they had inherited at Gema to their sister on the condition that after her death it would fall to the Order of Fontevrault and a convent be established there.
_	Some scholarly definitions of it include: “Agreement for association on the condition that the capital and its benefit be common between two or more persons”, (Mecelle) “An agreement between two or more persons to carry out a particular business with the view of sharing profits by joint investment” (Ibn Arfa), , “A contract between two persons who launch a business of financial enterprise to make profit” (Muhammad Akram Khan).
_	After much persuasion from Vicky, Maggie's father agrees to let Vicky marry Maggie on the condition that he should stay in his house for 4 days for Maggie's sister's wedding and if Vicky manages to win over at least 2 relatives of Maggie, he can marry her and he would get a business in India else he should forget Maggie and leave the contract.
_	But Vicky changes the condition that if at least 1 relative of Maggie does not get convinced that Vicky is the correct match for Maggie then he would forget Maggie and leave the contract, else he would marry Maggie and does not leave the contract.
_	Due to the events of the Second Battle of Yeonpyeong, South Korea demands the names, location, and rank of 30 North Korean spies active in South Korea, promising financial aid to the North on the condition that Pyongyang turns in their spies.
_	At Lee's request, Grant also allowed them to keep their horses, all on the condition that they would not take up arms against the United States.
_	Feeling manipulated, Katniss eventually agrees to act as "the Mockingjay" — the symbol of the rebellion — but only on the condition that District 13's President Alma Coin grant immunity to all of the surviving Hunger Games tributes, including Katniss's friend Peeta Mellark and Finnick's lover Annie Cresta.
_	Desmond reportedly owned a Baldwin grand piano, which he lent to Bradley Cunningham, owner of Bradley's piano bar in Greenwich Village, with the condition that Cunningham had to move the large piano back to Desmond's Upper West Side apartment to become part of Desmond's estate.
_	Hassan al-Turabi allowed bin Laden to live in Sudan on the condition that he would invest in Sudan.
_	The king was surprised by this demand, since shortly before Châtillon had requested the dispatch of the Regiments of Jean de Gassion and Henri de La Ferté-Senneterre with the condition that he would not ask for more reinforcements, but La Force was eventually ordered by Louis' ministers to move towards Châtillon to support him, and quartered his troops at Zutkerque.
_	Gordon was allowed to run the operation as a junior partner while Greenberg, in order not to be cut out entirely, was allowed to take part in the deal under the condition that he mortgage all his personal property to Rothstein and take out an expensive life insurance policy with Rothstein's insurance company.
_	Whitney begs Clayton to keep the engagement a secret and he acquiesces on the condition that she break off the engagement with Paul.
_	The sale was subject to the condition that Morven would be given to the state of New Jersey within two years of Edge's death.
_	In September 1644 (after 18 months' imprisonment), Styles was exchanged for Captain Henry Fines (alias Clinton), on the condition that Styles was to travel to Peterborough and from there to Belvoir Castle.
_	In 1985 the derelict station was sold for £50,000 to Anthony and Valerie Charrington, a commercial property surveyor and professional singer, who obtained planning permission to convert the property into a two-bedroom dwelling subject to the condition that no swimming pool could be constructed in the gap between the platforms.
_	The gift was made on the condition that the collection was to be housed in a building 16 miles (26 km) from the centre of Glasgow, to show the works to their greatest advantage, and to avoid the damaging effects of air pollution at the time.
_	Coetsee organised negotiations between Mandela and a team of four government figures starting in May 1988; the team agreed to the release of political prisoners and the legalisation of the ANC on the condition that they permanently renounce violence, break links with the Communist Party, and not insist on majority rule.
_	He eventually learned that the fabled Krakatooth Nut can cure her, on the condition that it is cracked open in the teeth of a young man who has never worn boots.
_	The surfaces are constrained by the condition that the sample excess kurtosis must be bounded by the sample squared skewness as stipulated in the above equation.
_	Pride Week's decision to reverse the ban on QuAIA after it had received funding from the city (which was done on the condition that QuAIA not be allowed to participate) drew sharp criticism from several sources.
_	She wonders whether they are "making the same mistake", but decides to give him another chance on the condition that he promises never to break her heart again.
_	Prime finally surrendered to the Wreckers on the condition that Outback receive medical treatment - this selfless act convinced Emirate Xaaron of Optimus Prime's true identity.
_	In 1990, Demetre sold the land to the City of Charleston for $500,000 to cover transactional and legal fees and donated the appraised value of the land ($3.6 million) on the condition that it be converted into a park with certain agreed upon amenities within ten years and that the park be dedicated to Demetre.
_	As this couple were unable to have a child and young Pierre’s father was worried about his son’s future, he accepted that the couple bring up his son, on the condition that he continues to be a good Muslim.
_	He attempts to get the goose to play with him, but she declines on the condition that she has to hatch her eggs.
_	Malbim was freed through the intervention of Sir Moses Montefiore, but it was upon the condition that he leave Romania.
_	His wife, Lady Annie Lawley, reputedly agreed to the naming of what was then primarily bushland in her husband's name on the condition that no licensed hotels be built in the suburb.
_	As part of a settlement agreement Bandler granted to Grinder a limited 10-year license to conduct NLP seminars, offer certification in NLP and use the NLP name on the condition that royalties from the earnings of the seminars be paid to Bandler.
_	Ferdinand Max ultimately agreed to a reshuffling of the roles he held within the Imperial Austrian Navy on the condition that a naval ministry would be formed to preserve the achievements he had made over the past half-decade.
_	After Urbano returns, Victoria says she'll buy the agency on the condition that the ownership is transferred over to Marielena.
_	This is equivalent to the condition that the preimages of the closed sets (which are the complements of the open subsets) in "Y" are closed in "X".
_	In 1881, Welsh donated right-of-way and a section house to the Southern Pacific Railroad on the condition that trains stop in the town.
_	The village of Torrelobatón soon capitulated to the king's troops, with Alfonso XI imposing the condition that they never return to power of Juan Núñez de Lara.
_	She moved out of the property supposedly on the condition that she could still arrange events at the castle.
_	The BBC eventually relented, but only on the condition that colour film stock was used, as it gave the best picture quality for the format.
_	The following month, November 1975, Ford changed his stance and asked Congress to approve federal loans to New York City, upon the condition that the city agree to more austere budgets imposed by Washington, D.C. In December 1975, Ford signed a bill providing New York City with access to $2.3 billion in loans.
_	The sale of the Corus Québec stations was approved by the CRTC on December 17, 2010, on the condition that Cogeco-owned CJEC-FM and Corus-owned CFEL-FM and CKOY-FM be sold to another party by December 2011.
_	This can be treated as the condition that formula_16 has already been used to encode formula_7, while we intend to use formula_18 to encode formula_6.
_	The Delhi High Court suspended the enactment of the University sanctions on the condition that the students end their strike.
_	The students returned the next day on the condition that School Committee hold a public hearing on Butterworth's resignation.
_	After several successful missions, the Wild Pack was hired by Mr. Tolliver, an arms dealer, under the condition that they changed their name; agents from Silver Sable had let them know that the name "Wild Pack" was taken.
_	In 1335, when King Magnus appointed Nils Abjörnsson (Sparre av Tofta) to drots, the condition that Euphemia would act as his adviser was included in his appointment.
_	Hanuman agrees, on the condition that he remain with her for only a month.
_	Kuno's test is subject to the condition that "n" ≥ ("b" − 1) / "D"
_	If one imposes the condition that the unstable and stable manifolds of the critical points intersect transversely, then the gradient vector field and the corresponding smooth flow form a Morse–Smale system.
_	The property on which the courthouse was to be built was deeded to the county on the condition that Richmond would remain the county seat.
_	Buharism rejected the dominant approach of the Washington Consensus, rather holding that for a crisis-wracked country to successfully improve its balance of payments through devaluation, there must first exist the condition that the price of every country's export is denominated in its own currency.
_	Soon after the release of "The Holy Mountain", Jodorowsky gave a talk at the Teatro Julio Castillo, University of Mexico on the subject of koans (despite the fact that he initially had been booked on the condition that his talk would be about cinematography), at which Ejo Takata appeared.
_	The saint agreed on the condition that Raja Ganesha's son Jadu would convert to Islam and rule in his place.
_	Aurelian besieged Palmyra in the summer of 272, and tried to negotiate with Zenobia, on the condition that she surrender herself in person to him, to which she answered with refusal.
_	The maker of Wrigley's chewing gum, William Wrigley Jr.'s, substantial home was offered to the city of Pasadena after Mrs. Wrigley's death in 1958, under the condition that their home would be the Rose Parade's permanent headquarters.
_	Ebenezer offers to exchange places with Tayhoe, and this plan is accepted by Smith on the condition that Ebenezer marries Susan Warren.
_	Sentenced to an $1000 fine and a year in prison, he was pardoned by the President, Calvin Coolidge, in December 1923, on the condition that the fine be paid.
_	By this time, the Egyptian political echelon had agreed to negotiate armistice with the Israelis, on the condition that Israel withdraws its forces.
_	He offered to manage Michael Barratt on the condition that he left the Rebels and, secondly, find a new stage name.
_	According to one account (but not mentioned by Brooke) Brooke suddenly relented and agreed to mount the expedition on the condition that the navy could take the fleet into Trondheim Fjord in support, but the elderly Pound merely shook his head and ended the discussion.
_	If the topological space "T" is also a topological vector space, then the condition that formula_36 be dense in "T" can be replaced by the weaker condition that the linear span of this set be dense in "T", in which case we say that this set is total in "T".
_	Montgomery County approved the zoning exception on the condition that the developer only constructed entrances and exits on Viers Mill Road and Kensington-Wheaton Road.
_	Napoleon was offered to keep the throne in February 1814, on the condition that France return to its 1792 frontiers, but he refused.
_	British galleries were unable to raise enough money to buy it (the National Gallery and National Galleries of Scotland already being committed to an expensive deal to buy "Diana and Actaeon" and "Diana and Callisto", both by Titian), but another anonymous collector was allowed to acquire it on the condition that it be displayed to the public for three months each year.
_	The governor agrees on the condition that Carcetti face public humiliation by publicly admitting to eliciting his aid.
_	When an old enemy of the deceased J.D. Hogg, Ezra Bushmaster, arrives in Hazzard, he donates a significant amount of money to the hospital fund, on the condition that the people of Hazzard are able to raise the rest by a certain amount of time.
_	In 1919, the federal government passed the Canada Highways Act, which provided $20,000,000 to provinces under the condition that they establish an official highway network; up to 40% of construction costs would be subsidized.
_	He was given a suspended sentence with five years probation, under the condition that he not become involved with income tax schemes.
_	Some conventions use labellings by half-integers, with the condition that the sum "a" + "b" + "c" must be a whole number.
_	They remain estranged for several years until Lorelai asks her parents to help pay for Rory's schooling, to which Emily agrees on the condition that her daughter and granddaughter visit them for dinner every Friday evening.
_	He refused at first, but later acquiesced on the condition that he not leave his ship to campaign and that if he won, his duties as mayor did not interfere with his ferry business.
_	The mercenaries were allowed to withdraw under the condition that they would not enlist with the Tsardom of Russia against the Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth again.
_	Eventually, as noted on the 2006 "Spectacular Legacy of AWA" DVD, Gagne settled with making Hogan his champion after Hogan's feud with Bockwinkel ran its course in April 1983, but only under the condition that he would receive the bulk of the revenue Hogan made from both merchandise sales and his matches in Japan.
_	Prisoners were set free in Paris in September 1719 onwards, under the condition that they marry prostitutes and go with them to Louisiana.
_	After Spider-Man agrees to keep Harry's secret on the condition that the villain never reappears, Norman embarks on a tour to Europe with Harry so his son can overcome his addiction.
_	Bishop spares Owens on the condition that Roan wins the election.
_	But the government, which retained some shares until 2002, allowed the process to become final only on the condition that Korea Telecom bring broadband to all the villages in the country.
_	In this situation, the condition that "H" is adapted corresponds to the necessary restriction that the trading strategy can only make use of the available information at any time.
_	Similarly, the condition that "H" is adapted implies that the stochastic integral will not diverge when calculated as a limit of Riemann sums .
_	Cross states that he is indebted to her, and it was revealed that she spared his life when he attempted to murder her when she was pregnant on the condition that he would establish a school where humans and vampires can co-exist peacefully.
_	Bruce later offered to Argentina the transfer of the station and instruments on the condition that the government committed itself to the continuation of the scientific mission.
_	Also, clubs arranged all their own fixtures with the condition that any team they played they did so twice, both home and away.
_	Ten years later, on October 24, 1963, President John F. Kennedy—in what would be one of his last official acts before his assassination—ordered Kawakita released from prison on the condition that he leave the United States and be banned from ever returning.
_	The group was signed to Lyric Street Records, on the condition that they assume the name Rushlow and perform as a self-contained band, with no additional studio musicians.
_	A member of the German Resistance against German dictator Adolf Hitler, Hassell proposed to the British that the resistance overthrow Hitler, under the condition that Germany would keep all of its territorial conquests.
_	She agrees not to reveal the secret on the condition that the lovers never meet again.
_	In 1981, IBM created its PC, and wanted Intel's x86 processors, but only under the condition that Intel also provide a second-source manufacturer for its patented x86 microprocessors.
_	Besides the French candidate, there was also the captive Guelderian duke, Adolf of Egmont, who was released on the condition that he would liberate Tournai from the French.
_	He willingly takes the life sentence for the Stanfield organization on the condition that his girlfriend and children are taken care of financially.
_	Grey proposes that he simply be freed on the condition that he will spend the rest of his days atoning for his crimes—and if he does not, he will be hunted down.
_	They were given a few days to beg for provisions under the condition that they return to the police station to sleep.
_	His father got a job with band leader Vincent Lopez on the condition that he learn saxophone.
_	The sale was ultimately approved on the condition that the IceHawks remain in Milton for the 2017-18 season, but starting in the 2018-19 season the team relocated to Brantford to play under the 99ers name.
_	The doctors run into trouble when they fail to secure an extra benefactor, but at the last minute Catherine Avery (Debbie Allen) reveals that the Harper Avery Foundation is willing to provide a majority share in the company, on the condition that they have at least one member on the board of directors.
_	Thanks to Yakov she is released, but only under the condition that she goes back to her hometown.
_	Eventually around 500 Jewish children from Germany aged between 1 and 15 were granted temporary residence permits on the condition that their parents would not try to enter the country.
_	As a young scholar Bertrand possessed the parish church of S. Marcel de Carretret, but he received a dispensation from his bishop, allowing him to be absent for seven years for the purpose of continuing his studies, with the condition that he be ordained a subdeacon within a year.
_	This includes academic studies about Wikipedia, for example, research with Aniket Kittur on the condition that lead to better quality in Wikipedia articles and with Moira Burke in predicting successful candidates for Wikipedia administrators.
_	John flee, on the condition that John expiate his crime as soon as possible.
_	Her stepmother tells her she may go under the condition that she must finish her chores and find something suitable to wear.
_	The companions want to know the legend behind the Magicite shards; the White Mage agrees to tell them on the condition that they race her in the Floating Gardens, with the story as the winner's prize.
_	Conservative Rabbis will authorize it only under the condition that the child be raised as a Jew in a single-faith household.
_	The charges were dropped on the condition that Davis leave town which he did after purchasing a train ticket on a box car.
_	As part of the relicensing process, 4700 acres, including 76 miles of shoreline on the Yadkin River, are being sold to the N.C. Wildlife Resources Commission and the LandTrust for Central North Carolina, on the condition that within five years they raise the $10 to $12 million to buy the land.
_	Intrigued by the game's premise and blatant political incorrectness, Boll contacted Running With Scissors president Vince Desiderio, who sold him the rights under the condition that he would be involved with the script and the production.
_	These parameters are adopted given the condition that the planet HAT-P-32b has an irregular (eccentric) orbit.
_	Facing mounting international diplomatic pressure and the prospect of an Indonesian invasion force, the Dutch conceded to re-entering negotiations and agreed to the Ellsworth Bunker proposal on 28 July 1962, for a staged transition from Dutch to Indonesian control via UN administration, on the condition that a plebiscite would be held in future in the territory.
_	To save Alita face, he proposes that they meet again on the motorball circuit on the condition that she assemble a challenge team of at least five members including herself.
_	The basis for calculating a player's ranking are those tournaments that yield the highest ranking points during the rolling 52-week period with the condition that they must include points from the Grand Slams, Premier Mandatory tournaments, and the WTA Finals.
_	"Reign of Fire" was filmed in Ireland's Wicklow Mountains, on the condition that the crew clean up after themselves and not damage the landscape.
_	This was confirmed by the IOC at the 1937 meeting in Cairo on the condition that the 1940 Games would be given to Norway if Japan could not organize the preparations by the fall of 1938.
_	Under the act, federal funding was provided for rural post roads on the condition that they be open to the public at no charge.
_	Moveable goods were allowed to be kept by private individuals under the condition that the owners had to take them when they left.
_	To verify this, suppose first that "P" satisfies the condition that every chain in "P" has an upper bound in "P".
_	Conversely, if "P" is assumed to be non-empty and satisfies the hypothesis that every non-empty chain has an upper bound in "P", then "P" also satisfies the condition that "every" chain has an upper bound, as an arbitrary element of "P" serves as an upper bound for the empty chain (that is, the empty subset viewed as a chain).
_	Khoja Safar on presented before Melique denied the accusations but despite Safar's insistence on his innocence, he was jailed on the condition that he would be released only on the provision of a security of 5,000 pagodas.
_	He also begins taunting Tina's father Joe, whom he later tries to bribe by offering him a lucrative offer to fit kitchens in a new development on the condition that he will persuade
_	He apparently accepted the job as a teacher on the condition that he be allowed to smoke in the building.
_	Kirill refuses at first, but then accepts the offer on the condition that Theophanes will personally come to the Andronikov Monastery and invite Kirill to work with him in front of all the fraternity and Andrei Rublev, who according to Theophanes' comments has some fame as an icon painter in the outside world.
_	Half of the gift will go towards construction of the estimated $240–$280 million facility and half will pay for research, on the condition that MIT builds the center even if fund raising falls short.
_	Enid's diploma is withheld on the condition that she attend a remedial art class.
_	In season five, after Pierce's funeral, Troy was given his remaining shares of Hawthorne Wipes weighing at about $14.3 million, on the condition that he sails around the world.
_	The building was sold to Holsten Real Estate Development Corp. for $1 in 2014 on the condition that it will continue providing affordable housing on this property for at least 50 years.
_	Soon after, the trio got the opportunity to appear in a Television Sarajevo show, but under the condition that they record a song of their own.
_	The Genoese consuls agreed, on the condition that they receive larger quarters in the old part of Tripoli and increased residency privileges.
_	She gives them the contract on the condition that they give her 20% of the business, which Jimmy and Carl reluctantly agree to.
_	Repton Priory was originally a cell to Calke Priory; however, Countess Maud's donation was made on the condition that most of the canons should transfer to the new Repton Priory as soon as convenient.
_	A year later, “solidarity contracts” were introduced which provided early retirement for older workers aged 55 or above on the condition that firms replace recipients with younger workers.
_	On February 15, 2006, after four months behind bars, Ricky was released under the condition that he continue working and making efforts to catch up on the delinquent payments owed to his ex-wife.
_	But he offers to forgive Chulbul on the condition that Chulbul start working for him.
_	On 10 and 21 September, Trifunović-Birčanin met with Mario Roatta, commander of the Italian Second Army, and urged him to take action "as soon as possible" in a large operation against the Yugoslav Partisans in the Prozor-Livno area and offered aid in the form of 7,500 Chetniks on the condition that they be provided the necessary arms and supplies.
_	The Duke acquiesces on the condition that he will never hear them sing the serenade again.
_	The queen regent offered the post to Melek Ahmed, who accepted the offer on the condition that the palace people would not meddle with the governance of the state on 5 August 1650.
_	In 1539, Tartaglia did so only on the condition that Cardano would never reveal it and that if he did write a book about cubics, he would give Tartaglia time to publish.
_	Monck entered London in February 1660 and he allowed the Presbyterian members, 'secluded' in Pride's Purge of 1648, to re-enter parliament on 21 February 1660 on the condition that the restored Long Parliament would agree to dissolve themselves once general elections had been held.
_	After a week the body was released by the government, despite the lack of a statement from the family, on the condition that there would be no funeral procession and the body would be buried secretly.
_	Two of them each received $5 million in trust and $5 million in cash, under the condition that they visit their father's grave site once each calendar year.
_	The Assault Glider Trust is building a replica at RAF Shawbury using templates made from original components found scattered over various European battlefields and using plans supplied by BAE Systems (on the condition that the glider must not be flown ).
_	In 1896, manufacturing moved from Iowa to Woodstock, Illinois, when the City of Woodstock donated a vacant factory once used by the Wheeler and Tappan Company on the condition that the Oliver Typewriter Company remain there at least five years.
_	In many of these problems, the solution satisfies the condition that the solution curve should cross transversally the nullcline or some other curve describing terminal conditions.
_	Having gathered his strength, Uncle Hvedor replies that he will give his boots to the post-driver on the condition that he buys him a headstone for his grave.
_	One of the village elders, Phineas Worrell, an ancestor of Ernest, establishes the seal under the condition that Trantor can only be released on the night before Halloween and by the hands of a Worrell – and that every generation of Worrells would get "dumber and dumber and dumber", culminating in Ernest P. Worrell.
_	The governor and his wife liked Theocharis so much that they decided to offer their daughter to him, upon the condition that he convert to Islam.
_	At the public hearing two weeks later, the commissioners voted to fund the salaries of the staff for one year, with the condition that the library transition into an existing organization and/or create a joint-use model to ensure the maintenance of future library services.
_	Hawke received government permission to buy the clearing for $700.00 on the condition that he build a grist mill (for flour) and a sawmill within two years.
_	She accepts his offer to become his girlfriend on the condition that he manages to enter university.
_	The hospital opened in 1894 after Mrs. M. Day Kimball donated $5,000 for the construction of the infirmary building in memory of her recently deceased son, Day Kimball, with the condition that the hospital be named after him.
_	He accepts Spider's offer to fight Lee, on the condition that he take a dive in the third round.
_	Percy surrenders on the condition that she be freed.
_	Subsequently, his uncle Krishnamurthy and T. Govindarajan of Venus Films agreed to finance the film under the condition that he make it as a low-budget Kannada film.
_	To keep the model identified by imposed the condition that the industry factor returns sum to zero in each time period.
_	The Colombian President, Álvaro Uribe, had given Chávez permission to mediate, under the condition that all meetings with the FARC would take place in Venezuela and that Chávez would not contact members of the Colombian military directly, but instead go through the proper diplomatic channels.
_	However, the planning permission was subject to the condition that the developer pay for restoration of the station building and engine shed.
_	They manage to persuade Bill to buy some new clothes, but only on the condition that they have the clothes from the charity shops.
_	The DFB awarded the win to Hamburg under the condition that they renounce the title in the name of "good sportsmanship" – which they grudgingly did.
_	He adopted Gandhian principles in his life and married his wife Vimla with the condition that they would live among rural people and establish ashram in village.
_	Campbell accepts on the condition that the rest of his colleagues be reinstated as well.
_	Enrique agreed to help them, with the condition that they learn the amateur style first and become competent shoot wrestlers.
_	Kerr, but only on the condition that the murder charge against him was withdrawn.
_	A patron of the arts, she bequeathed the Medici's large art collection, including the contents of the Uffizi, Palazzo Pitti and the Medicean villas, which she inherited upon her brother Gian Gastone's death in 1737, and her Palatine treasures to the Tuscan state, on the condition that no part of it could be removed from "the Capital of the grand ducal State...[and from] the succession of His Serene Grand Duke."
_	Silverstein had been inspired by the work Cox had done in Samoa, and agreed to take the position of Executive Director of Seacology under the condition that the office be relocated to within walking distance of his house.
_	Four years later, in 1946, the Sanfords leased the theater to the Kallet chain on the condition that they keep the revenue from the concession stand, and Kallet invest in improvements.
_	He pleaded for it, and they finally gave it to him on the condition that he never open it.
_	The plant, which is bigger than Yankee Stadium, was built after a 1998 lawsuit by the presidential administration of Bill Clinton, which Mayor Rudy Giuliani settled under the condition that the city of New York would build the plant by 2006.
_	Doon was founded by Satish Ranjan Das, a lawyer from Calcutta and advocate-general of Bengal, who in 1927 became a member of the Viceroy's Executive Council of Lord Irwin on the condition that he would use the prestige of this position to raise funds for a new type of school in India.
_	In an interview that Popper gave in 1969 with the condition that it should be kept secret until after his death, he summarised his position on God as follows: "I don't know whether God exists or not.
_	Ruby agrees to join on the condition that Liam won't have to, since he hates the Leagues violent methods.
_	British prestige was at stake, and the Government provided Cunard with an annual subsidy of £150,000 plus a low interest loan of £2.5 million to pay for the construction of the two superliners, "Lusitania" and "Mauretania" under the condition that they be available for conversion to armed cruisers when needed by the navy.
_	Kito agrees to allow Spalanzani to remove the nanomachines on the condition that Ignatz continues his story...
_	Lisbon soon fell, and Philip was elected king of Portugal at the Portuguese Cortes of Tomar in 1581—on the condition that the kingdom and its overseas territories would not become Spanish provinces.
_	He hired a model to pose as his wife for the cover of his book but when he is offered a lucrative television series on the condition that his 'wife' appears on the show with him, he asks the model who posed for the original photographs to continue the ruse.
_	This was based on the condition that all players be returned to their former clubs via the reserve clause.
_	The hospital was the first in the world to accept only destitute TB patients, from anywhere in the country, under the condition that upon leaving the hospital "they did not become a charge upon the Denver community."
_	A spurned and vengeful Salome then agrees to dance for Herod — on the condition that she be given anything she asks for.
_	Helene offers to buy his magazine, on the condition that it is renamed "Couture Italiana", but with Marcello kept on as editor-in-chief, to which he agrees.
_	Volunteers who have a gun license may use their own personal handgun as personal defense weapon for their police duty, under the condition that the gun and ammunition type is authorized by the police (9 mm).
_	A Captain Edward Piers was leased land over a five-year period in Dunboyne, County Meath on the condition that he kill fourteen wolves and 60 foxes.
_	He maintained his links with the University and, in 1677, Ashmole made a gift of the Tradescant Collection, together with material he had collected independently, to the University on the condition that a suitable home be built to house the materials and make them available to the public.
_	Quebec continued to claim the remaining District of Ungava, north of the Eastmain River, and in 1912 the area was transferred to Quebec, subject to the condition that a treaty be negotiated with the native peoples of the region recognising their cultural rights and surrendering their title to the land to Quebec and Canada.
_	The original owner of the mound, David Gibson, gave the site to the city of Romney on the condition that the mound would not be disturbed.
_	They are required to fulfill the condition that
_	In May 2011, Asmussen – acting on behalf the German government – endorsed deploying the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development through loans to business in the Middle East, under the condition that countries make “a firm commitment to the core principles of democracy, political pluralism and the market economy.”
_	Abu Azzah Amr bin Abd Allah al-Jumahi had been treated kindly by Muhammad after the Battle of Badr, being a poor man with daughters, he had no means to pay ransom, he was released after Battle of Badr, on the condition that he would not take up arms against Muslims again.
_	In a final meet between Suri and Stephen/Feroz, the latter returns Raghava's bullet-ridden body and challenges Suri to a fight on the condition that 'A person will lose two of his men for each fall he takes'.
_	The saint agreed on the condition that Raja Ganesha's son, Jadu, would convert to Islam and rule in his place.
_	Salih was released from remand custody on December 11, 2001, under the condition that he stay in the country until the extradition proceedings are finished.
_	A man claiming to be Tucker contacts them and agrees to meet for an interview on the condition that Aaron and Jim remove from the Internet everything that they have written about the Tarsus Club.
_	He was released on the condition that he petition the Vermont government for release of imprisoned members of the pro-New York group, something he never did.
_	However, acknowledging the realpolitik of the situation, Chomsky has also considered a two-state solution on the condition that both nation-states exist on equal terms.
_	The definition of mutation also applies to non-invertible elements "y". If "A" is finite-dimensional over R or C, invertible elements "a" in "A" are dense, since invertibility is equivalent to the condition that det "Q"("a") ≠
_	In 1787, hundreds of London's black poor (a category that included the East Indian seamen known as lascars) agreed to go to this West African colony on the condition that they would retain the status of British subjects, live in freedom under the protection of the British Crown, and be defended by the Royal Navy.
_	However the condition that the manifold be Haken is unnecessarily strong.
_	The bank refused to fund the project, but agreed to grant him permission to use the wall on the condition that he wasn't a communist (see: Diego Rivera).
_	Appealing to the new King of Jerusalem, Baldwin I, Geldemar was reinstated as Lord of Haifa, under the condition that it be restored to Tancred after 15 months.
_	This is possible thanks to the condition that the value of all radii from the origin is 0.
_	Currently the theatre is property of the company Stage Entertainment, founded by Joop van den Ende, who bought the building for the symbolic amount of 1 guilder off the Municipality of The Hague on the condition that it would be converted into a functioning theatre.
_	The sound pressure output is measured at (or mathematically scaled to be equivalent to a measurement taken at) one meter from the loudspeaker and on-axis (directly in front of it), under the condition that the loudspeaker is radiating into an infinitely large space and mounted on an infinite baffle.
_	He was given $500 ($ today) for uniforms and equipment, on the condition that the team be named for its sponsor.
_	The song received positive reactions from teenage listeners, and a scout from Highland Records offered the group a recording contract, under the condition that the company take possession of the master recording, and that David Ponce be named as the author of the song, as he was the eldest member of the group.
_	Then-coach Jeff Lebo granted Douglas his scholarship release on the condition that he transfer to a non-SEC university.
_	Broudie agreed on the condition that comedians Frank Skinner and David Baddiel, who had presented the late-night television show "Fantasy Football League" participated.
_	This was under the condition that both directions of the runway were available so tailwind landings could be avoided.
_	Three days later, Armijo granted them the land on the condition that they put it to good use.
_	Both of these ideas did not work, so in 1907, the library association received a grant from Andrew Carnegie for $7,500 to build a library on the condition that the city appropriate a budget for its upkeep.
_	He was later released by his abductors on the condition that he would leave Karachi along with his family.
_	Jouvet accepted the part of Inspector Antoine on the condition that a flexible shooting schedule would be allowed and that Clouzot would cast some of Jouvet's troupe members in the film.
_	Eight months later, General Mills signed a deal to sponsor the cartoon program, under the condition that the show be run in a late-afternoon time slot, when it could be targeted toward children.
_	In 1878, Patrick Hues Mell was asked to become chancellor of the university, and did so only on the condition that the fraternities be allowed back on campus.
_	Moreover, he surrendered the French-occupied towns in Brittany to Duchess Anne of Brittany on the condition that Duchess Anne remove all English forces from the duchy.
_	When a new city hall was built, Cyrus Hermann Kotzschmar Curtis, having become a wealthy publisher, donated an organ for an auditorium in the building, on the condition that it be a memorial to Hermann Kotzschmar.
_	In 1899, Ali Dinar became the Sultan of Darfur with the approval of the then Sirdar Lord Kitchener, on the condition that he paid an annual tribute to the British.
_	Mephisto agrees, with the condition that he and his brothers would be given a prize to take with them to the Burning Hells, Inarius.
_	He spares Owens on the condition that Roan wins the election.
_	In 1692 he was granted land in the Albuquerque area by de Vargas, on the condition that he personally settle it, as well as developing it with other settlers.
_	Sunita finally agrees on the condition that, if Dev is happy to spend money on Aadi and his golf, he needs to be willing to splurge an equal amount on Asha.
_	The uncle with whom he was lodging sent word of Jaojoby's activities to the young singer's parents, who consulted a priest before giving their son permission to continue exploring his musical talents on the condition that he continue to perform well at school.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of 20 seats, with the remaining 29 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in any given province did not exceed three times that of any other.
_	Angells mother accepted the connection on the condition that they stayed in Trondheim for the remainder of her life.
_	Since formula_20 is symmetric it is completely determined by its values in the simplex formula_21, defined by the condition that formula_22.
_	Hawk a way out and a chance for a fresh start: $500,000 and a top of the line semi (even better than the contest's grand prize) on the condition that he stay out of their lives for good (at this point Hawk had already signed over custody papers) but Hawk refuses.
_	The NHL took back the franchise, on the condition that if it were resold, the original franchisees would share in the proceeds.
_	Citizens and private institutions can also display it, on the condition that they respect the relevant legal procedures.
_	In March 2014, Men’s Wearhouse reached an agreement to acquire Jos. A. Bank for $1.8 billion, on the condition that it dropped its acquisition bid for Eddie Bauer.
_	Marceline agrees only on the condition that the Hierophant no longer drinks blood, but he attacks her instead.
_	Upon learning that Cosmic Boy had intentionally gotten himself arrested in order to steal a new faster-than-light ship to allow the Legion mobility, Dyrk agreed to cover for his former teammate, on the condition that he be brought in on everything when circumstances allowed.
_	However, Knox has a sword, which he gives to Hiro, saying that he can only join on the condition that he kills Ando.
_	Her father, Cristóbal Cortey, sold books for a living; her mother, Catalina Astroch, was the universal heir of Pedro Miguel Astroch, with the condition that all of her offspring would keep her last name.
_	In 1508, the House of Schöneck died out with Georg von Schöneck, who bequeathed to the parish priest hunting and fishing rights on the condition that he say Mass in return on an ongoing basis.
_	Warren, who found the script "funny, but very corny", agreed to direct the film on the condition that he be allowed to revise the story.
_	The Carnegie Foundation of New York offered the College a grant on the condition that the new King's College would be built in Halifax and would merge into a division of Dalhousie under the Arts and Sciences program.
_	Xu Hai eventually agreed to surrender on the condition that Hu Zongxian would secure his pardon and mollify his Japanese followers with gifts.
_	Adonijah fled and took refuge at the altar, receiving pardon for his conduct from Solomon on the condition that he showed himself a worthy man (1 Kings 1:5-53).
_	In the early years of independence, existing Chinese, Tamil and mission schools accepted government funding and were allowed to retain their medium of instructions on the condition that they adopt the national curriculum.
_	If the patient stops taking the drug the gallstones tend to recur if the condition that gave rise to their formation does not change.
_	When it turns out that Crowley's blood is needed to construct a weapon to kill the Leviathans, he agrees on the condition that they retrieve the other components of the weapon first.
_	Confronted with this sharp increase in cases, Belgium established the condition that the accused person must be Belgian or present in Belgium.
_	On 10 March 2017, a deal was made allowing authorities to search the temple once again on the condition that representatives of the Thai Human Rights Commission and news reporters were allowed to witness the search.
_	That proposed station swap would be held up for nearly four years until the FCC issued a final decision in August 1964, when the Commission renewed NBC's licenses for WRCV radio and television, on the condition that the 1956 station swap with Westinghouse be reversed.
_	As part of the sale, Rogers requested that the CRTC convert CJNT to an English-language station, on the condition that both Channel Zero and Rogers provide services and resources to CFHD-DT, a newly proposed, locally owned multicultural station.
_	A new bill was introduced in 1983 and a final approval was given in April 1983 with the condition that the project was to have a predetermined fixed-price contract, a decision that would later be criticized as unrealistic due to later cost overruns.
_	Her father even allowed her to listen to his lessons which he gave male pupils, on the condition that she hide behind a curtain and not let anybody know her presence.
_	Ian on the condition that they have a baby.
_	Clark agreed on the condition that Mrs. Hoover design the house and that Clark, aided by architectural draftsman Charles Davus and Clark's architect son, Birge, would serve in an advisory capacity.
_	Daniel agrees on the condition that Eli denounce his faith and his own credibility.
_	He was especially interested in La Seo Cathedral, where he had two chapels built on his own expense, on the condition that he and his mother are interred there together.
_	The purpose of the time the consistent property is to categorize the risk measures which satisfy the condition that if portfolio (A) is riskier than portfolio (B) at some time in the future, then it is guaranteed to be riskier at any time prior to that point.
_	Shizuno agrees, but on the condition that he does something for her in exchange – pilot a mecha for an organization known as Celebrum.
_	Rousseau was allowed to return to Paris from exile only on the condition that he not publish any of his work.
_	Lahiri Mahasaya agreed to initiate him in Kriya Yoga under the condition that he give up his sannyas vows and return to a householder life.
_	Further talks occurred between 20–21 January 1988, and Hun Sen offered Sihanouk a position within the Kampuchean Government on the condition that he returned to Kampuchea straightaway.
_	For example, where the testator was fifty-seven years of age and left a farm to his grandson aged six, subject to the condition that, if the grandson came to die without lawful descendants, the farm should revert to the testator’s children, the court held that the intention of the testator was to create a fideicommissum.
_	Finally, in 1899, Emperor Franz Joseph agreed to permit Franz Ferdinand to marry Sophie, on the condition that the marriage would be morganatic and that their descendants would not have succession rights to the throne.
_	He accepts his old job on the condition that Larry and Stan join him.
_	This, of course, violates the condition that "no one seller can influence market price".
_	To be considered ecumenical, Orthodox accept a council that meets the condition that it was accepted by the whole church.
_	However, one year later, the Master realizes that the warrior misses his life as a human, and agrees to send him back to the Freil Empire, but under the condition that the hero would not have any memory of his past.
_	He convinced an American artificial tooth manufacturer to take up his cause and produce his designs, on the condition that other dentists would embrace the new forms.
_	But Quamrul's determination and love for painting made his father enroll Quamrul to Government Institute of Arts (now Government College of Art & Craft), in 1938, under the condition that Quamrul had to pay for his own tuition fee.
_	Katzman agreed, reportedly under the condition that he would have "total authority" on the show, and as of the tenth season premiere he was promoted to executive producer, and Capice was let go.
_	It vowed to respect the Bosnian government under the condition that Bosnia and Herzegovina was independent of "the former and every kind of future Yugoslavia."
_	From the above derivation it is clear that the solution of local inverse is a minimal L2 norm method subject to the condition that the influence of unknown object formula_20 is formula_59.
_	Hitler announced he would rejoin on the condition that he would replace Drexler as party chairman, and that the party headquarters would remain in Munich.
_	On one expedition, he plundered thirty ships in St. John's and held Sir Richard Whitbourne prisoner, releasing him on the condition that Whitbourne would go to England and obtain a pardon for Easton.
_	Viewed far enough away, every solution is reduced to an exponential; the condition that the exponential is decreasing restricts the energy levels to a discrete set, called the allowed energies.
_	A sequel to "Resurrection" was planned as Joss Whedon had written an earth-set script for "Alien 5", though Sigourney Weaver was not interested in this setting, but has remained open to reprise her role as Ellen Ripley for a fifth installment on the condition that she likes the story.
_	Finally the Prevention Loop explores the systems that permitted the condition that allowed the Failure and Cause Mechanism to exist in the first place.
_	Dani was dismayed when her father invited Kit to move into his home, on the condition that she stop drinking.
_	Roosevelt consented to the campaign only on the condition that the British commit to an invasion of France in mid-1944, and the Allied Powers began to build up a force for that operation, diverting soldiers from the Italian Campaign.
_	Some of those who reported to the civilian assembly centers were not sent to relocation centers, but were released under the condition that they remain outside the prohibited zone until the military orders were modified or lifted.
_	The equality of the sums of the radii of the two pairs is equivalent to the condition that the constructed parallelogram be a rhombus, and this is easily shown in the construction.
_	Landon agreed on the condition that he could also play Charles Ingalls.
_	Carpenter was approached by producer J. Stein Kaplan to make a low-budget exploitation film for under $100,000, on the condition that the filmmaker would have total creative control.
_	With the condition that this memorial could not be figurative and needed to represent all 65,000 lives and the camps they were executed at, Rachel Whiteread was chosen out of ten artists to create this monument.
_	This support was forthcoming from all parties, but only on the condition that each was invited into the government; Thorn was left with no choice but to afford them this.
_	The Treaty of Péronne was signed in January 1200 on the condition that Baldwin receive the territories he had won during the war.
_	At 27 years he was elected mayor of the city with the condition that he would renounce after a few months to assume a federal dispute for Nuevo León to Congress of the Union.
_	To remedy this, Edward II began encouraging foreign workmen and inventors to settle in England, offering "letters of protection" that protected them from guild policy on the condition that they train English apprentices and pass on their knowledge.
_	This sealed battery is kept at approximately 300 degrees Celsius and is operated under the condition that the active materials at both electrodes are liquid and its electrolyte is solid.
_	On January 15, 2009, he signed a discounted one-year contract with the San Diego Padres on the condition that he would play primarily second base.
_	The government allowed the possibility of returning processing to Nauru, on the condition that Malaysia was also permitted.
_	In response, in 1997 Congress authorized $5.2 billion for Amtrak over the next five years – largely to complete the "Acela" capital project – on the condition that Amtrak submit to the ultimatum of self-sufficiency by 2003 or liquidation.
_	He was held for twelve months in different concentration camps suffering severe torture: first at the Tacna Regiment, then at the Military Academy; later he was sent for eight months to a political prison on Dawson Island and from there he was transferred to the basement of the Air Force War Academy, and finally to the concentration camp of Ritoque, until international diplomatic pressure, especially from Diego Arria, then Governor of Distrito Federal of Venezuela, resulted in the sudden release of Letelier on the condition that he immediately leave Chile.
_	Legislation introduced in 1991 called for the creation of the Preserve, but local interests objected to the condition that the National Park Service would own it all.
_	Believing the Babalon Working was accomplished, Parsons sold the Parsonage to developers for $25,000 under the condition that he and Cameron could continue to live in the coach house, and he appointed Roy Leffingwell to head the Agape Lodge, which would now have to meet elsewhere for its rituals.
_	When the village of Geddes joined the city in 1886, Major John P. Burnet, who owned a large farm on Tipperary Hill, gave a large hill top plot of land to Syracuse now known as Burnet Park with the condition that the city spend $6,000 to build roads and plant trees in this new city park.
_	The station joined Fox on the condition that it be allowed to preempt "The Late Show", which by the time WCGV acquired the affiliation had lost Joan Rivers as its host and was not doing well in the ratings.
_	The campaign finally succeeded; Bigiev was freed on the condition that he was to live in Moscow under state surveillance for two years.
_	He was released on July 29, 1978, on the condition that he live in a city outside his home province without leaving it.
_	Tawana's parents agreed to assist her in raising her twins with the condition that she work.
_	Boyer donated copies of the Flood and Cason manuscripts and other documents to the Ford County Historical Society, including an original journal kept by Josephine Earp, Wyatt's wife, with the condition that he would approve who could see the documents.
_	Gleeson wrote off the sisters' debt of £185 on the condition that they could not use the name Dun Emer.
_	On September 14, 1953, AA authorized NA the use of AA's 12 steps and traditions on the condition that they stop using the AA name, causing the organization to call itself Narcotics Anonymous.
_	The players voted to continue playing for the period under the condition that the rest of the Drillers staff also get paid what was owing to them.
_	Jobs, who has described the house as "poorly built," "[not]...very interesting," and in poor taste, was granted a demolition permit in May 2009 by the Woodside Town Council, with the condition that he allow investor Gordon Smythe to disassemble the building and move it to another location.
_	When "n" is odd, then by using the freedom to multiply rows by −1, one may impose the condition that each row of "R" contain an even number of elements 1 and an odd number of elements −1.
_	He was granted bail on the condition that he reside on the carrier until a more permanent bail arrangement is reached.
_	However, planning permission was subject to the condition that the developer pay for construction of a new station platform and restoration of the engine shed.
_	The high court ruled that the father's right to decide the religion and upbringing of the infant is allowed "subject to the condition that it does not conflict with the principles of the infant's choice of religion guaranteed to her under the Federal Constitution".
_	The reigning champion, Kazuchika Okada, accepted Devitt's challenge for the title later in the event on the condition that he first defend the IWGP Junior Heavyweight Championship against his Chaos stablemate Gedo.
_	On the condition that the wife would leave the workforce, a loan of up to 1,000 Reichsmarks could be accessed by young couples of Aryan descent who intended to marry, and the amount that had to be repaid was reduced by 25 percent for each child born.
_	The "p"-adic modular form also has to satisfy some other conditions analogous to the condition that a classical modular form should be holomorphic.
_	They sought to cripple the king's power of hurting France and to compel him to seek Louis's friendship; that friendship, however, was to be given only on the condition that Louis support their goals.
_	The reconstruction and development aid was pledged for the timeframe through 2015, but under the condition that the Afghan government reduce corruption before receiving all of the money.
_	This surprises everyone and Viren berates Maanvi for her 'selfish' attitude, upon insistence she reveals of her ailment to Viraat on the condition that he wouldn't reveal to Jeevika and Viren.
_	Bob initially asks Edna to simply repair his original super suit, but she ultimately convinces him to allow her to design an entirely new outfit on the condition that capes not be incorporated whatsoever due to safety concerns, ultimately ending her 15 years-long retirement from superhero work.
_	The condition that "L" be a symplectic transformation is precisely the condition that "M" be a symplectic matrix:
_	In 1849, Congress appropriated some additional funds to clean out and deepen portions of the canal, on the condition that the city provide matching funds.
_	After four months of imprisonment in the Tower of London he was pardoned by Queen Mary on account of his youth and on the condition that he took the Oath of Loyalty.
_	According to Ibn Hisham's version of the pact with Khaybar, it was concluded on the condition that the Muslims "may expel you [Jews of Khaybar] if and when we wish to expel you."
_	TSN sports reporter Farhan Lalji reported that Mitchell agreed to play the 2013 season with the Argos, under the condition that he be released following the season to pursue employment in the NFL.
_	In other words, we would like the sum of all right hand side of the constraints to be the maximal under the condition that for each primal variable the sum of its coefficients do not exceed its coefficient in the linear function.
_	For his services, Lotito was offered a promotion of colonel on the condition that he be stationed in Japan for the next two years.
_	On 20 June, the EC extended an offer to Bersih to meet and discuss its demands, on the condition that the rally be called off.
_	Besides this, Cecilia would inherit all belongings and properties on Java, on the condition that her mother would be allowed to use these properties for the rest of her life.
_	She cooperated fully with Patrick Marnham, on the condition that nothing would be published before her death.
_	The renaming was done on the condition that "Roy" would receive a rail line to the town.
_	Klenau and the other officers were released on the condition that they not serve against France until exchanged, an agreement to which they held.
_	She agrees to let Mac stay under the condition that he does not drink while working.
_	Willis was to try to regain the throne for Liliuokalani on the condition that she give amnesty to the insurrectionists.
_	A professorship had been offered him on the condition that he embrace Christianity, but he refused to abandon the faith of his fathers.
_	Disgusted that Dr. Prell is going to use their friend's body as bait, Karen reluctantly agrees to help out by taking photos, under the condition that they leave Boot Island whether they succeed or fail.
_	The band had received proposals to play at Obras the previous year, which the accepted with the condition that they would organize it themselves.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province did not exceed two times that of any other.
_	The Poisson solver can be adapted to the weighted least squares approximation procedure with the condition that the Poisson equation and the boundary condition must be satisfied on each finite point.
_	Associated Newspapers was allowed to remain a shareholder in Southern only on the condition that it sold its remaining 10% stake in Associated-Rediffusion to avoid owning parts of two ITV companies.
_	Geometric regularity originated when Chevalley and Weil pointed out to that, over non-perfect fields, the Jacobian criterion for a simple point of an algebraic variety is not equivalent to the condition that the local ring is regular.
_	Martinez's manager offers him a promotion on the condition that he falsify inventory documents.
_	But his agent said it was too depressing so Landy said that he would let her live on the condition that he would get to torture her every single book.
_	According to aviation author Derek Wood, the Skeeter had benefitted from a favourable early impression of the type that had been made upon some West German officials; the rotorcraft had attracted the offer of a sizable military order from the German government, however, the placing of the order was on the condition that the Skeeter was in turn adopted by the British armed forces as well.
_	However, at the same time it was desirable to portray an image of normality, so the Pinochet regime let the national team travel on the condition that no one made political statements, since their relatives were under military surveillance.
_	Sita agrees to perform the operation on his wife only on the condition that he surrenders to her husband.
_	This threat was used as a bargaining tool with the FIA – Enzo Ferrari offered to cancel the IndyCar Project and commit to Formula One on the condition that the technical regulations were not changed to exclude V12 engines.
_	Mimiko stated later that Governor Agagu’s decision to run for a second term came as a surprise to him as he had put aside his gubernatorial ambition to support Agagu on the condition that Agagu would serve a term of office and support him, Mimiko to take over in 2007.
_	In 1934, a collector of Keats donated his collection to the Keats Memorial House, Hampstead, on the condition that he should remain anonymous.
_	He even strengthened the condition that formula_1 is strong limit to that GCH holds below formula_1.
_	The Refugees' Rehabilitation Committee worked vehemently to create the infrastructure for industrial activity, by buying large land plots which were almost given away gratis to entrepreneurs under the condition that the latter had to start producing within a three years' time frame.
_	Intent on becoming the strict manager his superiors expect, he gives Hunt a large promotion on the condition that he work as a liaison between the Japanese management and the American workers, to smooth the transition and convince the workers to obey the new rules.
_	Although she was sentenced to ten months in prison, 'she was released on the condition that she not repeat the offence within five years', according to Frontline Defenders.
_	This contributed to another bout of depression and another suicide attempt which saw her hospitalised and released only under the condition that she leave the USA.
_	Soong demands that Ma bring Todd to the pedestrian bridge in Wan Chai North on the condition that he be alone.
_	Following Takeo's abdication, an impressed Saga offered Shigeko a marriage-alliance, which Shigeko accepted, on the condition that she remain co-ruler in the Three Countries.
_	Twiggs, while awaiting relief from Waite, surrendered the property on the condition that federal troops could peacefully evacuate.
_	The army had suffered enormously from disease, and for all the men and money that the war cost Russia only gained some sparsely populated steppe north of the Black Sea, and the old prize of Azov, under the condition that it would remain unfortified.
_	Every graph may be defined by at least one sentence; for instance, one can define an "n"-vertex graph "G" by a sentence with "n" + 1 variables, one for each vertex of the graph, and one more to state the condition that there is no vertex other than the "n" vertices of the graph.
_	As of the season 10 premiere, there was another major overhaul of the crew, with Leonard Katzman not only returning to the production side of the show but also getting promoted to executive producer, reportedly under the condition that he would get "total authority" of the show, while Philip Capice and most of the season 9 staff left the production.
_	By 1904 the War Office had concluded that Walmer had no remaining military value and agreed to transfer the castle to the Office of Works, who accepted it on the condition that they were paid £2,400 in order to carry out repairs.
_	Pym eventually offers Ultron a compromise, allowing Jocasta to become Ultron's bride, on the condition that Ultron banishes himself to ultraspace.
_	Dr. Khan immediately agreed, but under the condition that he would be able to do things his own way without any interference from Abedi or anyone else.
_	This was accepted by the Ottoman ruler Suleiman the Magnificent under the condition that the Hungarians would continue to pay tribute to the Ottoman Sultan.
_	For a short time (16 June 1815 to 3 November 1815), Reichweiler, among other places, was assigned to the Kingdom of Prussia, but on the condition that an area containing 69,000 souls be ceded from the former Department of Saar to leaders of lesser states.
_	Vidal Sassoon consented to marriage on the condition that the two were married in a Jewish ceremony at his home.
_	In 1881, Andrew Carnegie offered a US$250,000 grant to the city for the construction of a public library on the condition that the city provided the land and annual funding for the maintenance of the property.
_	Elliott was released on bail on the condition that he did not tweet or access Twitter, have a smartphone or use a computer with Internet access.
_	Death agrees, with the condition that if he wins he will take both Inga and Victor.
_	The Athenians had hoped to use Sitalces against the Macedonians, but due to Sitalces' desire to focus on acquiring more Thracian allies, he convinced Athens to make peace with Macedonia on the condition that he provide cavalry and peltasts for the Athenian army in Chalcidice.
_	Tuttle donated five acres of ground to the railway company with the condition that the new town should bear the name of his native country.
_	DesBarres was awarded 20,000 acres (81 km) of land in and around Tatamagouche on the condition that he settle it with 100 Protestants within 10 years.
_	However, Kumara had violated the condition that he not search for the source of the voice.
_	The others agreed with Coppedge on the condition that it shouldn't have "that silly spelling, but should be spelled 'Rolla.'
_	The other two articles accused Despenser of refusing to abide by the condition that he take with him "the best and most sufficient captains of the realm, after royalties"—a condition he got around by refusing to name his captains until after permission for his expedition was already granted, and by deceiving the king through ""beaux promesses"" in order to retain complete control of military matters (and avoiding taking Arundel with him).
_	Upon Adele's death in 1884, the entire Hope estate, including the Hope Diamond, was entrusted to Henrietta's younger son, Henry Francis Pelham-Clinton, on the condition that he add the name of "Hope" to his own surnames when he reached the age of legal majority.
_	Eventually Disney called Povenmire back with an acceptance, on the condition that he would produce an 11-minute pilot.
_	Estelle gets an eye job on the condition that she cannot cry for ten days.
_	When Paul as a child had accidentally stumbled upon this wondrous booklined universe, his father had shared the den with him on the condition that he did not tell anyone else.
_	After thirteen years of training by the Agency, Vanessa and her brother were allowed to return to regular society, on the condition that they both become members of Team Tejas.
_	Subsequently, Mark became a member of AGT in 1999, when, during a weekend of gigs in New York, the band's van broke down and Mark offered them transportation on the condition that he be allowed to join the band.
_	Some soldiers tried and failed, but finally Santamaría volunteered on the condition that, in the event of his death, someone would look after his mother.
_	Note that, in the definition, we could easily have disposed of the condition that the space is Hausdorff.
_	The imperial repression of Christianity only ended in 1873 and that year Petitjean was allowed back by the Japanese authorities, initially only on the condition that he only give the sacraments to foreign soldiers, sailors and merchants in Japan's ports.
_	However, as he had been a close friend of Lord Nelson and had supplied his fleet, he was eventually granted a site to build a house in the "Alameda" on the condition that it be ""an ornament"" to the square.
_	However, nine months later in 1917, the lieutenant governor of Missouri paroled Lazia on the condition that he join the United States Army.
_	In 1891, the castle was damaged in the Great Nōbi earthquake, and it was returned to the Naruse family in 1895, on the condition that they repair and maintain it.
_	The Bunch–Davies vacuum can also be described as being generated by an infinite time trace from the condition that the scale of quantum fluctuations is much smaller than the Hubble scale.
_	In this form, the equations correspond structurally to the condition that the Jacobian matrix is of the form
_	Rivera agreed to complete the commission, on the condition that he be granted free rein over the subject chosen for the mural.
_	He composed it on the condition that his name would not be associated with it.
_	Dev agrees, on the condition that she ends the relationship with Joe, who suggests to Geena that they pretend that they have broken up and she should get back with Dev, attempting to consolidate the lie.
_	Settlers were offered land on the condition that they help further the progress of concession roads into the region.
_	Usually, according to Suryodarmo, we are in the condition that we are alone and we just see nature.
_	The following year, after the 2003 invasion of Iraq, 80 Sudanese Ba'athists were allowed to return to Sudan under the condition that they would stay out of politics.
_	He was appointed to the job with the condition that he would pursue a doctorate during his tenure.
_	In October 2011, the Bletchley Park Trust received a £4.6m Heritage Lottery Fund grant to be used "to complete the restoration of the site, and to tell its story to the highest modern standards" on the condition that £1.7m of 'match funding' is raised by the Bletchley Park Trust.
_	In 1521, the Chinese detained a Portuguese diplomatic mission in Guangzhou and offered their freedom on the condition that the Portuguese returned Malacca, which had been a Ming tributary, to the Sultan.
_	As the Navy was initially uninterested in a steam and sail propeller ship, Normand demarched the Ministry of Finance, who agreed to commission "Napoléon" as a mail steamer under the condition that she would reach a speed of 8 knots; during her trials, "Napoléon" maintained an average speed or 9.7 knots and reached 12, largely exceeding ministerial specifications.
_	When the Inhumans seek aid from the Kree against the Skrull's Secret Invasion, Ronan agrees on the condition that the Inhuman princess, Crystal, marries him.
_	Lazer agreed, on the condition that the store be closed Saturdays in observance of the Sabbath.
_	Following the protests of Hori Te Whetuki on behalf of Ngāi Tai, in 1854 the Commission granted a "Native Reservation" of just over at Duders Beach (Umupuia) to "the chiefs of the Ngatitai" and paid them £500 compensation, on the condition that they sign an agreement to vacate all other lands within the original purchase boundaries, and order all other iwi to do the same.
_	Eventually, under a legal agreement with the foundation which recognized Tracy's partner entitlement to some security after their life-long relationship, he received $600,000, paid in small installments with the condition that he could not talk publicly about their relationship, write a book or sell this information to the media during his lifetime.
_	This was done on the condition that she stay away from the court and live at the Val-de-Grâce convent of her childhood.
_	Instead, Cato offered his own wife, Marcia, on the condition that Marcia's father, Lucius Marcius Philippus, approve as well.
_	Their most controversial action on behalf of civil rights was their offer of Barnett Newman's "Broken Obelisk" as a partial gift to the city of Houston in 1969, on the condition that it be dedicated to the recently assassinated Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. The city refused the gift, sparking a controversial debate that involved John de Menil proposing that the sculpture be inscribed with the Biblical quote "Forgive them for they know not what they do."
_	Much to the surprise of the Byzantines, Maria then entered in negotiations with Ivaylo and offered him her hand and the Bulgarian crown on the condition that he would guarantee the rights of Michael Asen as his sole successor.
_	After locating him, McPhatter was then signed to Atlantic on the condition that he form his own group.
_	Amar returns from abroad and is asked by his multi-millionaire dad, Sonachand, to assist with their family business; Amar agrees to do so, on the condition that he could spend the rest of the evening and night doing what he likes - painting.
_	The group asked Bert to rejoin, and he agreed, on the condition that he would not be fired again after the tour's conclusion.
_	In March 2013, the Competition Bureau approved a proposal by Bell Media to acquire Astral Media, under the condition that it divest itself of several television services and radio stations.
_	So when we came up with 'Naya Pakistan', I asked him that this is the chance that's not going to come again so finally Junaid accepted the offer with the condition that he will sing only the opening lines with no music at all." and further added "it signifies the metaphor for unity as we have to compromise for unity in hope of Naya Pakistan."
_	Keaton and Ryder agreed to do the film, on the condition that Burton directed, but both he and Keaton became distracted with "Batman Returns".
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of 20 seats, with the remaining 29 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in any given province did not exceed three times that of any other.
_	Lord Fairfax devised his property and title to Denny Martin on the condition that he apply to the Parliament of Great Britain for an act to authorize him to inherit the title of Lord Fairfax of Cameron.
_	Shakthi accepts on the condition that both he and Shruti are hired together.
_	The Court added that ""Hotchkiss", by positing the condition that a patentable invention evidence more ingenuity and skill than that possessed by an ordinary mechanic acquainted with the business, merely distinguished between new and useful innovations that were capable of sustaining a patent and those that were not."
_	Gold back his dagger because she believes in him, but on the condition that he promises not to use it to kill Zelena.
_	Mahmud agreed to help them on the condition that they would mention his name in the Friday sermons (Khutbah), which would signify their acknowledgment of his suzerainty.
_	At that time, he also made an alliance with Duke Władysław of Opole, who promised to help Henry IV with the condition that his daughter (perhaps called Constance), who had recently married Henry IV, was crowned with him as Polish queen if he would obtain the royal investiture.
_	The IOC agreed to provisionally accept the East German National Olympic Committee with the condition that East and West Germans compete on one team.
_	There he was pardoned and granted life, on the condition that he would never again meddle in politics.
_	After accepting federal money to perform the sterilizations of 18 Medicaid patients in his clinic, he told women that he would only deliver their third pregnancy on the condition that they would submit to sterilization immediately afterwards.
_	Following escalating economic sanctions over apartheid, negotiations between the NP-led government led by P. W. Botha and the outlawed ANC led by then-imprisoned Nelson Mandela began in 1987 with Botha seeking to accommodate the ANC's demands and consider releasing Mandela and legalizing the ANC on the condition that it would renounce use of political violence to attain its aims.
_	Since unitarity of a theory is necessary for its consistency (it is a very natural assumption, although recently questioned), the term is sometimes also used as a synonym for consistency, and is sometimes used for other necessary conditions for consistency, especially the condition that the Hamiltonian is bounded from below.
_	In 1921, the DDSS's lease on the ground ran out, and the ground was sold by its owner, the Duke of Portland, on the condition that it would only ever be used for sporting purposes.
_	The right to create the musical adaptation came with the condition that it had to be based on the original book.
_	Not wanting to sink to Gaston's level of behavior, the Beast decides to show mercy and spare Gaston on the condition that he immediately leave the castle.
_	Deanna Monroe (Tovah Feldshuh) agrees on the condition that she can attend her party.
_	He was prevailed upon to serve as an officer of the organization, but on the condition that he not be required to preside at public meetings.
_	In 1976, the first Special Assessment District legislation was passed, noting that the city would make capital improvements for an area under the condition that property owners would maintain them, the first Special Assessment District was Fulton Mall in Brooklyn.
_	The Vatican raised a massive aid campaign for famine relief in Russia, and the Soviet government permitted the Vatican to send its help, under the condition that it did not engage in any proselytization in Russia and that the priests who would come would be dressed and made to appear as though they were secular relief workers.
_	Judge Sabraw said the time limit for reunifying the youngest children could be extended under the condition that the government would provide a master list of all children and the status of their parents.
_	She agreed to let the film be sold in Egypt under the condition that the name of Jesus not appear in the title to avoid inflaming Muslim radicals.
_	The Legislature gave four lots on Lady Street to the Presbyterian and Episcopal congregations with the condition that they pay half their value to the Baptist and Methodist congregations to assist in construction of their churches.
_	In an attempt to plead to him, he excuses her to visit her world one last time, with the condition that she never sees her lover again.
_	Fatimids had attempted to make peace, on the condition that the Crusaders do not continue towards Jerusalem, but this was ignored; Iftikhar ad-Daula, the Fatimid governor of Jerusalem, was aware of the Crusaders' intentions.
_	The negotiations ended with the condition that only sales with settlers would be taxed.
_	The Swansea Valley Railway Bill was passed in Parliament on 2 July 1847, but with the condition that it could not be sold on to the South Wales Railway until at last half of the authorised capital had been raised and expended on construction.
_	The probability that the red ball is not taken in the second draw, under the condition that it was not taken in the first draw, is 999/1999 ≈ ½.
_	The probability that the red ball is not taken in the third draw, under the condition that it was not taken in the first two draws, is 998/1998 ≈ ½.
_	When Jorkin, who does not appear at all in Dickens's original story, is discovered to be an embezzler, the opportunistic Scrooge and Marley offer to compensate the company's losses on the condition that they receive control of the company for which they work – and so, "Scrooge and Marley" is born.
_	Jared agreed, on the condition that Akish "will bring unto me the head of my father, the king."
_	From 1 January 1981, scheduled buses were also exempt from tolls, under the condition that the funds saved were used by the bus companies to strengthen public transport on Sotra.
_	In the Hasan–Muawiya treaty, Hasan ibn Ali handed over power to Muawiya on the condition that he would be just to the people and not establish a dynasty after his death.
_	Husna agrees on the condition that Zara drive the car.
_	He sold tombstones and did other odd work, until he was hired in 1938 as a staff worker for the Steel Workers Organizing Committee, on the condition that he leave the Communist Party of Canada and join the Co-operative Commonwealth Federation.
_	By morning 3 September certain few Germans who were in good relationship with their Polish neighbors started warning them to hide as "something bad will happen in the city", offering them shelter under the condition that they must hide by 10 AM in the morning, but stated they can't disclose details on what will take place.
_	Brownlow agrees not to send him to prison, on the condition that he make financial restitution and reveal all to Oliver and Rose Fleming.
_	The following week, during the Slammy Awards, Barrett would rehire Cena, who would have been kicked out by the other members of Nexus had he not, under the condition that Cena would face Barrett in a Chairs match.
_	Section 108 prohibits states from establishing laws that would prevent any employers that are allowed an exclusion of gross income, a deduction, or a tax credit for the federal income tax for health benefits from automatically enrolling employees in a group health plan, on the condition that employees are to be enrolled in the plan with the lowest premiums, and that employees are given the option to opt out of auto-enrollment for the employer-sponsored plan.
_	After "Raw" went off the air, the Raw General Manager announced a WWE Championship match between the two, on the condition that R-Truth apologize for his behavior the next week.
_	The Celestials took notice of Franklin's creation and initially demanded that he now eliminate one of the two universes, but finally relented on the condition that all beings native to Earth-616 evacuate the pocket universe and never return.
_	Barney offers to help Marshall on the condition that Marshall's son has the middle name "Wait-for-It".
_	A holy man, Kardam Muni, made a pact with Vishnu that he would undergo the rigours of marital life, on the condition that Vishnu would incarnate as his son.
_	The beginning [of the D&QR project] was hopeful enough, but the cost exceeded what was expected, and the result of an amalgamation of the local company with the North British, on the condition that the latter completed the unfinished works, was that the shareholders lost considerably by the bargain.
_	Adler, exhausted from his Russian trip, was often leaving his nights unused, and Thomashefsky offered to buy him out for $10,000 on the condition that he would not return to performing in New York.
_	Due to all this, the French king agreed to the marriage of Margaret to his rival on the condition that he would not have to provide the customary dowry and instead would receive the lands of Maine and Anjou from the English.
_	The Board of Education sanctioned these changes on the condition that new classrooms be added to the Council school to accommodate Senior pupils and a new Infants' department be erected at the site.
_	The "dina" (= "law of the land") was the only extraneous element that was incorporated into the halakhic law structure, the foundation of jurisdictional autonomy of Jewish communities, and applies to raising taxes, duties and imposts, on the condition that the exacter is fully authorized and does not exact more than what he is entitled to exact, as also to a government's right to determine ways of commerce.
_	After a visit from Dr. Hellion, Piper eventually agrees to reside in the academy and board, on the condition that she does not fly.
_	In March 2007, Andalusia gave assent for the excavation to start with the condition that Spanish archeologists would take part in the excavation in order to ascertain that the shipwreck to be excavated is indeed the "Sussex" and not a Spanish galleon.
_	Postcardware, also called just cardware, is a style of software distribution similar to shareware, distributed by the author on the condition that users send the author a postcard.
_	A modular function is a function that, like a modular form, is invariant with respect to the modular group, but without the condition that be holomorphic at infinity.
_	He had been working as a scout for the Chicago Cardinals and was in his third year of medical school; he agreed to come back on the condition that he would only practice once a week so he could continue his studies.
_	In 1850, the British Parliament passed an act that permitted the Australian colonies to establish legislative councils that were one-third nominated and two-thirds elected, but only under the condition that the colonies take responsibility for the costs of their own government.
_	This is equivalent to the condition that the preimage under "f" of every down-set of "B" is a down-set of "A".
_	In another version of the legend, the devil made a deal with the builder to finance construction of the church on the condition that it contain no windows.
_	In 1956, Laurance Rockefeller donated his extensive lands on the island to the United States' National Park Service, under the condition that the lands had to be protected from future development.
_	After much pleading and assurance, the leopard frees him with the condition that he will see the animal on his return journey.
_	The song's composer, Frank Loesser, gave them permission to parody the tune with the condition that the label read, "With apologies to Frank Loesser".
_	The Australians agreed to the substitution on the condition that Chapman did not field near the batsmen.
_	In December 1860, Peisley gained his ticket of leave, on the condition that he remain in the Hunter River Valley area.
_	Aggravated, Smoke finally agrees to race Kid, under the condition that whoever loses will never race again.
_	Bullen agreed to write the final episodes on the condition that there would be just four, and that he could kill off a character.
_	Bristow started sponsoring him by loaning him £10,000 later that year to help him get started as a professional darts player and on the condition that he give up his job in the ceramic industry.
_	Then "V" is called "k"-normal if the global sections of "O"("k") map surjectively to those of "O"("k"), for a given "k"; if "V" is 1-normal it is called linearly normal, and projective normality is the condition that "V" is "k"-normal for all "k" ≥ 1. Linear normality may be said geometrically: "V" as projective variety cannot be obtained by an isomorphic linear projection from a projective space of higher dimension, except in the trivial way of lying in a proper linear subspace.
_	The emperor made the condition that Christian was to get rid of Sigbrit, which Christian agreed to.
_	They agree only on the condition that she be fettered like a criminal (so if anyone should take them to task for breaking their orders, they would have an excuse).
_	This was given on the condition that they would continue to promote Christianity and bring the relic to the burial site of St. Olaf.
_	Fulgida (Blávus) agrees to marry Soldán of Serkland on the condition that Rósida, Soldán's daughter, be bridesmaid.
_	However, she stipulated the condition that they should only be together until he struck her three times without cause, upon which she would leave him forever, and to this he readily agreed.
_	The 38 acre property was sold to the State of Maryland on 22 July 1938 on the condition that the property would not be resold to competition to generate electricity or be developed in the future.
_	Gandhi agreed to inscribe his name on the case on the condition that it never be used again to carry cigarettes.
_	Tommy asks his father to help him train for the tournament, but only under the condition that Paddy does not try to reconcile their relationship.
_	Lacan's practice (with its controversial indeterminate-length sessions) and his critical stance towards psychoanalytic orthodoxy led, in August 1963, to the IPA setting the condition that registration of the SFP was dependent upon the removal of Lacan from the list of SFP analysts.
_	Her father accepted the marriage proposal on the condition that she be secured the right to practice her faith in Sweden which was then ruled by Charles' brother John III, who was known for his Catholic sympathies.
_	Simon hinted the identity to a variety of talk shows and publications over the years and, on August 5, 2003, auctioned off the information to the winner of a charity function for US$50,000, with the condition that the winner, television executive Dick Ebersol, not reveal it.
_	This case helped solidify the condition that any law that inhibits freedom of speech must have an important and compelling interest to do so.
_	Gerakaris accepted on the condition that he was given the title "His Highness, the Ruler of Mani" and that an amnesty was given to all the people of Greece.
_	The affected lands were conveyed to the state under the condition that interest in the lands would revert to BLM if the state stopped using the land for certain agricultural purposes.
_	On 10 March Lake's wife was temporarily freed from the Tower "because of her ill health, under the condition that at the beginning of term she be returned unless she has made her submission".
_	In 2004, the Tamil Nadu politician M Karunanidhi offered support to the Manmohan Singh Government on the condition that the Central government would declare Tamil as a Classical language.
_	On 25 June 1800, Prince Giulio Maria Tomasi leased Lampedusa in perpetual emphyteusis to Salvatore Gatt, a Maltese merchant, on the condition that the latter would build two coastal watchtowers at "Cala della Galere" and "Cala della Madonna".
_	With the "Resolutions" rejected, Charles presented the Commons with an alternative; he was willing to allow them to pass a bill confirming "Magna Carta" and six other liberty-related statutes, on the condition that such a bill contained "no enlargement of former bills".
_	Immediately on returning to Britain, Daltrey was sacked, but was reinstated on the condition that the group became a democracy without his dominant leadership.
_	By 1825, Mexico and the Coahuila y Tejas territory legalized immigration under the condition that settlers convert to Roman Catholicism and not own slaves.
_	In number theory, the Chinese hypothesis is a disproven conjecture stating that an integer "n" is prime if and only if it satisfies the condition that 2−2 is divisible by "n"—in other words, that integer "n" is prime if and only if formula_1.
_	Antoninus was adopted by Hadrian on the condition that Verus and Hadrian’s great-nephew Marcus Aurelius be adopted by Antoninus as his sons and heirs.
_	In February that same year, he notified the Ottoman Empire that the United Kingdom would maintain friendly relations with the Turks only under the condition that the latter respected the Christian subjects of the Empire.
_	Convicted in Windsor, Burdi was able to avoid a jail sentence with the condition that he not be involved with RaHoWa or Resistance Records.
_	God consented on the condition that Moses treat Joshua as Joshua had treated Moses.
_	He accepts his assignment with the condition that his men will be separated from a group of veteran artillerymen, who practice intense cruelty as punishment for the slightest offenses.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province did not exceed two times that of any other.
_	When the City of Auburn was given control over the school in April 1874, it came with the condition that the school always be named in honor of Edward Little.
_	He accepted it on the condition that he would be allowed to spare Sasuke.
_	This proposal was approved by the South African government on the condition that only a small, covert task force would be permitted.
_	Stewart and Argyll had only protected Hepburn's palace-abbey on the condition that the latter aided them with men and arms, and with a vote against the clergy in Parliament.
_	The war ended in a ceasefire, but the Isomage still had enough power to force a treaty with the Sidhe; he seems to have been on the humans' side and made them agree to allow the humans to live in peace, with the condition that the Isomage go into exile.
_	Shahmeran agreed on the condition that the location of the garden would be kept secret.
_	After Kruger rejected the British proposal of a joint commission on the franchise law, Smuts and Reitz proposed a five-year retroactive franchise and the extension of a quarter of the volksraad seats to the Witwatersrand region, on the condition that Britain drop any claim to suzerainty.
_	Following the protests of Hori Te Whetuki on behalf of Ngāi Tai, in 1854 the Commission granted a "Native Reservation" of just over at Duders Beach (Umupuia) to "the chiefs of the Ngatitai" and paid them £500 compensation, on the condition that they sign an agreement to vacate all other lands within the original purchase boundaries, and order all other iwi to do the same.
_	The sanctuary was established in 1969 after the island was donated to the province by Elsie Alexandra Carolyn Grosvenor Myers, on the condition that it be established as a sanctuary.
_	Estigarribia did so on the condition that he would surrender only to the Brazilian Emperor, as he did not trust his fellow republicans from Argentina and Uruguay.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of 13 seats, with the remaining 28 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in the most populated province did not exceed 2.75 times that of the least populated one.
_	Under the condition that he would eventually come back to finish his undergraduate degree, Lee's parents granted him a permission to pursue music career in Korea.
_	The protection was granted on the condition that the leaders were immediately baptised as Christians and that they would encourage their people also to convert to Christianity; the Portuguese would also gain a strategic foothold and control of the pearl fisheries.
_	March 1921 by Colonial Secretary Winston Churchill, then Britain's Colonial Secretary, and lasted until 30 March; the conference was to endorse an arrangement whereby Transjordan would be added to the Palestine mandate, with Abdullah as the emir under the authority of the High Commissioner, and with the condition that the Jewish National Home provisions of the Palestine mandate would not apply there.
_	Athena said that she would only aid them on the condition that the Amazons not seek retribution against Heracles and his men as that would be beneath the ideals the Amazons were created to stand for.
_	Following — and apparently related to — these events the condition that came to be known as "the process" started to affect him, in September and October that year, as a regular, almost nightly occurrence.
_	Eventually, Gronw agrees to receive the blow on the condition that he may place a large stone between himself and Lleu, who allows him to do so before throwing the spear with such strength that it pierces the stone, killing his rival.
_	Her only brother, John (died 1784), a Commodore in the Bombay Marine, left his estate to John Paul on the condition that he assume Macgregor as his surname, which he did.
_	However, the following year, Georgia became the first state to pass a statute legitimizing children conceived by donor insemination, on the condition that both the husband and wife consented in advance in writing to the procedure.
_	Upon his return Beaumont offered to give of 16 his paintings to Lord Liverpool's government on the condition that they buy the collection of John Julius Angerstein, and that a suitable building be found to house these works of art.
_	Nevertheless, the jail sentence was linked to the condition that on his release Szende should leave the country.
_	Since Caleb insists that the PHC Moot Court team will provide him with the best training for working in her law firm, Judith agrees to pay for education on the condition that he wins the Moot Court National Championship.
_	Gia, as always persuades Jack to do some fix-its, on the condition that he does not risk too much.
_	which is the algebraic equivalent of the condition that the fixed pivot G lies on the perpendicular bisectors of each of the four segments W-W, i=2, ..., 5.
_	Among the cast was Ettore Elio Aricò who had appeared in a previous film of Polselli's provided most of the budget for the film by himself on the condition that he was cast as the protagonist .
_	After that point, some stations that affiliated with Fox in the weeks before the April 1987 launch of its prime time lineup (such as WCGV-TV (channel 24) in Milwaukee and WDRB-TV (channel 41) in Louisville) signed affiliation agreements with the network on the condition that they would not have to carry "The Late Show" due to the program's weak ratings.
_	She agrees, but only on the condition that Conor may go too.
_	In the same year Froda proved that, in the case that the conjecture is true, the condition that the function is defined on the whole plane is indispensable.
_	Canada refused to do this, (38) on the condition that Taiwan compete in the Olympics without reference to the word "China," a condition that applied to Taiwan's participation in the 1960 Games in Rome.
_	The Dabhade family was allowed to continue collecting "chauth" from Gujarat on the condition that they would deposit half the collections in the Chhattrapati Shahu's treasury.
_	Meg and her mother agree to give her the land entitlement for their old property plus another 10 acres (40,000 m2) on the condition that she never approaches her son, Joey, or tries to get him back.
_	A second consequence is that the missing person's life policies are paid out to the beneficiaries, on the condition that "cautio de restituendo" be provided.
_	In 1935 she was offered the chance by SS Head Heinrich Himmler to continue her film career under the Third Reich on the condition that as an Aryan she divorced her assimilated Jewish husband (he was baptised as a Lutheran at the age of 14 in 1895 under the oversight of his older sister's husband, the research chemist Prof Arnold Carl Reissert), but instead fled with her son to join her husband in Britain.
_	To Whittemore's surprise, Camp agreed to coach the team himself, on the condition that he finish the season at Yale first.
_	In 1384, Louis' 10-year-old daughter Jadwiga was crowned King of Poland, upon the condition that the Polish-Hungarian Union was dissolved.
_	According to Pliny the Younger, in his will Afer had made Titius Marcellus Curvius Lucanus and Titius Marcellus Curvius Tullus his heirs on the condition that they take on his name.
_	In the Treaty of Utrecht, Philip V of Spain renounced his right of succession to the French throne on the condition that the semi-Salic law of succession should be instituted in Spain.
_	Roqua agrees to take Jake as a pupil, but under the condition that Jake refrains from fighting outside of the gym which Jake agrees to, despite knowing he wishes to confront Ryan anyway.
_	Tarus agrees to oust the Toonolians on the condition that Ras reform and cease trafficking in bodies.
_	In ancient Assyrian philosophy Creation in general was considered as a covenant between heaven and earth as long as a human serves the gods till his death, therefore, gods' happiness isn't complete except if humans are happy as well, thus a human's destiny will be to be given happiness on the condition that he serves the gods.
_	JJ offers him membership on the condition that he steals his daddy's car.
_	As a result, King Henry VIII consented to re-endow St. Bartholomew's Hospital in 1544 and St. Thomas’ Hospital in 1552 on the condition that the citizens of London pay for their maintenance.
_	After the Thaksin family sold its shares in Shin Corp to Singapore's Temasek Holdings, the company offered to drop the lawsuit on the condition that Supinya apologise for her comments.
_	In 1796 Moldenhawer purchased his collection for the Royal Danish Library on the condition that the payment would continue in the form of an annuity for Suhm and his wife, but both died shortly after the purchase was completed.
_	The album proved successful enough that EMI Records approached Foggo shortly afterwards to record an album for their label under the condition that the music wasn't ska, as the genre was at its commercial nadir at the time.
_	However, Rocket's father and Aarch's brother does not want him on the team, and agree only to let him play on the condition that the newly named Snow Kids win a match against the incumbent Akillian team, the Red Tigers, who are coached by Aarch's estranged old friend and team-mate, Artegor Nexus.
_	Lauren accepts, on the condition that she gets seven minutes in heaven with him, though it is later revealed that she became bored with Puck's kissing style after three minutes.
_	UNMOT's mandate was extended on the condition that Tehran Agreement remained in effect and commitments to other agreements were reached.
_	Their most controversial action on behalf of civil rights was their offer of Barnett Newman's "Broken Obelisk" as a partial gift to the city of Houston in 1969, on the condition that it be dedicated to the recently assassinated Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. The city refused the gift, sparking a controversial debate that ended only when the de Menils purchased the sculpture themselves and placed it in front of the newly completed Rothko Chapel.
_	Parabolic subgroups "P" are also characterized, among algebraic subgroups, by the condition that "G"/"P" is a complete variety.
_	Gantu agrees on the condition that Reuben be assigned as his galley officer.
_	On April 20, 1870, the society sent its members Robert White and Andrew Wodrow Kercheval to the then-state capital of Wheeling to offer "the grounds and buildings of the Romney Classical Institute... to the Board of Regents, free of debt, and in good repair" on the condition that the proposed institution be located at Romney.
_	When Ruebush learned that the museum could not accommodate the washer in its cramped facilities, he donated $6000 to acquire the armory on the condition that his donation be matched through local fundraising.
_	In 1843 the society was reformed within the college after a student petition, again on the condition that no subject of current politics was debated.
_	Initially this had been accepted by the municipal council in 1898, on the condition that KSS pay a rent of 5,000 Norwegian krone (NOK) per year.
_	In January 1882, Robert Ford and Liddil surrendered to Sheriff James Timberlake for Hite's murder, on the condition that they would receive pardons and a reward.
_	On 26 July 1579, he received the field mark Zamborst (Samborsko) from Duke John Frederick as a fief, under the condition that he would build a village in the area.
_	Although he knew Taylor and they possibly were friends, Coolidge appointed Jardine on the condition that he get rid of Taylor.
_	In season 5, he temporarily took over Hotch's position as Unit Chief while serial killer and nemesis George Foyet was on the loose, on the condition that Hotch be reinstated once Foyet was captured.
_	During this time they receive financial assistance on the condition that they meet reservist requirements, maintain military standards, and agree to serve on active duty as physicians.
_	Eventually, Gronw agrees to receive the blow on the condition that he may place a large stone between himself and Lleu.
_	When she agreed to do so, they said that they will accept her alms on the condition that she serves them without wearing clothes.
_	Concoreto had issued an order suspending Mepham from presiding at Divine Services on 22 January 1333 with the condition that should the Archbishop continue to refuse to resist the will of the Pope and court he was to be excommunicated 30 Days later.
_	David did however, according to the contract, permit gang members to leave the gang, but only under the condition that they scrape their BTK tattoos off their skin and leave the vicinity of New York altogether and never return.
_	Marie accepts the offer on the condition that Michaelangelo teaches acting to a young group of street performers.
_	Bullen agreed to write the final episodes on the condition that there would be just four, and that he could kill off a character.
_	He was released by Mephisto on the condition that he cared for Mephisto's pet, Cerberus.
_	Béla III had bequeathed estates and money to Emeric's younger brother, Andrew, under the condition that Andrew should lead a crusade to the Holy Land.
_	When Cha-Ka arrives, he convinces Ta (and Sa) to help on the condition that afterward he will complete the portrait.
_	While refusing to assume dictatorship, Sleževičius agreed to take over as the prime minister, on the condition that his government be granted full legislative powers.
_	Sequenzia was then hired by Interpublic Group's Draft Worldwide Draft Worldwide (now DraftFCB) as executive vice president, executive creative director of Draft NY, under the condition that he run, then shut down their now fledgling acquisition of Marketing Corporation of America through the end of the buyout term of eighteen months.
_	Zadig makes a vow to accompany the hermit for the next few days on the condition that he won't abandon the hermit no matter what he does.
_	At first he was denied entry by the Italian government but eventually was allowed to land, on the condition that he proceed immediately to the Swiss border.
_	He proposed marriage, and she agreed on the condition that she be left alone every Saturday.
_	The Board voted to include an underground station at Leimert Park and approved the station only under the condition that the entire project can be completed within its original budget.
_	The order was met with a flat refusal by Captain Stephenson, who argued that "[every] officer and man on the river defense expedition joined it on the condition that it was to be independent of the Navy."
_	The Council approved Lamb's release in early 1973 on the condition that he spend a year living and working under the supervision of one of Oak Ridge's top psychiatrists, Elliot Barker.
_	She helps him on the condition that he will lose his evil manners, and the two start making money recycling cans.
_	Ehrlichman approved under the condition that it be "done under your assurance that it is not traceable."
_	Sixteen weeks of maternity leave are on the condition that the employee was employed for 236 weeks by the 15th week before the first week of leave.
_	He received a pardon after two years on the condition that two men put up two hundred dollars, and that he agree not to fight for two years.
_	Following a suggestion by Pigou (1912, p. 24), Dalton proposed the condition that a transfer of income from a richer to a poorer person, so long as that transfer does not reverse the ranking of the two, will result in greater equity (Dalton, p. 351).
_	For breaking the condition that she not wear men's clothing again, Joan is convicted as a "relapsed heretic."
_	When Gilbert Dethick, the Lord of the Manor of Poplar, died in 1639 he left a further £100 towards the building of the chapel, on the condition that work started within three years of his death.
_	The name of the town was changed in the 1850s, when a doctor named William Hendrick settled there on the condition that the town would rename itself after his hometown, Phelps, New York, then known as Vienna.
_	In 1960 her sister May sold her "Denver Post" stock to newspaper baron Samuel Irving Newhouse Jr. on the condition that the stock could never be resold to Helen.
_	Political connections of the Barnette family saw the sentence commuted after one year, on the condition that Barnette never return to Oregon.
_	On 23 November 2011 the tax passed through the lower house with the support of the Greens and Wilkie.<ref name="Herald Sun 23/11/11"></ref> Independent MP Tony Windsor supported the Bill on the condition that a committee be set up to independently assess the environmental risks posed by coal seam gas extraction.
_	Bres is found alive in the aftermath of the battle, and is spared on the condition that he teach the Tuatha Dé Danann how to plough, sow and reap.
_	The city gave the building to JHS on the condition that it be restored, but according to the JHS website, many people thought that the condition of the structure was beyond repair.
_	"Yes indeed, in late December 2008, the prime ministers of Russia and Ukraine came to agreement, and our companies were ready to seal the deal for $235 per 1000 cubic meters of natural gas with the condition that all the export operations from Ukraine will be done bilaterally.
_	Suswani agreed to marry him with the condition that she will stand 7 feet in distance from the Nawab and he has to catch her then she will marry him.
_	In March 2007, Andalusia gave its assent for the excavation to start with the condition that Spanish archaeologists take part in order to ascertain that the shipwreck to be excavated was indeed the "Sussex" and not a Spanish vessel.
_	In September 1984 the MPLA presented a plan calling for the retreat of all Cubans to positions north of the 13th parallel and then to the 16th parallel, again on the condition that South Africa pulled out of Namibia and respected Resolution 435.
_	Hino did not originally believe that his team could become an independent developer, he formed a partnership with Sony Computer Entertainment, who would allow him to develop for their upcoming PlayStation 2 under the condition that he set up his own company.
_	Al-Ma'mun agreed to recognize him as governor, on the condition that Bishr send a million dirhams in tribute to him on an annual basis.
_	Fr. Grol then envisioned the establishment of a school for boys with the blessing of the Bishop and the financial assistance of Don Andres Soriano (co-owner of BBLI) who readily accepted the idea on the condition that the proposed boys' high school would be put up in Brgy.
_	She was admitted under the condition that she make up the missing course content, which she did before her sophomore year.
_	The case was subsequently resolved with the MPAA granting The Weinstein Company permission to add Daniels' name in front of the title, under the condition that his name was "75% the size of "The Butler".
_	The exception was the "Grand Ball" held by the peers of Scotland to entertain the king: Scott's "Hints" called this a "Highland Ball", reminded readers that the king had ordered a kilt and set the condition that, unless in uniform, "no Gentleman is to be allowed to appear in any thing but the ancient Highland costume".
_	Da Style had agreed on the condition that if Rixon and Tal lost, Rixon would have to join the agency.
_	Once the boy finds him, the Once-ler agrees to tell Ted about the trees on the condition that he listens to the story over multiple visits.
_	The sentence was later changed by the supreme court and his life was spared on the condition that he left the country for good.
_	Spector declined "Don't Worry Baby", but accepted "Don't Hurt My Little Sister" on the condition that he rewrite the song as "Things Are Changing (for the Better)".
_	A day later, she sent another telegram authorizing the production on the condition that she be allowed to work with Hughes on changes.
_	Levada allowed Baccellieri to return to duty in 1994 after he had undergone therapy and with the condition that he couldn't be around children and couldn't counsel adults or children.
_	Palmer reorganized the regiment, personally appointed officers in whose abilities he had great trust, and had the charges against the confined soldiers dropped on the condition that they behaved going forward.
_	The Treaty of Utrecht (1713) had recognised the grandson of King Louis XIV of France, Philip, as the King of Spain on the condition that he gave up his rights to succeed to the French throne.
_	On May 21, Delgado was released with the condition that he visited the courthouse every Monday.
_	In the 2008 miniseries "John Adams", Rutledge was portrayed by Clancy O'Connor, where his vote for independence is portrayed as contingent not upon the removal of the clause on slavery from the Declaration, but on the condition that there would be no votes in opposition to the motion on independence, a condition which Adams assures him will be fulfilled.
_	Tony acquiesced, on the condition that Feech not step on anybody's toes.
_	With most of the LNC's business being operated by road, an agreement on 13 May 1946 allowed the LNC to make use of SR services from Waterloo to Brookwood station for funerals, subject to the condition that should the service be heavily used the SR (British Railways after 1948) reserved the right to restrict the number of funeral parties on any given train.
_	According to Bob Gale, Jack Warden had initially passed on the role of Roy Fuchs but agreed to play the role under the condition that he be able to play Luke Fuchs, since he was interested in playing the role of both brothers.
_	Furthermore, free land was offered to those who wanted to immigrate to the two islands on the condition that they swear loyalty to the Spanish Crown and allegiance to the Roman Catholic Church.
_	He was suspended by the Football Federation and would be allowed to return on the condition that he would apologize to the Lebanese F.A. and its national team coach for the critical stance.
_	A special law must be adopted by both the Chamber of Representatives and the Senate in accordance with Article 4, last paragraph, of the Belgian Constitution, which provides that a special law requires a majority of votes cast in both the Dutch-speaking and the French-speaking language group, on the condition that an absolute majority of the members of each language group is present, and the total number of votes in favour in both language groups must constitute a supermajority of two-thirds of the total number of votes cast.
_	He was given a minor noble rank ("Syn boyarsky" of Ilimsk) on the condition that he return to Siberia.
_	In 1729 he married Elizabeth Orde, illegitimate daughter of Sir William Blackett, 2nd Baronet who on his death in 1728 had bequeathed his estate to Calverley, his nephew, on the condition that he marry Elizabeth and assume the additional surname of Blackett.
_	A compromise was reached, and the Grand Duke and his wife would live in Schwerin for five months and could stay wherever they wanted for the rest of the year, on the condition that their children were to be born in Schwerin.
_	However, if we impose the condition that the slopes match as well then we must have
_	"KATU" reported that Edward Morrissey agreed to plead guilty to money laundering on the condition that Mary Manin Morrissey not be charged with a crime.
_	He accepted, under the condition that all the parishes agreed to this suggestion.
_	Papademos stated that his government's primary task would be to facilitate the financial bailout from the European Union - which was provided on the condition that severe budget austerity be implemented - and to lead the country until elections could be held.
_	In 2006, it was revealed that Barbara Bush donated an undisclosed amount of money to the Bush–Clinton Katrina Fund on the condition that the charity do business with an educational software company owned by her son Neil Bush.
_	He agreed to the plan on the condition that all three Russian armies coordinate their attack.
_	The property was acquired by William Ross Mackenzie in 1943 with the condition that Margaret Rosser could continue to reside at Whyembah until her death.
_	She was freed in 1358/59, thanks to the efforts of her stepmother, on the condition that she renounce her rights to Majorca.
_	Section 2 provides that, should a party apply to the High Court with either the consent of the arbitrator or the other parties, the High Court may explain any point of law given in the reference, on the condition that the point of law meets the requirements laid out in Section 1, and if "the determination of the application might produce substantial savings in costs to the parties".
_	In Season 2 he is back to working in a mine and living with Ava on the condition that he has no part in illegal activities.
_	Spottiswoode was hired to direct the film by Sandy Howard on the condition that he also edit the film (though Anne Henderson was later brought in to edit).
_	where Hardy's function "Z" and the Riemann–Siegel theta function θ are uniquely defined by this and the condition that they are smooth real functions with θ(0)=0.
_	Under the provisions of an act of Congress approved April 23, 1904 and of Circular No. 34, War Department, July 29, 1904, the recruitment of native Puerto Rican civilians to be appointed the grade of second lieutenants for a term of four years was approved with the condition that they pass the required tests.
_	However, later, during the Esperanto reform period of 1894, Zamenhof complained that the reform movement had begun when the members of Einstein's Nuremberg club "gave up Volapük and became Esperantists, with the condition that the necessary (in their opinions) reforms would be made to Esperanto."
_	The woman agreed to give the knife as a present to the architect, and the architect returned all the money on the condition that the money would be spend for the poor.
_	By applying another equivalence transformation the condition that guarantees convergence of
_	It was built on land donated by the daughter of Horace Greeley, a prominent newspaper editor and presidential candidate who had moved to Chappaqua in the mid-19th century and been responsible for much of its early development, on the condition that a small park adjacent to the station be maintained.
_	They recorded their debut album "Ransom Note" in the United States under the guidance of producer Peter McIan (Men at Work, Mondo Rock) - in fact the band were signed with the condition that Peter McIan oversee the recording sessions.
_	On 27 April 1310, in what was certainly a peace gesture toward the French, Clement V pardoned Guillaume Nogaret for his offenses committed at Anagni against Boniface VIII and the Church, for which he had been excommunicated, with the condition that Nogaret personally go to the Holy Land in the next wave of soldiers and serve there in the military.
_	Ono supposedly had not heard of the Beatles, but relented on the condition that Lennon pay her five shillings, to which Lennon replied, "I'll give you an imaginary five shillings and hammer an imaginary nail in."
_	Recognition was to be done under the condition that the two Korean NOCs would agree to send a unified team to 1960 Summer Olympics in Rome, but the plans failed due to opposition by the South's Korean Olympic Committee.
_	The US also offered financial assistance as part of the Marshall Plan on the condition that they opened their markets to trade, aware that the Soviets would never agree.
_	The city eventually agreed to offer a demolition permit on the condition that the front drive way be preserved and the front façade, a sentiment that is still considered valid even though today the building was destroyed.
_	After the Storm King died, Trent was made king on the condition that he marry Sorceress Iris.
_	The clubs were also allowed to have foreign players on their teams, with the condition that these players should not constitute more than 30% of the team.
_	After learning the Scythian language, they agreed to marry Scythian men, on the condition that they not be required to follow the customs of Scythian women.
_	It is one of many unusual bequests listed in the will, along with giving a vacation home in Jamaica to a group of three men who detested each other under the condition that they live in the estate together indefinitely, brewery stocks to a group of prominent teetotal Protestant ministers if they participated in its operations and collected its dividends, and jockey club stocks to a group of anti-horse-racing advocates.
_	For example, Elizabeth King Ellicott, Martha Carey Thomas, Mary Garrett, Mary Gwinn, and Julia Rogers formed the Women's Fund Committee of the Johns Hopkins University and successfully negotiated that they would help raise money to build the new medical school on the condition that the school allow women to attend when it opened.
_	When formula_126, i.e., in the case of ordinary least squares, the condition that formula_127 causes the sample covariance matrix formula_71 to not have full rank and so it cannot be inverted to yield a unique solution.
_	On 6 February 2015, Dadji was arrested, but released later that day on the condition that she does not speak to the press about her arrest.
_	The Lucanian exiles sent messengers to their countrymen and promised that they would turn over Alexander, dead or alive, on the condition that they would be restored to their property.
_	They did so, on the condition that Edmonds sign a confidentiality agreement, so that he would never tell the press about certain details of the ordeal.
_	Then King Indradyumna, appointed Vishwakarma, the architect of gods, a Brahmin carpenter to carve the murti of the deity from a log which would eventually wash up on the shore at Puri. Indradyumna commissioned Vishwakarma (also said to be the divine god himself in disguise) who accepted the commission on the condition that he could complete the work undisturbed and in private.
_	Hawerchuk subsequently gave them permission to use his name on the condition that they "stay out of jail".
_	Messrs Allaway-Partridge gave £250 and a grant of £230 given by the 'Incorporated Society for Promoting the Enlargement, Building and Repairing of Churches and Chapels' on the condition that the seats were to be free for the use of the poor for ever.
_	Cleese and Bron agreed on the condition that there be no pre-publicity regarding their appearance; Cleese wanted them to be credited as "Helen Swanetsky" and "Kim Bread" but the BBC declined.
_	In a front-page article which appeared in "The New York Times" on January 19, 1942, Lewis claimed that he and Tobin had agreed to merge the AFL and CIO on the condition that William Green retire, George Meany become president, and Philip Murray accept demotion to secretary-treasurer.
_	In the earliest account of this episode, in a fragmentary Middle Kingdom papyrus, the sexual encounter begins when Set asks to have sex with Horus, who agrees on the condition that Set will give Horus some of his strength.
_	The Civil List Act 1837 applied the condition that any new pensions should be "granted to such persons only as have just claims on the royal beneficence or who by their personal services to the Crown, or by the performance of duties to the public, or by their useful discoveries in science and attainments in literature and the arts, have merited the gracious consideration of their sovereign and the gratitude of their country."
_	The channel 15 frequency is short-spaced to Belleville, Ontario's CBLFT and was approved on the condition that the effective radiated power of the U.S. station not exceed 100 kilowatts.
_	Ptolemy's intervention in Thessaly in 367 BC provoked another Theban invasion by Pelopidas, who was undermined when Ptolemy bribed his mercenaries not to fight, thus leading to a newly proposed alliance between Macedonia and Thebes, but only on the condition that more hostages, including one of his Ptolemy's sons, were to be handed over to Thebes.
_	He seduced a major who was attached to the San Francisco recruiting station on the condition that the major approve Sarria's enlistment.
_	In March 2018, the NYCDOE agreed to settle under the condition that it was required to report bullying incidents into an electronic system within one day, and that parents would also be able to submit school bullying complaints electronically.
_	Carrington owned the house for almost fifty years, then sold it to the US government as part of Fire Island National Seashore under the condition that he be able to live there for the rest of his life; he died on July 3, 1975.
_	Shishakli set the condition that any government had to include his right-hand-man, Fawzi Selu, as Minister for Defence, to curb Hashemite influence in the Syrian government.
_	Alvin Dixon was arrested for murder in the District of Columbia and released on bail, on the condition that he not commit any criminal offense, or he would be held in contempt of court.
_	When moving into the Forrester beach house, that Bill secretly bought, Katie discovers Bill's true motivations when she finds a DVD, in which Bill Spencer, Sr. promises his son half of Spencer Publications on the condition that Bill use the company to avenge Stephanie, whom he reveals to be his true love, by crushing Eric and taking away his company.
_	David renegotiates with Gurdlinger for a fee of $500,000 on the condition that it arrives that night.
_	Bhishma accepted on the condition that, while he would fight the battle sincerely, he would not harm the five Pandava brothers.
_	After the transaction Rufă has received the financial support of the Reșița Municipality, with the condition that the club must change its name, headquarters, colors and stadium.
_	Clinton offered clemency on the condition that the prisoners renounce violence, seeing as none of the 16 had been convicted of harming anyone and they had already served 19 years in prison.
_	She could hear her father speak in parliament but only on the condition that she heard it via a ventilation shaft.
_	On 13 July 1956, she was sold to Companhia Nacional de Navegacao Costerira, Patrimonio Nacional, of Brazil, for $693,682, under the condition that she be used for coastal shipping.
_	This patent was awarded to Carré on the condition that prices remained low and that glassmaking and blowing would be taught to native Englishmen to promote the craft.
_	Finally, the city council granted the property owners of First Street an electric streetcar line with the condition that they buy out the horsecar company.
_	When a black teenage girl who had been attending the church's youth group wished to join the church, youth director David Stone learned that the church was receiving $25,000 a year from a segregationist donor with the condition that no blacks could join.
_	Kenyatta accepted, probably on the condition that the Association matched his pre-existing wage.
_	The unrest reportedly ended on the same day; according to official sources, the soldiers surrendered on the condition that they would be protected by French peacekeeping forces.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of 20 seats, with the remaining 29 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in any given province did not exceed three times that of any other.
_	Nila complied with this request on the condition that the Manavas should follow his instructions revealed to him by Kesava.
_	The following year, they were permitted to play their home matches at Yanzigang Stadium in Guangzhou under the condition that all away teams' travelling expenses would be covered by R&F.
_	Noble then gathers the near-countless demons of Hell and announces that their imprisoned souls are now free, but under the condition that they do no more evil.
_	He persuaded Warners to give him a chance to direct, under the condition that his next script also became a hit.
_	As a consequence of the ISIL occupation, up to 200,000 Kurdish refugees fled from the Euphrates Region to Turkey, allowed in only under the condition that they leave vehicles or livestock behind.
_	Not to be deterred, Lynch advanced Paramount's share of the Southern Enterprises capital on the condition that he remain in control until the loan was repaid.
_	Mansfield was offered the film while she was shooting "The Sheriff of Fractured Jaw" in Spain; she agreed on the condition that her husband Mickey Hargitay played Hercules.
_	In thermodynamics, the limit of local stability with respect to small fluctuations is clearly defined by the condition that the second derivative of Gibbs free energy is zero.
_	Note that there are several more foldings, such as formula_39 and also some not of Lie type, but these violate the condition that the support generates the group.
_	After negotiations, the Deutsche Bahn announced to rise its share of the €8.2 million fund to €800,000 on the condition that the city of Bremerhaven would pay €600,000 to allow for the renovation of the entrance hall.
_	He agreed to put aside his private dealings on the condition that he could finish negotiating the sale of kauri timber leases upon the same land which the government wanted to buy.
_	which is equivalent to the condition that
_	Will takes on Ben in a waterslide race on the condition that the loser must strip naked.
_	Original settlers of Singngat Village who had left the place will be invited to resettle at Singngat by allotting house plots with the condition that each allotee shall construct a house within five years from the date of allotment.
_	Patentleft (also patent left, copyleft-style patent license or open patent) is the practice of licensing patents (especially biological patents) for royalty-free use, on the condition that adopters license related improvements they develop under the same terms.
_	Her case became famous, but it did not stop the development: already in 1751, another female noble, Marina Sagredo Pisani, opened a new casino, and in 1767 the Inquisition allowed noblewomen to frequent the casinos on the condition that they cover their faces.
_	After an intervention by the Jesuits in Quebec City, the drummer's sentence was commuted on the condition that he accept the position of New France's first permanent executioner.
_	Li agreed to return under the condition that Chiang surrender most of the gold and US dollars in his possession that belonged to the central government, and that Chiang stop overriding Li's authority.
_	Convincing the farmer, he is welcomed to stay overnight on the condition that he not touch the farmer's daughter, Rita, and "in the morning, milk the cow."
_	In 1847, Issac Hart Purdy agreed to allow the New York and Harlem Railroad to build their main line through the community for one dollar upon the condition that they establish a station within the community for both passengers and freight.
_	By the time Auðun crosses into Denmark, he has run out of provisions for himself and his bear, and a king's steward named Aki offers him help on the condition that he receives ownership of half the bear in return.
_	She is allowed to return to Palnu on the condition that she sign an admission of wrongdoing.
_	Kottmyer imposed two life sentences on the murder charges and ten years of probation on the firearms and ammunition charges, all to run concurrently, and the condition that he never profit from the sale of his story.
_	The Ottoman princess Adile Sultan had donated her summer residence, the Adile Sultan Palace, to the state shortly before her death in 1899 under the condition that it be turned into a secondary school for girls.
_	Further controversy erupted when it was revealed that the same company, which is a prominent financial backer of the Liberal Party, had offered $60 million for the vessels prior to the auction, on the condition that BC would then rent the ferries.
_	Yee was initially released on bail set at 20,000 Singapore dollars on 31 March 2015 on the condition that he not comment or distribute any content online while the case was still ongoing.
_	If the bivector is written , then the condition that a point lies on the plane associated with is simply
_	The treaty was ratified by the National Council on April 26 on the condition that a solution be found to an impasse on implementing the 2014 referendum.
_	Dave Cutler from Digital Equipment Corporation to assist in developing the new operating system; Cutler had left the company after a series of conflicts surrounding its work on the Prism architecture and its microkernel operating system Mica, and agreed to join Microsoft on the condition that he be able to bring a number of staff members from his team at DEC with him.
_	The church council at Saint-Gervais hired Michel Richard Delalande to serve as new organist, with the condition that François would replace him at age 18.
_	In his will dated 1105, he left most of his properties to his son García, although he did not ignore his two daughters, Talesa and Beatriz, who inherited land and other properties with the condition that, upon their deaths, these would be given to his son García or to his legitimate children.
_	He agrees, on the condition that she take over their care at 3:15 while he chases down a potential news source.
_	Zu stated his willingness to surrender on the condition that the khan immediately send a force to attack Jinzhou, where Zu's family and those of many of his officers lived.
_	His immense herbarium and library were bequeathed to the 'Naturhistorisches Museum' in Vienna, Austria (instead, as expected, to the Kew Gardens), on the condition that it would not be consulted during the first 25 years after his death.
_	He was released on 28 June 1427, under the condition that he had to swear an oath of allegiance to the Margrave of Brandenburg.
_	Bald refers to the condition that results in hair loss.
_	Through the influence of Clay, an act of admission was finally passed, upon the condition that the exclusionary clause of the Missouri constitution should "never be construed to authorize the passage of any law" impairing the privileges and immunities of any U.S. citizen.
_	On the condition that he behave, Richard is invited to Natalie and Sinclair's going-away party.
_	The main objective of the IB program is to train internationally minded people, aware of the condition that unites human beings and the shared responsibility to ensure the planet, help to create a better and more peaceful world.
_	Paul II agreed to consecrate the basilica on the condition that a hospital also be built nearby.
_	This mark in a tile resembles a footprint, which according to legend was where the devil stood after he had made a deal with the builder to finance construction of the church on the condition that it contain no windows.
_	(Marks allowed it to be used under the condition that its author not be identified.)
_	In May, the Government of India sent reply to Shaikh Abdulla's earlier letter, rejecting all of his demands, except that of jurisdiction over non-Bahraini Arabs, on the condition that other Arab rulers agree.
_	Certain countries, such as Israel, allow couples to register only on the condition that they have first been married in a religious ceremony recognised by the state, or were married in a different country.
_	Spare balls are allowed under the condition that players or teams do not seek an advantage by changing the ball.
_	The judge sentenced Brazil to 90 days of imprisonment, but the judge suspended the sentence on the condition that Brazil completes six months of unsupervised probation.
_	Kenny agrees to buy it under the condition that the gang fixes it and he gets the opportunity to meet them.
_	Mahon's bequest was made on the condition that the Gallery would never deaccession any of its paintings or charge for admission.
_	The land was a gift from the late Dr. Walter W. Dalquest, a professor at MSU, and his wife, Rose, on the condition that it be used for scientific research by biologists and geologists.
_	Concerned about a possible conflict of interest with his April-Blackwood duties, Orlando sang under the condition that his name not be associated with the project, so it was released under the simple name of "Dawn", the middle name of the daughter of Bell records executive Steve Wax.
_	Gothel stabs Flynn upon his arrival to rescue Rapunzel, but agrees to free Rapunzel long enough to heal him on the condition that she remain with her forever.
_	Her husband fell ill in 1240 and it was she who nursed him before he died at which point she ceded his entire fortune to his relations on the condition that his relatives make restitution for her late husband's injustices.
_	Maintenon agreed to help on the condition that Françoise Charlotte would be raised how Maintenon wished and would marry who Maintenon chose for her.
_	Jewish participation in the slave trade was recorded as beginning in the 5th century, when Pope Gelasius permitted Jews to introduce slaves from Gaul into Italy, on the condition that they were non-Christian.
_	Pepin followed them and eventually forced a peace treaty with the condition that Berthar leave his office.
_	The diocese sold the building in 2002 to a private investor who planned to use it for concerts and literary events, under the condition that liturgical use would still be possible, and the requests of preservation of a historic monument fulfilled.
_	Competing at the Season 2 European Regional Finals had given the team a seed directly into the Offline Qualifiers for the inaugural season of the European League of Legends Championship Series (EU LCS), but only on the condition that three out of the five members who competed at the former event also competed at the latter.
_	The DB agreed under the condition that a passenger access ramp would have to be provided by the club, which posed little problems to Röhrig, as he was working in the building industry.
_	However, in a new twist, a "double-pick" is given to each team to save both contestants in a pairing under the condition that they would become a duo for the rest of the competition.
_	Finally, Lan becomes pregnant and Mao is allowed to divorce He Zizhen and marry her, under the condition that she stay out of the public eye and is not involved in politics at all.
_	The deeds were signed on 24 February 1939, under the condition that the land would be used solely for its original purpose as a sports facility.
_	Socrates' description of Moses comes by way of his retelling of the exploits of Queen Mavia, who promised to end her armed revolt against the Roman empire on the condition that Moses be "constituted bishop over her nation."
_	He then told Jon Oliva that he would rejoin the band to pay tribute to his friend and mentor Criss Oliva on the condition that he would play all of Criss' solos, which the band accepted.
_	The Commission completed its evaluation of uranium mining in October 1984 and concluded that the moratorium regarding uranium development could be lifted on the condition that certain specific recommendations derived from its work would be enacted into law.
_	Nevertheless, Kurtz is impressed by Hiro's raw talent, and makes him a deal: he will release the Killer Commandos on the condition that Hiro joins the Bloodhound Squadron.
_	They signed with 550 Music on the condition that the band reissue the album.
_	Tim a job in his company, which he accepted, after he merged it with Lucius Fox Jr.'s company Foxteca and renamed the company Wayne Incorporated, on the condition that Tim will not get himself involved with the superheroic activities of Bruce, Terry or the JLU and Bruce would pay for his children's college tuition.
_	She succeeds in convincing the Beast to release him, under the condition that she is to take her father's place, to Maurice's protests.
_	Bella, whose opinion of marriage is jaded by her own parents' early divorce, agrees to marry Edward on the condition that he will make love to her while she is still human and then turn her into a vampire.
_	Ben will share the spoils of prospecting on the condition that Pardner takes care of him in his moments of drunkenness and melancholy.
_	Initially, the WBA voted in favor of Lewis keeping his WBA title on the condition that he face Ruiz as soon as possible should he defeat Grant, but a federal judge (influenced by promoter Don King, who promoted Ruiz) overturned the decision and ordered that Lewis be stripped of his WBA championship.
_	The club officiated the construction and management of a 24 hectare, 9-hole golf course built on land acquired from the Commonwealth government under a 21-year lease on the condition that, if required, the land could be repossessed without compensation.
_	In telecommunications, overfill is the condition that prevails when the numerical aperture or the beam diameter of an optical source, such as a laser, light-emitting diode, or optical fiber, exceeds that of the driven element, e.g. an optical fiber core.
_	Former Kenosha mayor Zalmon G. Simmons donated $150,000 for the building's construction on the condition that it be named in honor for his deceased son.
_	Prez agrees on the condition that he receive the cash upfront, but warns Randy and Dukie against selling drugs to get the money more quickly.
_	At the age of 16, through the urging of Liehmann and Zdenĕk, František allowed his son to become a musician, on the condition that the boy should work toward a career as an organist.
_	Weir had offered to testify against Kerr and Jackson, but only on the condition that the murder charge against him was withdrawn.
_	Marino Carafa di Belvedere was created a cardinal in the consistory of 1801 by Pope Pius VII on the condition that he take major orders.
_	After the death of her mother, Doreen was, unwillingly, moved to the Salvation Army Home in Fullarton, on the condition that she would stay with her sister, Doris.
_	Conditions of stage production in 1817 are illustrated by Rossini's acceptance of the subject of Cinderella for a libretto only on the condition that the supernatural element should be omitted.
_	Roosevelt responded that only enough shipping could be provided for one division and agreed on the condition that the ships sailed from Halifax, Nova Scotia.
_	Stefan finds her, and she convinces him to save Chad, on the condition that should she survive, he will be forgiven for the deaths of the two people he had killed in "Blood Bound".
_	He was discharged on the condition that he be committed to an asylum, but he remained at Newgate suffering occasional "fits of rage" until December 1791, when he was moved to Bethlem Royal Hospital.
_	Justice Lehman imposed a temporary injunction in Woods' favour on the condition that he paid a bond of $20,000.
_	This is largely due to the collapse of the Guildpact, which kept the guilds in relative peace for almost 10,000 years, mainly because of the desires of the parun (original founder) of the House Dimir, Szadek, who signed the Guildpact on the condition that the Dimir remain a secret.
_	The Fatimids, the Egyptians who ruled over Jerusalem, had attempted to make a deal with the Crusaders, promsiing freedom of passage to any pilgrims to the Holy Land on the condition that the Crusaders not advance into their domains, but this deal was rejected.
_	The problem for the wordwheel also has the condition that the central letter appear in all the words framed with the given set.
_	Verdon took the lead on the condition that Bob Fosse would be the director as well as choreographer, making this his debut as a director.
_	The Environmental Protection Authority approved the construction of the new Big Dipper, on the condition that the Trust abided by strict noise control guidelines and covered the cost of soundproofing for any residents affected by excessive noise.
_	He had only sold a bit of land in Marvinas Bay to the American John Kendrick and he had donated the land at Friendly Cove to Francisco de Eliza, where the Spanish settlement then stood, on the condition that the land be returned when the Spanish withdrew.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province did not exceed two times that of any other.
_	During this time Victoria buys Betty Eagleton's (Paula Tilbrook) house on the condition that she and Alan Turner (Richard Thorp) stay on as tenants and Victoria agrees.
_	Out of fear for Nina, valets agree that they are ready to say everything about the "Green Meadow", under the condition that Nina is let go.
_	However they returned the cup to the FA in order for the competition to continue, on the condition that no other club could win the cup outright ever again.
_	Jones agreed to do business with Cartoon Network on the condition that Alfe be a character on "The Problem Solverz".
_	Under the Treaty of Amiens on 20 March 1186, Eleanor retained Valois and part of Vermandois, calling herself at that point Countess of Valois, then upon the death of Philip in 1192, she inherited the rest of Vermandois on the condition that King Philip was able to annex Vermandois into the royal domain if Eleanor died without children.
_	Notice the condition that the matrix be hollow is not redundant if the characteristic of the field is 2.
_	But it was not illegal to pardon a felon upon the condition that he transports himself out of the country, and the term of his exile might thus be fixed as the authorities desired."
_	He was given permission to reside at Major Macintosh's Lawn Farm on the banks of the Derwent River, about 6 kilometers down stream from New Norfolk, on the condition that he not carry on his own business.
_	She furthermore acknowledged the valuable intellectual and technological contributions that European missionaries had made to the advancement of her country, and invited them to continue working to that end on the condition that their proselytizing would cease:
_	That same group four years later donated $500,000 to Johns Hopkins University, on the condition that they allow women to attend the medical university.
_	It appears again in Jeremiah 4:23, where Jeremiah warns Israel that rebellion against God will lead to the return of darkness and chaos, "as if the earth had been ‘uncreated’." ', chaos, is the condition that ', ordering, remedies.
_	In 2011 the trackbed of the line became a public footpath, although with the condition that this will not impede any reopening of the branch line in the future.
_	Hindley's mother had agreed to her father's insistence that she be baptised a Catholic only on the condition that she was not sent to a Catholic school, as her mother believed that "all the monks taught was the catechism".
_	The committee members, tied up and facing death themselves, accepted the proposal on the condition that an order to stop mass executions be given immediately.
_	This is equivalent to the condition that the preimages of the open (closed) sets in are open (closed) in .
_	On the night before a battle between his and Stannis's forces, Renly agrees to Catelyn to allow Robb Stark to keep the title "King in the North" and rule the North and Riverlands, but on the condition that he swear fealty to Renly as King on the Iron Throne.
_	Harlow Council granted permission for 3500 homes to be built between the A414 and M11 north of Potter Street on the condition that the developers incorporate community facilities.
_	The money was donated under the condition that the credit union would withdraw the charges, and the money would be returned to the temple if Supachai's donations to the temple were later proven legal.
_	Steade was then left the estates of his uncle, Peter Strelly Pegge on the condition that he take the surname of Strelley Pegge.
_	In the following years he was again refused a visa, but in 1973 his visa application was finally granted and he accepted Williams' invitation to participate in the tournament on the condition that the spectator stands would be racially integrated.
_	In short, the CRTC has given approval for CKOT to convert to the FM band on 107.3 FM with an ERP of 4.5 kW, and allows for continued night-time (24/7) operation on 107.3 FM, but on the condition that it simulcasts on 1510 AM at all times during the daytime.
_	But she was turned on by the fantasy of the story and decided to take a chance, under the condition that she receive a hefty salary and 10 percent of the film's gross.
_	He claimed to have killed Giuliano on the instruction of Mario Scelba, then Minister of the Interior, and to have had an arrangement with Colonel Ugo Luca, the head of the anti-bandit force in Sicily, to collaborate on the condition that he should not be charged and that Luca would intervene in his favour if he were caught.
_	He pleaded no contest to killing of Michele A. Gordon, 22, and Kathleen Anne Meyer, 26, in September 1988, on the condition that he be executed.
_	Also, in a legend of Akadomari (now a part of Sado), Sado District, there was a miage-nyūdō that squashed and killed night travelers, but it once accidentally fell to the bottom of a ravine, and since it was helped by someone under the condition that it would "no longer attack people" and to "stay away from that place," it no longer appeared there, and it is said that this ravine started to be called the "nyūdō marsh."
_	In their opinion and test to uphold the conviction, they expanded the definition of "clear and present danger" to include the condition that the "evil apprehended is so imminent that it may befall before there is opportunity for full discussion."
_	to which he had bequeathed part of his big fortune, on the condition that there would always be two free beds available for Madytians needing treatment.
_	The company offered to donate the house to the local historical society on the condition that it be moved.
_	Once Silverman saw the character designs, he confirmed that CBS would greenlight the show, on the condition that Bakshi serve as its creative director.
_	When the animation was completed in 2015, it was featured in film festivals across world, but was on the condition that it must not be available on the internet.
_	The peace comes with the condition that Connor can mate with Angel as he desires a son, not knowing about Cayden.
_	Top agrees to the change on the condition that Mickey throws the fight in the fourth round.
_	Kaifu laid out the condition that each year, for the next ten years, he would face a member represented by Shaolin, and they would fight till one man is left standing.
_	The prosecutor, who was also handling the Bobo case, arranged a no-jail plea deal on the condition that he go live with a retired police officer, Dennis Benjamin, whom Dylan did not know.
_	Hastings agreed to help on the condition that Cooch Behar recognise British sovereignty.
_	These licences are issued on the condition that they are used only for community and educational non-profit purposes and are held by broadcasters in most Australian capital cities.
_	He was offered bail on the condition that he would leave the district.
_	The Viceroy agreed to crown Chithira Thirunal but only on the condition that C. P. should function as adviser to the young monarch.
_	As pressure mounted through a combination of these advocacy initiatives, the California State Parole Board agreed to release González in 1940, on the condition that he be deported to Mexico.
_	When he went to offer the throne to Qian Hongchu, Qian Hongchu agreed, on the condition that Qian Hongzong's life be spared.
_	Wanderers secretary C. W. Alcock, however, returned the Cup to The Football Association on the condition that the rule be removed and no other team permitted to win the Cup outright.
_	She has been bribing Gen, agreeing to let him inherit the mansion, on the condition that he changes Xu Ruoqing's medicines with another chemical substance that will cause Xu Ruoqing to hallucinate and these hallucinations might eventually kill her.
_	After Bobby Santos III took a hard hit during practice for the season opener in Daytona, Dale Earnhardt Jr. gave the team the No. 88 backup car, on the condition that Means Racing would run the whole race with the car, and not Start and Park.
_	They agreed on the condition that they would be given a free hand in editorial decisions and access to all pertinent materials, a requirement which they state "has been lived up to in letter and in spirit".
_	This optimization is done under the condition that resulting filters are numerically consistent.
_	Searbhan agreed on the condition that they would not eat the berries.
_	The increase in American financial support by the provincial government was subject to the condition that the pupils from adjoining towns would attend classes in the provincial school rather than seeking enrollment in Manila.
_	Note that the second condition is equivalent to the condition that each maximal commutative C*-subalgebra is monotone complete.
_	Peuerbach accepted the invitation on the condition that Regiomontanus could also accompany them.
_	An agreement was reached under notary Eugene Montanaro with the condition that the home works hand in hand with Aġenzija Appoġġ.
_	NBC expressed willingness to air the 2018 advertisement on the condition that the organization would buy additional ads during the 2018 Winter Olympics, which would have doubled the price; PETA refused and accused the network of price gouging.
_	In 1910 Fourneau accepted the directorship of the Pasteur Institute's therapeutic chemistry section, with the condition that he maintained his ties with Poulenc Frères.
_	Finally, to put him in his place, Vedhiyar permits him go to Chithambaram with the condition that he can go only after cultivating the crop in 40 acres (veli) land.
_	With planning permission being submitted in September 2007 it was initially refused, although a revised application was eventually submitted and accepted in December 2008, under the condition that work began within two years.
_	Historic Rugby opened up the community's Beacon Hill area (originally planned to include residences and a park) to new home construction, with the condition that all new homes must be designed in accordance with the community's Victorian aesthetic.
_	He is also (unlike his predecessor) authorized to make peace with the Zamorin of Calicut, but only if sought by the Trimumpara Raja of Cochin and only on the condition that the Zamorin expel all expatriate Arabs ('Moors of Mecca'), from his cities and ports.
_	After confirming for himself the validity of the request, Ingersoll agreed to pay for the entire property on the condition that his donation remain anonymous.
_	Shortly after Chubais' meeting with Yeltsin, Boris Berezovsky and his business associates met with Yeltsin and promised to finance his campaign, under the condition that the president would hire a new campaign team.
_	Wallace, who also sought a military command, agreed to become the state's adjutant general on the condition that he would be given command of a regiment of his choice.
_	As soon as Butte had its courthouse and jail, however, the citizens of Bidwell's Bar (near Oroville, California) got the legislature to declare that their town, and not Hamilton, was the county seat, on the condition that the citizens of Bidwell's Bar build a new courthouse and jail, which they did, and the county seat was moved upstream on August 10, 1853.
_	She allowed Jay-Z to adapt "The Artist Is Present" under the condition that he would donate to the Marina Abramović Institute.
_	The Brahman allows them to use the swing on the condition that each of them circumambulate Baghji.
_	They approached Paul, who was a fan of "Black Mirror", and he accepted the part on the condition that his appearance in this episode did not preclude him from being part of another "Black Mirror" episode.
_	Nancy on the condition that she may remain with me during my natural life in the quality of my wife.
_	Eugene promises to help Aristide achieve these things on the condition that he stay out of his way and change his surname to avoid the possibility of bad publicity from Aristide's escapades rubbing off on Eugene and damaging his political chances.
_	In 1762 the cowherd's house was rebuilt at the expense of Alderman William Knight who agreed to pay for the building on the condition that the rent (which was then raise to £6 a year) was distributed among the poor of Southampton's parishes.
_	When in 1979 Megahey was offered the opportunity to become the editor of the BBC's arts documentary series "Omnibus" (1979–81; 1984–87) he accepted on the condition that he could make "Schalcken the Painter", a fictional tale woven round the lives of actual historic figures Godfried Schalcken (Jeremy Clyde) and Gerrit Dou (Maurice Denham).
_	Sony, whose rivalry with Nintendo had softened with the appearance of Microsoft's Xbox on the console market, agreed to the partnership on the condition that it would not impact development of titles for the PlayStation 2.
_	At first, Byron did not wish to leave his twenty-two-year-old mistress Countess Teresa Guiccioli who had abandoned her husband to live with him; ultimately Guiccioli's father, Count Gamba was allowed to leave his exile in the Romagna under the condition that his daughter return to him, without Byron.
_	On 5 February 2016 ASL Aviation Group announced it had agreed to purchase PAN Air on the condition that FedEx takes over TNT Express.
_	The donation – made by the Kwee family – was made on the condition that a balcony was built somewhere in the college.
_	Europcar agreed to waive the enforcement of the court decision on the condition that the City of Paris would be the owner of the Autolib' brand, and in exchange for free advertising for Europcar's Autoliberté service.
_	Ferrant seems moved by her bravery, and offers the conspirators a pardon—on the condition that they, led by Virolet, battle the pirates plaguing his coast.
_	In 1431, Parliament granted a tax to James I for a campaign in the Highlands on the condition that it be kept in a locked chest under the keepership of figures deeply out of favour with the King.
_	Land was released in lots, on the condition that part of the land was cleared for agriculture.
_	The tradition dates back to the 1970s, when the Fantasy of Lights was given to the university on the condition that the holiday displays always remain free to the public and are taken care of by the university.
_	Its semi-independent government was granted on September 5, 1661, by Stuyvesant, as part of his efforts regain a foothold on the North River's western shore and expand beyond New Amsterdam on the southern tip of Manhattan, under the condition that a garrison be built.
_	Before dying childless at La Llitera, Teresa's granduncle Ermengol X of Urgell agreed to make Alfonso heir to the County of Urgell, on the condition that Alfonso marry Teresa, who was his rightful heir.
_	Mann's successor, Thomas Hill, took Antioch's presidency on the condition that faculty salaries be paid despite deficits.
_	Meesha agrees to marry Farjad but on the condition that Mayer must be allowed to return to his home.
_	In response to pressure from the international community, including Amnesty International and the European Parliament, he was released in May 2003 after only serving ten months, on the condition that he renounce politics.
_	Ngerng, through his lawyer, Eugene Thuraisingam proposed to pay the S$150,000 in instalments which was granted by the Prime Minister on the condition that Ngerng paid the S$30,000 in hearing costs immediately i.e. by 16 March 2016.
_	George gives his college tuition to Harry on the condition that Harry take over the Building and Loan when he returns.
_	In 1928, the building and grounds were taken over by Leeds City Council on a 999-year lease, on the condition that they be used as a leisure space for the people of Leeds.
_	In respect of the condition that the vessel should be managed and its operations directed from the UK, the ECJ found, however, that this requirement was compatible with Community law.
_	In 1865, Arter’s mother got a proposition from a businessman from New York to educate her two older boys, on the condition that they would be bound to him until they were twenty-one.
_	In the folk tale, a local young man, son of a widow from Blaen Sawdde (near Llanddeusant) agreed to marry a beautiful girl who arose from the lake, with the condition that he would not hit her three times.
_	The continued existence of the contract depends on the event happening or not happening, as the case may be: for example, "I shall buy and give you a car on the condition that, if you fail your exams, I will take the car back."
_	Another example would be a contract of sale whereby one sells a car on the condition that, if the buyer fails to pay the price by a certain date, it will be repossessed.
_	Rowell also offered the former Lancaster Academy building for use as a free public library under the condition that the town raise $500 in support of the initiative.
_	The efforts seemed to be on the brink of failure when Evans was able to persuade Congress to grant the company of land on the condition that the company build a line connecting the Union Pacific line in Wyoming with the existing Kansas Pacific line, which then extended only as far west as central Kansas.
_	Judge Joel Pinson donated land for development of a town on the condition that it would be named for Sam Houston, a childhood friend.
_	On the condition that they use an Australian orchestra to provide backing music, Gutawa agreed to an acoustic-flavoured album.
_	The Royal Governor pardoned others and allowed them to stay on the condition that they pledge an oath of allegiance to the royal government.
_	Unlike most event promoters at the Fringe, the Free Fringe does not charge performers for use of performance spaces, on the condition that they do not charge an entry fee into their shows.
_	He accepted the post on the condition that Macdonald and Cartier made Confederation a key platform in their new government.
_	The provisions of the bill included a cut in the total amount of federal government spending, a cap on the level of future spending as a percentage of GDP, and, on the condition that Congress pass certain changes to the U.S. Constitution, an increase in the national debt ceiling to allow the federal government to continue to service its debts.
_	It can be recommended as a good way of finding learning partners, on the condition that for the remaining students the possibility of questionnaire mediation be made known before starting.
_	The German Football Association (DFB) awarded the win to Hamburger SV under the condition that they renounce the title in the name of "good sportsmanship" – which the side grudgingly did.
_	The graph of "f" is a surface in R, and the condition that this is a minimal surface is that "f" satisfies the minimal surface equation
_	Great Lakes Airlines proposed buying seven Dash 7s on the condition that the government subsidize the service at a rate of $8 million per year for the first three or four years.
_	However, he was released a short time later under the condition that he never return to German South West Africa again.
_	After Turner threatens Reed's mother, Reed agrees to give up the mutants' location on the condition that he and his family goes free.
_	Kiss agreed, with the condition that Aucoin sign the band to a record label within two weeks.
_	He was released on 29 June on the condition that he would assist the new government upon request.
_	He is then visited by Nyssa, who explains that she has the lotus, an elixir that can reverse the side effects of the Pit and she offers to give it to him for Thea, on the condition that he kills Malcolm.
_	According to Rhodes, Air America soon asked her to return to the air, with an offer of more money but still holding to the condition that she had to amend her contract.
_	He surrendered to police two days later in another county on the condition that he not be interrogated while being transported back to Urbandale.
_	Other possible causes of the condition that have been suggested include high sea temperatures, oxygen depletion and low salinity due to freshwater runoff.
_	To avoid bodily harm, they promise to hand over everything on the condition that they receive a lifetime supply of porn and that the youthful spirit of "After School Special" is retained.
_	Ridgely, willed his estate, Hampton, to him on the condition that he assume the name Charles Ridgely; he did so legally in 1790.
_	When she married Westerlund in 1827, Lempke gave her a divorce only with the condition that he was given an employment in the troupe for life, a condition which he was granted.
_	However, he insisted that he would accept the throne only on the condition that the tricolour be replaced by the white flag.
_	Saramago originally refused to sell the rights for a film adaptation, but the producers were able to acquire it with the condition that the film would be set in an unnamed and unrecognizable city.
_	However, he was later pardoned on the condition that he remained in England and never to return to Scotland (he settled in Barnstaple).
_	His employer offered him an individual contract, coupled with a 10% pay increase, but on the condition that he would cease to be represented by the union, the National Union of Rail, Maritime and Transport Workers.
_	Homer overhears this, and realizing that Smithers makes Marge happy, approaches Mr. Burns and offers to sign a waiver on the condition that Smithers is allowed to keep his job.
_	Song Jiang agrees on the condition that Hu Cheng seizes any Zhu who flees to him.
_	To better understand the concept of social welfare tax expenditures and how they are similar to direct expenditures, Edward Berkowitz gives the example of, “if a person owes $100 in taxes to the government and the government forgives the obligation on the condition that the person buy a health insurance policy, then the situation is the same as if the government itself spent the $100.”
_	Beynon uses his influence and obtains Doc's parole on the condition that he takes part in a bank robbery with two of his henchmen, Rudy and Frank.
_	Sunde had agreed to participate on the condition that the father Nicklas Jangestig would not take part in the debate.
_	Mark's parents are initially upset that he visits Ben, but eventually see that Mark and Ben have a special friendship and buy Ben from Fog Benson for Mark, on the condition that Mark help his father with the fishing to pay him back.
_	The count later sold the manuscript to Italian philologist Ernesto Monaci, who left it to his heirs on the condition that it not leave Italy.
_	This definition stresses the condition that a successful operation must not lead down a dead-end street.
_	After Julia Parker died the homestead was acquired by the borough, through her bequest, with the condition that it be preserved.
_	Francis E. Howard, son of Capt. Benjamin Beal Howard, a resident of Howard Street in West Bridgewater, donated the property that the Memorial Building sits on in 1899, on the condition that the building cost no less than $5,000 to build.
_	She pleads insanity and is declared not guilty on the condition that she stays in a psychiatric hospital until cleared by Jonathan.
_	At that time, Helga became his fiancée, on the condition that she would wait no more than three years for Gunnlaugr.
_	This was given on the condition that the Republic rejoin the Mexican Federation.
_	He pleaded not guilty and was bailed on the condition that he has no contact with his sister.
_	The basis for calculating a player's ranking are those tournaments that yield the highest ranking points during the rolling 52-week period with the condition that they must include points from the 4 Grand Slams, the 4 Premier Mandatory tournaments and the WTA Finals.
_	(Fraser, B15) Dragonette sang in a segment of the film "The Big Broadcast of 1936", on the condition that she have authority over the final cut on her performance.
_	Brynhild by taking Gunnar's shape when Gunnar cannot fulfill the condition that he ride through a wall of flames to wed her; Sigurd rides through the flames and weds Brynhild, but does not sleep with her, placing his sword between them in the marriage bed.
_	This is possible thanks to the condition that the value of all circles centered at the origin is 0.
_	Pickett's boss agreed on the condition that the paper got a photo of Don Bradman batting while Pickett was keeping.
_	However, Condé was released in May 2001 when he was pardoned by President Conté, with the condition that he was prohibited from engaging in political activities.
_	However, Scott makes a deal on a new tank and Tol Nol accepts under the condition that Terry stays behind.
_	If, instead of a field, the entries are supposed to belong to a ring, then one must add the condition that belongs to the center of the ring.
_	By noon, upon the advice of Poker Joe, the Nez Perce chiefs decided to allow the party to leave and head west out of the park, but only on the condition that they abandon all their supplies and horses to the Nez Perce, which they did.
_	He took the position on the condition that the organization have a worldwide title, scope and work.
_	On 11 March 1088, the king offered the monastery to the Holy See on the condition that it be permanently administered by the Abbey of St. Victor, along with all its goods and benefits.
_	The Constitution allows the warrantless confiscation of periodicals in cases of absolute urgency, when the Judiciary cannot timely intervene, on the condition that a judicial validation must be obtained within 24 hours.
_	On the other side, the Croatian Parliament met in Cetin and chose Ferdinand I of the House of Habsburg as new ruler of Croatia, under the condition that he provide protection to Croatia against the Ottoman Empire while respecting its political rights.
_	He promised them the withdrawal of his troops under the condition that Batak disarmed.
_	The federal cabinet agreed on the condition that the legislative council be abolished.
_	Meyer underperformed at the 1912 Olympic Trials and was only included to the US Olympic team on the condition that he pays his travel, which was eventually covered by his parents.
_	Many young ladies came with the condition that they were not to go up stairs, for they were not able to ascend a flight of stairs.
_	Eddie agrees on the condition that Pat quit drinking.
_	Dorothy came up with an idea to bring Glinda the Good Witch to the Jester under the condition that Toto, Scarecrow, Tin Man, and Cowardly Lion assists her.
_	Over the years, H. E. Harris’s ads, which offered a quantity of stamps for a small amount of money (usually less than $1) on the condition that additional stamps were sent on approval, became ubiquitous in many magazines and comic books.
_	In terms of Poisson bi-vectors, the condition that a map be Poisson is tantamount to requiring that formula_95 and formula_96 be formula_97-related.
_	Vigo on the condition that he would not "do any thing injurious to the British interests on his way to St. Louis."
_	The ghosts agree to leave him alone under the condition that he fulfill their requests.
_	While the Duke of Anjou was accepted as King Philip V of Spain, this was done under the condition that the French and Spanish thrones never be united.
_	The funding is being provided on the condition that a similar figure is spent on the highway by the New South Wales government.
_	She begs a former colleague, Dr. Joe Marsham to work at The Thrift part-time and he agrees on the condition that he will be able to perform surgery as well (which he does free in order to enhance his skills).
_	He was sentenced to death but received a conditional pardon on 22 January 1748, on the condition that within six months he surrender all the rights of his estates as lord and forfeit his titles, which he did.
_	Then the following limit is valid (even if the condition that formula_53 is relaxed):
_	The principle eventually accepted him, under the condition that during lunch breaks, he would sleep in one of the unused rooms in order to gain his strength.
_	Angel agrees to let Spike torment Dracula, on the condition that Spike leave Angel alone for a full month.
_	Following World War II, the atomic bombings, at Hiroshima and Nagasaki and the deconstruction of their imperial military, Japan came under the US "nuclear umbrella" on the condition that they wouldn't produce nuclear weapons.
_	Eugenie grew up in Queen Victoria's household, as the British monarch had reluctantly allowed Beatrice to marry on the condition that she remain her mother's full-time companion and personal secretary.
_	The Cullens agreed on the condition that Dube was to maintain himself financially, however they advised him and William found him his first work on the road gang when he arrived in America.
_	With other ladies of progressive views, she helped raise funds for the Johns Hopkins University Medical School on the condition that it admit women.
_	Tatsu demands Ume-ko's hand in marriage, which Indara agrees, on the condition that Tatsu be his son and disciple to carry on the Indara name.
_	U.S. Senator Thomas Witherell Palmer donated for a city park in 1893, on the condition that the virgin forest be preserved.
_	Priam releases them on the condition that they kill Kolanos painfully.
_	This concession was approved by the Civil Governor and President of the Provincial Commission of Monuments, but on the condition that the part corresponding to the old church and other elements of interest be conserved.
_	Croatian Parliament met in year 1527 in the town of Cetin and chose Ferdinand I of the House of Habsburg as new ruler of Croatia, under the condition that he provide protection to Croatia against the Ottoman Empire in the Croatian–Ottoman War while respecting its political rights, although he later failed to fulfill his promise.
_	The plans for the highway began to take shape in the 1920s when the land for the road was given by its owner to the state of New York on the condition that it would be named after America's Great War veterans.
_	The previously known electromagnetic surface waves, surface plasmons and surface plasmon polaritons, exist under the condition that the permittivity of one of the materials forming the interface is negative, while the other one is positive (for example, this is the case for the air/metal interface below the plasma frequency).
_	The prince volunteers, on the condition that the princess keep him company while the lake fills.
_	Darius Bell and his family are living in the Bell estate, the mansion given to his ancestors, under the condition that every 25 years they would produce a gift for the town.
_	William moves Sugar into a flat of her own on the condition that she sees him exclusively, while she helps him emotionally and financially by giving good advice on how to handle the company.
_	In response to the investigation, the bank has given some modifications on the condition that the homeowners remove some information criticizing the bank online.
_	While stomatitis nicotina that is caused by heat is not a premaligant condition (i.e. it does not carry an increased risk of transformation to oral cancer), the condition that is caused by reverse smoking is premalignant.
_	The event led to Welk's imprisonment in KZ Oranienburg until public protest saw him released on the condition that he be banned from his profession.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province did not exceed two times that of any other.
_	Although Savelberg was at first reluctant, presumably because his congregation was founded under the condition that it would not far in the other congregations' works.
_	Shazza goes to see the bikies who tell her that they need to run some illegal stuff (illegal drugs and firearms) up to the Northern Territory and that she can see her mum on the condition that she brings it back.
_	King Matthias died and was succeeded by King Vladislaus II, who gave John on 21 September 1490 permission to resign, on the condition that he would continue to act as royal advisor and diplomat.
_	His first step was a July 1881 visit to the family of Florin Massol where he obtained a release of the mining rights that Willing had signed over, in exchange for a contract to pay US$3000 plus interest to Massol on the condition that the Peralta grant be confirmed.
_	They eventually accepted Rustin as deputy organizer, on the condition that Randolph act as lead organizer and manage any political fallout.
_	Brazil compensated owners who freed slaves for the purpose of fighting in the war, on the condition that the freedmen immediately enlist.
_	He agrees to tell them why on the condition that he's freed from his cell.
_	Chase instead offered him the role of playing "Paulie Gualtieri", Sirico agreed under the condition that his character would not "become a rat".
_	The djinn sees the baby and says that all the treasure belongs to him, on the condition that Syawal brings Ahmad Albab to the cave every full moon to play with the djinn's wife and son.
_	had created a plan to release the album on the condition that lead singer Jack Davey (real name Briana Cartwright) went solo.
_	He held this position until 1906, when he retired from active business, his resignation accepted on the condition that he remain the consulting engineer of the company, to which he agreed.
_	Mr. Harris accepted on the condition that they designate his studio for rehearsals and that they would really work.
_	He was furious to learn she had apparently drunkenly married Julian, but forgave her on the condition that she stop lying to him.
_	This was under the condition that he marry Katarina which was also fulfilled.
_	Deepa agrees to marry Raj only on the condition that she would be declared owner of all assets of Gopaldas and Vijay's share be transferred to her.
_	He was expelled from the academy he was attending and briefly imprisoned, but was later allowed to return to military service on the condition that he remain under surveillance.
_	Celtics coach Doc Rivers agreed to the signing on the condition that O'Neal would not receive preferential treatment nor could he cause any locker room problems like in Los Angeles or Miami.
_	The Portland City Council approved a $31 million agreement to renovate PGE Park to a soccer- and football-only stadium, with the condition that a new ballpark be built in Portland for the Beavers by 2011.
_	Rose let Tesfaye keep the tracks he had produced under the condition that he would ultimately be credited for them.
_	During the sessions, they were approached by Geffen Records and agreed to sign on the condition that "Radio Jejune" be released by their current label, Sugarfix Records.
_	Martin agrees to help her, but only on the condition that she return to his house that night so that he can demonstrate his skill as a Switcher to her.
_	Majors offers Rick a contract to be his new manager and Rick agrees on the condition that his friends all get to stay, but Majors secretly has Ted fire them behind his back.
_	Venice's possessions, including its recent acquisitions in Albania, were confirmed, under the condition that the "bailo" at Constantinople would pay a tribute of 1,000 ducats each August.
_	Dudley offered Robert Kett a pardon on the condition that the peasant army disband at once.
_	At last, Gotland became a fief of the Teutonic Knights, awarded to them on the condition that they expel the piratical Victual Brothers from their fortified sanctuary.
_	If a farm or estate is of such a size that several families can exist on it, the father is allowed to divide it among his children; however, this is on the condition that the eldest son or daughter will not receive less than one-half of the farm or estate.
_	He was allowed to go free on the condition that in twenty years, Arbutus could take the Sultan's most valuable possession, which turns out to be his daughter.
_	Then the condition that be Hamiltonian is equivalent to requiring that the matrices and are symmetric, and that .
_	Governor Walker, a fellow native New Yorker, pardoned Chahoon on December 16, 1871, reputedly on the condition that he leave the Commonwealth.
_	However, through his lawyer, Chodiev said he is willing to drop a formal complaint against several commission members on the condition that he receive a letter from a representative of the Belgian authorities admitting that the commission had operated inappropriately, subjected Chodiev to “slander”, and acknowledging the negative impact of the investigation on Chodiev and his family.
_	This bequest was made after his death with the condition that it be made anonymously, and be called "The Princes Gate Collection".
_	Due to her continued unhappiness, Tahquitz allowed her to leave on the condition that she not tell her people what had transpired.
_	This discrimination inspires her to go to the Principal of the school, who agrees to let her form her own team on the condition that her team has to have a test match against the school's official team.
_	Shortly after the complex was sold, under the condition that the ruins would not be demolished, which made the ruins an early example of the Dutch monumental care.
_	This was a shift from the past, when local officials sometimes tolerated Falun Gong on the condition that it was practised privately.
_	Some authors give a more general definition by removing the condition that the Cartan matrix should be symmetric.
_	Wanderer offers to show Doc the proper method of removing Souls, on the condition that he remove her from Melanie's body and let her die.
_	Bhonsle also agreed to peace on the condition that Nizam would grant him some jagirs in Berar.
_	The Antae accepted, but on the condition that "Chilbudius" would be restored to office, attempting to raise their man to the rank of magister militum.
_	It was authorized, but with the condition that the public works would be carried through, accompanied by the DREMS.
_	The Haymarket "was seldom used after 1800, and on March 3, 1803, it was offered for sale at auction on the condition that it be removed in 60 days."
_	Malik agrees under the condition that John and Daniel drive the initial run themselves.
_	On 3 January 1366 Amadeus had made up his will in case of his death overseas, naming as his heirs general first his son (and his issue) and then his second cousin's younger children, Amadeus and Louis, and finally to Aymon of Geneva on the condition that he adopt the name and arms of the house of Savoy.
_	She pleaded guilty on the condition that she be spared the death penalty.
_	Melissa agreed on the condition that she was to become Angela's sole heir.
_	Furthermore, top tier amateur and semi-pro riders can now apply for sponsorship on the condition that they are serious contenders for the main prize purse.
_	The King also allows Romualdo to continue to rule his people, on the condition that he marry one of the three princesses.
_	In late 1997, Giuliani agreed to the plan on the condition that the state reimburse the city $300 million of the system's cost, with the city paying the $300 million for the line from 2002 through 2017.
_	Following effective victory, Exmouth dispatched a peace treaty the next day at noon, under the condition that the opposition comply to the terms specified.
_	Within this area on the west bank, Phelps and Gorham gave at the high falls of the Genesee River to Ebenezer "Indian" Allen, on the condition that he build the grist mill and sawmill.
_	She also left 200,000 francs for the maintenance of the property, with the condition that the house was not to be sold.
_	However, when Maximo Salazar (Ronaldo Valdez), the butler in the hacienda of the Hidalgos, learns that Elena is pregnant, he manipulates a robbery in which Elena is unjustly implicated, causing her to be imprisoned only to be released on the condition that she leaves Salvacion.
_	The ladies were allowed to join the skiers on the condition that they could not win prizes.
_	Zhang Yang agreed to date Li Bala, on the condition that Li Bala destroys Xu Yi's reputation.
_	The process was approved, with the condition that its operation should be integrated into the transport network, with the "Companhia da Carris" as the principal.
_	Kenyatta accepted, probably on the condition that the Association matched his pre-existing wage.
_	However, they were released after Idga's royal banner was stolen by the army of Gulo the Savage, on the condition that they would bring the banner back.
_	called out the imperial ban on Sir Johann Phillipp von Bimbach the manor went to the emperor who than handed it over to Duke Nikolaus Fugger under the condition that the village has to be catholic "forever".
_	Levi notes that in those days it was the only channel and they would perform there for free on the condition that it was a single-use recording.
_	The Commission met its deadline of September 2005 to provide the evaluated list to the President, who approved the list with the condition that the list could only be approved or disapproved in its entirety.
_	As she was so young, her father was hesitant in granting permission, but he eventually agreed, on the condition that they wait until after her seventeenth birthday.
_	Berney sold the land on which the railway was built, on the condition that a stopping place was built to serve the settlement in perpetuity.
_	Mellish is eventually sentenced to prison, but his sentence is suspended on the condition that he does not move into the judge's neighborhood.
_	On the condition that Andries and Cornelis Bicker would be put out of their offices, William would be prepared to withdraw his troops.
_	Håkan offers to go out one last time under the condition that he spend a night with Eli after he gets the blood, but with the caveat that he may only touch Eli.
_	The section of land, advertised for approximately A$7 million, had initially been leased from the NSW Government for A$1, on the condition that any profit made from property built on the site was invested in the amusement park.
_	Thus, the condition that a system of forces has a torque-free resultant can be written as
_	His heir-apparent, Abdülhamid II (1876–1909), was invited to assume power on the condition that he would declare a constitutional monarchy, which he did on 23 November 1876.
_	The mandate of the UNMOT monitoring mission was extended until 15 March 1997 on the condition that the parties to the Tehran Agreement demonstrated their commitment to national reconciliation.
_	Born in Saint-Quentin in an unknown year, he always remained strongly attached to his native city, to which he bequeathed his 3000 volume library on the condition that it be open to the public twice a week.
_	The Kerala government had provided an in principle approval for the airport during the Left Democratic Front regime in 2009, with the condition that the promoters procure sufficient land on their own.
_	The Roman Catholic prelate, Cardinal Hinsley, agreed to be a Joint President subject to the condition that any statements be approved by him prior to publication.
_	It was built in order to defend the access-way along the Tagus River, and donate by Sancho I under the condition that a castle be constructed.
_	A citizen retains the right to access data from their own criminal record, only under the condition that the purpose is to exercise his rights in another state.
_	Kim agrees only on the condition that Jimmy play it "straight and narrow".
_	And the Imam and Shaykh added: and it is also on the condition that [the thief’s] confession not precede the testimony and then after it he retracts [his confession].
_	Hitler announced he would rejoin on the condition that he would replace Drexler as party chairman, and that the party headquarters would remain in Munich.
_	Following the unsuccessful attempts to climb Mount Everest in 1922 and 1924, the British waited eight years before the 13th Dalai Lama granted permission in August 1932 for the mountain to be approached from Tibet in the north, on the condition that all the climbers taking part were British.
_	This support would be provided with the condition that her daughter (and Henry IV's wife) was also crowned queen with her husband.
_	This was on the condition that he should prove his majority on the floor of the House before the end of August.
_	Cindy into making an alliance with them under the promise to make her own science lab for her and look better than Jimmy under the condition that she figures out how to get in Jimmy's own lab.
_	On the same day hackers carried through with their threats and took down the Orlando Chamber of Commerce site and a Universal Studios website in "Operation Orlando," issuing a video statement later declaring a 48-hour cease fire on the condition that the city arrest no one for feeding the homeless, presumably on June 22.
_	As a result of that, Random House and Arthur’s heirs, his children Elizabeth Ann Arthur and Robert Andrew Arthur, signed a contract for the rights of use of the volumes of Arthur and the further usage of the characters, under the condition that the 10 books were to be brought back onto the American market.
_	After Brandwein's death in 1969, Berg returned to the U.S. and began working again with his former secretary and future wife, Karen, on the condition that she let him teach her Kabbalah, a discipline he claimed was reserved exclusively for men.
_	The trustees were sufficiently pleased with his work that they gave him the permanent title in 1969; Cordier accepted on the condition that the search for a new president continue.
_	Charles, who distrusted Anna's understanding of politics, agreed to provide the money under the condition that the Ladies' Land League be disbanded.
_	Much of the money left after Sarah's numerous bequests was inherited by her grandson, John Spencer, with the condition that he could not accept a political office under the government.
_	The Bani Utbah solicited the aid of Bushire to expel the Omanis on the condition that Bahrain would become a tributary state of Persia.
_	Koper agreed, on the condition that "every trace of Mortville vanish when filming was completed."
_	During an August 2005 diplomatic session in North Korea, former U.S. Ambassador to South Korea Donald Gregg received verbal indications from high-ranking North Korean officials that the state would be willing to repatriate the to United States authorities, on the condition that a prominent U.S. government official, such as the Secretary of State, come to Pyongyang for high level talks.
_	Ric he will provide the required funding, on the condition that Ric stays in Ghana.
_	Merteuil accepts, on the condition that he furnish written proof of the liaison.
_	In March 2013, the Competition Bureau approved a proposal by Bell Media to acquire Astral Media, under the condition that it divest itself of several television services and radio stations.
_	In April 1910, the New Zealand Rugby League was formed for the purpose of administering the new code in New Zealand and "with the blessing of the Northern Rugby Football Union, on the condition that the Auckland District would not have the management of the entire game in New Zealand".
_	She resolved to become one on the condition that one of her children be made a samurai.
_	In 1997 the Riksdag decided to shut down one of the reactors at Barsebäck by 1 July 1998 and the second before 1 July 2001, although under the condition that their energy production would be compensated.
_	A natural generalization is obtained by relaxing the condition that the coefficients of the recurrence are constants.
_	Hirotomo agrees, but only on the condition that Genchu is to be completely forgotten and never brought up again, except in mentioning that he is a traitor.
_	François, Madeleine's father, died on 16 February 1700, and his pension of 1000 livres was transferred to Madeleine due to her leadership in 1692, on the condition that she provide for her mother.
_	The film was finally passed with a 'U' certificate without cuts, but under the condition that prominent disclaimers were shown, stating that the stunts were computer-generated and should not be imitated.
_	The black juror later stated that he voted with the majority on the condition that the death sentence was not imposed.
_	On August 22, 1894, while visiting the neighboring state of Wisconsin, Anton Hesing was stricken by a stroke — a first bout with the condition that would ultimately kill him less than one year later.
_	Bruce consented to help Hush on the condition that he allow himself to be treated in, and confined to, Arkham Asylum.
_	Ch. 2 is then subsequently calibrated under the condition that the stratus cloud optical thickness in both channels must be the same (spectrally uniform in the visible) if their calibrations are correct [Iwabuchi, 2003].
_	Tse makes a will to name Chan the inheritor of all her properties, including the flat she inherited from her former boss, on the condition that he will take care of her in the capacity of her son.
_	On August 11, 1999 United States President Bill Clinton offered clemency to sixteen of the convicted militants under the condition that they renounce any kind of violent manifestation.
_	The permission was given on the condition that the abortion pill would only be used to terminate pregnancies of up to nine weeks and would be provided in the presence of a gynaecologist.
_	The Conformal Cyclic Cosmology advocated by Penrose critically depends on the condition that information is in fact lost in black holes.
_	Peel accepted the invitation on the condition that Victoria dismiss some of her Ladies of the Bedchamber,
_	He received lands from Reginald of Châtillon that King Baldwin IV only confirmed on the condition that Rodrigo and his knights fight the Muslims continuously in the Holy Land.
_	Although this did not materialize, the condition that she adopt a new first name ("Jane" was considered too dull) lasted with Lombard throughout her career.
_	According to family lore, she accepted the job, but only on the condition that she would be deputized.
_	He then told the CIA that he would identify upcoming KGB plants, but only on the condition that the CIA treat them as genuine, lest the KGB discover the leak and arrest him.
_	In 1979, Rudi contributed "Overcome by Fumes" to the "Battle of the Bands" EP, and were offered a record deal by Polydor, on the condition that they replaced Marshall, but the offer was declined.
_	Under the condition that Papadopoulos would curtail any military interference that could hinder the process, Spyros Markezinis was the only old guard politician prepared to assist in the controversial mission of helping the transition to some form of parliamentary rule.
_	Finally, he agrees to return on the condition that his mother, out loud, thank Tessog for providing her with a means of escape.
_	Initially, Dubrovnik was interested in accepting her wish on the condition that she help them take control of Novi, its rival in salt-trading.
_	Station Manager and part owner Sam Anderson offered to sell a block of time to a group of blues musicians on the condition that they obtain a sponsor.
_	Landowner accommodate them under the condition that they must give him, in a name of church holiday which is 26th July, a sterile sheep every year.
_	Constantine agreed but only on the condition that Greece was actually attacked.
_	When Akrura complied, Krishna let him keep it, on the condition that it was to remain in the city of Dwaraka.
_	However, on 3 February 2015, Hutchinson lost an appeal in the European Court of Human Rights against his sentence, with the court's judges ruling that whole life tariffs were appropriate in certain cases, just as the High Court of England and Wales had 12 months earlier, on the condition that such sentences were reviewed within 25 years of the offender being sentenced.
_	Carnegie offered to donate 15,000 for a building on the condition that the Nyack community raise not less than 1,500 annually.
_	When asked to lead an excavation on a shell midden on Vashon Island in 1996, " Stein agreed on the condition that the public be allowed to help.
_	From 4 February 1826 up to 16 January 1830 he was Governor-General of the Dutch East Indies (Dutch: "Commissaris-Generaal") of the Dutch East Indies, for which he received an annual wages of 200,000 Guilders, with the condition that he also retained his function of governor of "Zuid-Brabant".
_	According to Wilder, when the producers approached Dietrich about the part she accepted on the condition that Wilder direct.
_	Accepting the job on the condition that it not interfere with his high school work, Whitten led all three amateur sports organizations simultaneously.
_	The song was originally written for a male singer, but after Jordin Sparks heard the song and expressed interest in the song, Mason agreed to give it to Sparks on the condition that they make it an event duet record, and suggested Chris Brown as a singing partner.
_	However, following the strong support and sentiments of the people of Seattle and press the commissioner formally approved the deal, under the condition that Yamauchi had less than 50% of the vote.
_	"Miami Vice" producers, on the other hand, wanted no legal troubles, and accepted Ferrari's offer of two free 1986 Testarossas on the condition that the replicas be demolished.
_	In 1859, she was finally approached by Bartlett and Pennefather and was informed that she would be able to buy her land after all, if she followed the conditions of sale, including the condition that she re-pay the first installments for each lot, which she refused to do.
_	Dr. Anand is about to inherit a large fortune from a distant relative under the condition that he is perfectly mentally stable—otherwise, he would not inherit the property as there had already been cases of mental instability in his family in the past.
_	Mazumdar agreed to undertake the job on the condition that if she did not wish to continue after six months she would be guaranteed a brewmaster's position comparable to the one she was giving up.
_	Without the funds for a proper remodeling, Puloski decides to allow a group of prisoners, Mile-Away (Phil LaMarr), Next-Week (Paul Rodriguez), Jerk-Off (Marty Belafsky), and Ears (Joe Nipote), to leave the prison to burgle a sporting goods store owned by Rockwood (on the condition that they are "back by midnight" before the guard Smitty (Tony Cox) makes his rounds).
_	This is equivalent to the condition that
_	The road was constructed in 1913 as an access road to Sulucan, under the condition that it be named "España".
_	The allowed values of are further restricted by the condition that the center of force of the oscillator, , must physically lie within the system, .
_	Warren finally asked Kitty out, and she accepted on the condition that he set things straight with Amber.
_	Cabañas accepted, on the condition that they left Paraguay within a day.
_	On 1 March 2010 the European Commission approved the merger, on the condition that the combined company sell 25% of the spectrum it owns on the 1800 MHz radio band and amend a network sharing agreement with smaller rival 3.
_	Ultimately, the ICC granted the Western Pacific's request to discontinue its daily "Royal Gorge" service with the condition that it be replaced by a route between Oakland and Salt Lake City that operated three times a week.
_	In 1776, with the outbreak of the American Revolution, many African American slaves were offered freedom on the condition that they fought on the side of the British.
_	By contrast, somebody who is patrilineally Jewish (one whose father is Jewish) is regarded as a Jew by the "Mo′eṣet HaḤakhamim" (the Karaite Council of Sages) on the condition that they were raised Jewish during childhood.
_	To obtain the linear rank, drop the condition that "B" and "C" must be nonnegative.
_	In 1905, Lewis H. Phillips, an attorney, backed by the Commercial Club and other organizations, succeeded in obtaining $8,000 from Andrew Carnegie on the condition that the city council would pledge maintenance.
_	In 1990 and 1991, the FCC's Administrative Law Judge (ALJ) and Review Board had both ruled in favor of Orion Broadcasting based on their track record of public affairs with WSKY and awarded the station's construction permit on the condition that WSKY was sold.
_	On his views regarding the Kingdom of Yugoslavia, Trumbić recorded that Stepinac had "loyalty to the state as it is, but with the condition that the state acts towards the Catholic Church as it does to all just denominations and that it guarantees them freedom".
_	Once a gentile came before Shammai and said, "I will convert to Judaism, on the condition that you teach me the whole Torah while I stand on one foot."
_	Murthi agreed on the condition that the kingdom accepts Shaivism as its way of life.
_	Under the condition that the cross-sectional area, A, of the flux tube is small, F can be approximated as formula_3.
_	For instance, a hotel might give the wholesaler a room at cost price "X", but on the condition that the room is not sold for less than "Y" (hotels do this to prevent wholesalers from competing with themselves).
_	The group subpoenaed the records and "fought with District Attorney Lynne Abraham until November for access to evidence" who only agreed to do under the condition that the members of the group sign non-disclosure agreements regarding the contents of the file.
_	Rabbi Ruderman accepted the position on the condition that he be permitted to open a yeshiva using the synagogue's facilities.
_	He agrees on the condition that she marry him and she agrees.
_	The participating institutions have the liberty to choose the hardware and software platforms to share data with the Network, under the condition that they use regionally recognized standards.
_	The AFL players agreed to Mackey's election on the condition that former AFL player Alan Miller would become general counsel.
_	The film was offered distribution in the United States on the condition that Dassin renounce his past, declaring that he was duped into subversive associations.
_	In that same month South Africa agreed to loan Swaziland $355 million on the condition that it institute political and economic reforms.
_	He, in "Keeper", paternally allowed both Billy and Mandy have Grim on the condition that Billy doesn't leave his house for one week.
_	After this show, Cabaret Metro owner Joe Shanahan agreed to book the band on the condition that they replace the drum machine with a live drummer.
_	In March 2001, NFF gave Lyn a loan for NOK 12.5 million, on the condition that if it was not paid back within two years, NFF would take over Lyn's ownership in the stadium.
_	He furthermore transformed the nature of the relationship between sampy and ruler: whereas previously the sampy had been seen as tools at the disposal of community leaders, under Ralambo they became divine protectors of the leader's sovereignty and the integrity of the state which would be preserved through their power on the condition that the line of sovereigns ensured the sampy were shown the respect due to them.
_	The remaining art that was considered too "Roman Catholic" was sold to Cornelis Claesz van Wieringen, a fellow guild member, on the condition that he remove it from the city.
_	Atlantic budgeted to provide funds to make a video for "Hard for Love", on the condition that it be retitled "Hot for Love" for broadcast purposes.
_	Naidu, out of love for his daughter, agrees for the marriage on the condition that he earn 1 lakh by the night of the wedding.
_	It follows the story of Madoka Kaname who is offered the chance to have any wish granted on the condition that she become a magical girl and fight against evil witches.
_	At this time the old military barracks on Royal Avenue, near the Sydney City Hospital, were being sold for one dollar each with the condition that they be removed from the site.
_	Lakers owner Jack Kent Cooke had also offered Chamberlain a record-setting contract on the condition that Chamberlain agree to give up what Cooke termed "this boxing foolishness."
_	In 1845, Don Juan Bandini donated parts of his land grant Rancho Jurupa to a group of Mexican colonists from Abiquiú in Santa Fe de Nuevo México — on the condition that they would assist in protecting his stock from local Indian raids.
_	Rachel agrees, on the condition that Jimmy goes to a movie with her on Saturday.
_	The Winsbergs sold the property for 1/3 of its appraised value with the condition that it would be made into a wetland.
_	The electron source for carbon assimilation from diffusible Fe(2+) ions to an electrode under the condition that electrical current is the only source of energy and electrons.
_	After several years, the Amarasi were released from their bondage and allowed to return to their native homes, with the condition that they relinquish any affiliation with the Portuguese, and remain loyal to Dutch interests, which they did until West Timor joined the Republic of Indonesia in the 1940s.
_	Mr. Sodha agreed to work with the NGO only on the condition that he would that he being permitted to work exclusively for refugees from Pakistan living in Bikaner area of Rajasthan.
_	Carrie once agreed to model for a charity fashion show (featuring both "real people" and models), on the condition that she could keep the outfit, a Dolce and Gabbana original.
_	Uribe Angel donated his collection with the condition that he be the first director of the Museum.
_	Forrester gives Jamal some of his own private essays to rewrite, with the condition that Jamal is not to take them from the apartment.
_	Folklore has it that the Bonython donation was made on the condition that a hall be built opposite Pulteney Street, thus blocking any future path through the parklands and preventing the division of the campus by a major thoroughfare.
_	He agrees, but on the condition that he is told the exact contents of the cargo aboard the Russian vessel.
_	Buckingham County Council gave permission for cottages to be built in an urban green belt, on the condition that ‘occupation of the houses shall be limited to persons whose employment... is... in agriculture... or in forestry or in an industry mainly dependent upon agriculture’, as defined by the Town and Country Planning Act 1947 section 119.
_	Lawful enslavement in Islamic Law was restricted to two instances: capture in war (on the condition that the prisoner is not a Muslim), or birth in slavery.
_	The government supported the construction of Hålogaland Bridge on the condition that Narvik Airport, Framnes be closed.
_	Gjesdal Municipality offered NOK 60,000 of the capital, on the condition that NSB would build and operate it.
_	His conclusion was that if these patterns were implemented intentionally by man, the collaboration of all writers of the Bible—stretched over many disparate years—would be required, in addition to the condition that each of them be a mathematician of the highest order.
_	He is a close friend of Isaiah, and Reed's godfather, and he offers to cover up the killings, on the condition that Reed gets his life together.
_	This church was originally part of the possessions of the abbey at Canterbury, and remained so until 1243, when the abbot Robert, at the insistence of archdeacon Simon de Langton, granted it to the hospital of poor priests in Canterbury, together with four acres of Stodmarsh, on the condition that they should not demand in future any tithes from the abbey.
_	The flag was loaned to the war memorial in 1925 on the condition that it be returned to Watson each Anzac Day until he died in 1934.
_	Under its constitutive document, the IWC is given the task of adopting regulations "to provide for the conservation, development, and optimum utilization of the whale resources" with the condition that such regulations "shall be based on scientific findings."
_	Pleased with this news, Brother Hai lets him off, on the condition that this movie is successfully made.
_	He was released with a habeas corpus, with the condition that he should not go to the university's campus.
_	Three members purchased this engine for $250 from Peter and Harmon Howard, on the condition that 'the engine never be scrapped'.
_	Joo-hwan's fiance agrees under the condition that K lets her take photographs of him.
_	Deeply moved by the couple's depth faith, the god of Mount Bromo assured them of offspring but with the condition that the youngest child be sacrificed in the crater of the volcano.
_	Radina was released on 31 January 2011 on the condition that she relocate from the capital of Minsk to her hometown of Kobrin.
_	She received treatment for it after filming ended, and recorded a public service announcement on the condition that aired at the end of that episode.
_	The conclave of witches is incapable of choosing a new leader, Grandmother of grandmothers, because their current leader (Arina) is still alive but inaccessible to everyone so after 10 years trapped in the Sarcophagus of Time she is visited by Anton who offers her a way out on the condition that she accepts to be part of the Sixth Watch in order to save the world from peril, Arina who confesses to have already lived through the same situation in the year 1914 accepts and eventually tells
_	In 1913 Sutro's heirs donated his surviving library, including the Mexican collection, to the California State Library under the condition that it remain in San Francisco.
_	This flexibility is genuine; for example, in some concurrent systems it is natural to impose the condition that every message sent must eventually be delivered.
_	Steinitz nominated the Russian Mikhail Chigorin, on the condition that the invitation should not be presented as a challenge from him.
_	"Dust of the Damned" is about fugitive werewolves who were released from prison by Abraham Lincoln to help him fight the American Civil War on the condition that after the war they would return to Eastern Europe but they did not keep their promise and headed to the American West.
_	In his letters, Laluksola Borphukan expressed his willingness to evacuate the garrison of Guwahati on the condition that the Mughals must install him as the king of Assam.
_	Santos and the Japanese Commander agreed to " not molest or abuse civilians in all districts of Koronadal valley but with the condition that the people will cooperate and never commit any wrong move otherwise they will feel the
_	If, however, there is a provision that, on a breach of the condition, the property is to go to a certain heir, there is clearly a fideicommissum in favour of the mentioned heir, as where the testator leaves “my farm to A, subject to the condition that he shall not alienate it, and if he does the farm shall go to B.”
_	The natives' captain at last agreed that they could be taken, under the condition that they return with European goods to trade.
_	Garrett enriched Bryn Mawr College, donating $10,000 per year to help the college and pay all the bills of the school on the condition that M. Carey Thomas be the president.
_	Chyavan agreed under the condition that the devs allowed the Aswins to participate in his feast at Vaikunth, and so gain their rightful place among the devs.
_	On 13 December 1967, the Metropolitan Region Planning Authority decided to rezone as urban all land bounded by Hepburn Avenue, Marmion Avenue, North Perimeter Highway and Wanneroo Road, on the condition that subdivision would be approved when "Town Planning (Development) Scheme(s) have been approved with the general object of serving the best possible development at the least cost to the community".
_	Drenters bequeathed the property to the Ontario Heritage Foundation under the condition that his family would still be able to live in it.
_	Answering her cry for revenge, the red goddess Scáthach appears to her, and gives her incredible fighting skills, on the condition that she never lie with a man unless he defeats her in fair combat.
_	Negotiations occurred in September 1914 with Mr and Mrs Pemberthy, who agreed to closure of Russell Street (now Alford) between Sydney Street and Dixon Street, and inclusion of this land in the park, on the condition that an entrance was formed at the end of Dixon Street.
_	Reportedly, the queen tolerated the king to have an affair on the condition that he was discrete and never embarrassed her by having any form of official mistress, a condition he accepted and followed.
_	It is rumored that James B. Duke offered Princeton University a large gift under the condition that the university's name be changed from Princeton to Duke.
_	She keeps the condition that if the British are able to defeat the Indian rebels, then Javed Khan will not marry her daughter.
_	On December 8, 2014, Vancouver traded Salgado to New York City FC on the condition that Vancouver and New York both share the fee of a future transfer of Salgado to an international club, avoiding the 2014 MLS Expansion Draft in the process.
_	Jatta signed a treaty with British Governor Luke Smythe O'Connor in 1853, in which agreed to cede a further northern part of his territory, including the town of Sabbajee, on the condition that the British quell the Marabouts in the area.
_	The aircraft's purchase had the condition that it remain at Scampton until 1983.
_	He eventually followed suit under the condition that he became the leader, which the group apparently agreed to before Angle and Roode turned on and attacked him the same night, with Styles trying to hold them back and Tomko walking out on the scene.
_	In August 2005, facing financial struggles, Atari, Inc. sold Humongous Entertainment to majority stock holder Infogrames for , under the condition that all titles developed by Humongous Entertainment through March 31, 2006.
_	In 2011, the condition that afflicted Peter the Wild Boy was suspected to be the chromosomal disorder Pitt–Hopkins syndrome, a condition identified only in 1978, nearly 200 years after Peter's death.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of 13 seats, with the remaining 28 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in the most populated province did not exceed 2.75 times that of the least populated one.
_	However, a takeover by Morrisons was held to be acceptable on the condition that fifty three shops of the combined operation be sold, due to local competition issues.
_	He was released under the condition that he wear an electronic bracelet until he was sentenced.
_	Helicopter Girl signed with Instant Karma on the condition that she be permitted not to tour.
_	Managing director Gary Sweet confirmed the same day that John Still had signed a contract extension to 2015 with the condition that, for each promotion the club won, an additional year would be added to the contract.
_	that he released him and his disciples, on the condition that they leave the Yellow Lake site.
_	Her mother reluctantly yields to her decision on the condition that it should never injure her.
_	Charges against the five were dismissed on the condition that no further accusations appear in the "tamburo".
_	He was appointed as Director of the Studio, under the condition that he should be the only one to use the facility.
_	Hugh agrees on the condition that Iridal helps him find Alfred once they're finished.
_	His release in 1963 came with the condition that he could not perform his episcopal duties and he was later exiled to Rome in 1965 as part of a coordinated deal between the Church and the national government.
_	Specifically, at some during the king's reign, Cairistíona resigned her claims with the condition that, if Ruaidhrí died without a male heir, and her like-named son married one of Ruaidhrí's daughters, Cairistíona's son would secure the inheritance.
_	Her life interest was subject to the condition that she should provide for, maintain and educate the children during their respective minorities.
_	NBC eventually signed an agreement with Scripps to affiliate with KSHB on August 1, 1994, on the condition that it carry as much local news programming as WDAF had aired as an NBC affiliate.
_	The Reids, being childless, left their home to Scotland on the condition that it should be preserved unchanged.
_	Plans were approved on the condition that the school was small in size and had no mosque.
_	Jack H. Skirball's foundation provided the seed funding, the College-Institute approved the project in 1981, on the condition that Herscher secure the funds himself.
_	Patrick was given approval by the ACCC to acquire freight-forwarders FCL Interstate Transport on the condition that it broke up Pacific National, its joint-venture with Toll.
_	He appointed him heir to his dominions with the condition that he and all his descendants, with the complete omission of their former name and coat of arms, should be addressed only as Counts and Countesses von Kollonitsch.
_	R. Shimon b. Lakish adds the condition that the specified individual be deserving of death because of a crime he committed.
_	Edward responded by seizing Roger's lands and only releasing them on the condition that Roger granted them to the Crown after his death.
_	His imprisonment of Adolf continued until 1203, when due to an illness, he was freed by the new king on the condition that he waive all claims to Holstein.
_	Sam, aware of his hustler lifestyle - even though Zoey thinks that he has left home to become an astronaut - offers him money to keep their secret, with the condition that he not contact his family until after Christmas.
_	Ray tracing techniques can be applied to study light scattering by spherical and non-spherical particles under the condition that the size of a particle is much larger than the wavelength of light.
_	He was offered a position in the Cabinet only on the condition that he switch allegiance to the ruling Nationalista Party, but he declined the offer and instead played the role of critic to the administration's policies and performance.
_	On the same night, Henry Bendix - the man who created Midnighter - sells the Ace of Winchesters, a magical rifle, to the Lords of the Gun, on the condition that they make Midnighter and Apollo suffer.
_	Victoria reveals that she is pursuing Beauty of Nature in the lawsuit and she promises to sell it to him, on the condition that she is the CEO of the newly merged cosmetics company.
_	Under Alberta law, consent was granted for the transfer of such licences subject to the condition that the purchaser assume all obligations relating to the reforestation of the land covered by the licence.
_	Elkins decided to donated the property to the Village of Libertyville on the condition that it be used as a cultural and recreational center.
_	A common rule is alphanumeric sequences, with underscore also allowed, and with the condition that it not begin with a digit (to simplify lexing by avoiding confusing with integer literals) – so codice_1 are allowed, but codice_2 is not – this is the definition used in earlier versions of C and C++, Python 2, and many other languages.
_	When George offers to buy the house back, Habib agrees on the condition that George pay him $100,000 up front.
_	Fishing and boating is only permitted on the Norwegian side of the river; however in the narrow passages of Pasvikelva it is permitted to travel through on the Russian side on the condition that the boat does not stop, except in emergencies.
_	They married on the condition that she would be allowed to continue her acting career.
_	Ozai agreed, on the condition that Ursa would leave the city and never return, if she tried to use the poison on him.
_	Gale Anne Hurd, who had started her own production company, Pacific Western Productions, had previously worked with Cameron in Roger Corman's company and agreed to buy Cameron's screenplay for one dollar, on the condition that Cameron direct the film.
_	The only condition was that it be used "for the benefit of the members of the Boy Scout organization" and the second larger donation had only the condition that it pay its fair share of taxes on any portion devoted to competitive commercial operations.
_	The city was surrendered, and Abdul Fateh Daud was permitted to retain control over the city with the condition that he adhere to the Sunni interpretation of Islam.
_	They gained so much authority that they were granted the right to free debtors on the condition that the Buononimi became their guarantors and oversaw whether or not the debts were paid.
_	Seats are allocated to constituencies, each entitled to an initial minimum of 20 seats, with the remaining 39—29 until 2007—allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in any given province did not exceed three times that of any other.
_	Columbia's head Harry Cohn agreed to make the film adaptation on the condition that he could lend Lorre to Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer, possibly as a means of recouping the cost of Lorre not appearing in any of his films.
_	Rothstein requests some alcohol for a friend's wedding and Nucky agrees to sell him his latest shipment, on the condition that Rothstein's own men pick it up.
_	In a deal with David Nolte, Chair of the Arts and Culture Committee at the Melbourne City Council, Marriner proposed to purchase the adjacent City Square site for development of the multi-storey Westin Hotel and apartments on the condition that some of the money go towards restoring the theatre.
_	He asks for Jack's assistance to locate Isla de Muerta but on the condition that Jack remains quiet for the rest of the voyage.
_	MGM president John Symes greenlit the project on the condition that Wright and Glassner work together as executive producers of the new show.
_	On 4 December 2008, Governor General Michaëlle Jean granted Prime Minister Stephen Harper a prorogation on the condition that parliament reconvene early in the new year; the date was set as 26 January 2009.
_	A month later the British and Transvaalers agreed to joint control over Swaziland (without consulting the Swazis)—the South African Republic could build a railway through it to Kosi Bay on the condition that the Transvaal thereafter supported the interests of Rhodes's Chartered Company in Matabeleland and its environs.
_	It exists under the condition that the permittivity of one of the materials forming the interface is negative, while the other one is positive, as for example the interface between air and a lossy conducting medium such as the terrestrial transmission line, below the plasma frequency.
_	At the meeting, Pete agrees to accept Ken, on the condition that Ken accepts and pays due respect to Campbell's rank in SCDP.
_	Though she succeeds, she regrets the decision, as it is revealed that she bargained with Papa Lazarou to release her on the condition that fracking would go ahead underneath Royston Vasey to create a "wife mine" for him.
_	The property passed hands again in the early 20th century, to chain hotelier Joseph Allen Skinner, who eventually donated the hotel and property to the Commonwealth of Massachusetts for a state park in 1939 on the condition that the park be named after him (now the J.A. Skinner State Park).
_	Black continued raising money, securing at one point a $5,000 contribution from another wealthy area resident, John D. Rockefeller, on the condition that a matching $25,000 be raised.
_	In June 1813, Porter released his prisoners, on the condition that they not fight against the United States until they were formally exchanged for American prisoners of war.
_	He wrote of his sadness to see the deteriorated state of the buildings and grounds, and urged the restoration of the mansion and furniture to the condition that Washington left them.
_	A portion of the total cost of construction was donated by Premchand Roychand, a prosperous broker who founded the Bombay Stock Exchange on the condition that the tower be named after his mother Rajabai.
_	this is the condition that yields longtime autocorrelations.
_	The guitar was passed down to Arena’s father, who gave it to Chris in high school under the condition that he pursues music as a career.
_	Under the condition that the government would own and manage the land, the proposal was accepted.
_	In 1464, Jacobus Wiltingh, pastor of Garrelsweer and vicar in Loppersum, bequeathed Apell, a settlement among his possessions in the area called Westerwolde, to the Order of the Holy Cross on the condition that a monastery be built there, on the remains of a thirteenth-century Premonstratensian monastery.
_	In the more general case any reaction can be defined and added to the biomass function with either the condition that it be maximised or minimised if a single “optimal” solution is desired.
_	The FCC approved the merger on the condition that Sprint Nextel was to provide wireless service via the 2.5 GHz band within four years.
_	Seats are allocated to constituencies, each entitled to an initial minimum of eight seats, with the remaining 45 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the number of seats in each province does not exceed two times that of any other.
_	After defeating Yama in battle to the point of death, Shiva then revived him, under the condition that the devout youth would live forever.
_	Gould seized the opportunity and proposed the vacated site for the memorial, and the Anglican Church as the owner of the land agreed under the condition that a cross be incorporated into the design.
_	Peel supported the Bill on the government's behalf on the condition that the following declaration would be included:
_	Disney agreed to donate the building to the island after Tybee officials lobbied to keep it, with the condition that its connection to "The Last Song" not be advertised.
_	A wealthy Texan, whose daughter is in the show, offers to help out on the condition that he finds the show to be of high-enough quality and commercial potential to warrant the investment.
_	Thereafter they were reconciled on the condition that he should never again introduce English or French into the land"”
_	As they went to Wilhelmina's place, the two agree to get the money back, on the condition that Wilhelmina gets a 50% stake in Meade Publications and non-veto power and that Daniel does not consult Claire.
_	Now, consider the relation "is an enemy of" and suppose that the relation is symmetric and satisfies the condition that for any country, any enemy of an enemy of the country is not itself an enemy of the country.
_	The Treaty, ratified by Morocco, President Andrew Johnson, and nine European heads of state, granted neutrality to the lighthouse, with the condition that the ten naval powers signing the agreement assumed responsibility for its maintenance.
_	Columbia Pictures (1930–1932) agreed to pick up the direct distribution of the Mickey Mouse series on the condition that they would have exclusive rights to distribute the "Silly Symphonies" series; at first, "Silly Symphonies" could not even come close to the popularity Mickey Mouse had.
_	The purchase was tied to Bell Media's pending takeover of Astral Media; an earlier proposal had been rejected by the CRTC in October 2012 due to concerns surrounding its total market share following the merger, but was restructured under the condition that the companies divest certain media properties.
_	It was financed by Japan-based Team Okuyama in October 1998, with the condition that filming would be complete by December of the same year.
_	The main antagonist in the manga and anime was the Tiger's Den, a mysterious organization that trained young people to be villainous wrestlers on the condition that they gave half of their earnings to the organization.
_	By that time the school had outgrown its facility despite numerous additions, in 1918 the city of Charleston offered the state of South Carolina on the banks of the Ashley River for a new campus on the condition that the state fund the construction.
_	In 1919, the federal government passed the Canada Highways Act, which provided $20,000,000 to provinces under the condition that they establish an official highway network; up to 40% of construction costs would be subsidized.
_	The label was doubtful if the band would record anything else, but decided to release “Jesus Built My Hotrod”; following its success, they gave the band necessary budget, with the condition that the band would eventually finish the record.
_	In January 1997, Combs was arrested for writing a $500 cold check to a coal company, allegedly as reimbursement for damage caused by his son Dan Jack, Jr. The charge was dropped in February 1997 on the condition that Combs forfeit the $500 he posted as bond.
_	In the final volume of the book "A Positively Final Appearance" (1997), Guinness recounts grudgingly giving an autograph to a young fan who claimed to have watched "Star Wars" over a hundred times, on the condition that the boy promise to stop watching the film because "this is going to be an ill effect on your life".
_	Several months later, he met producer Michael Lang, who agreed to manage him on the condition that he stay sober.
_	Realizing that they could not prevent this, and that a peace concluded without their involvement would surely be fatal to them, the members of the government contacted the Athenian commander and surrendered, on the condition that none of the Mytileneans should be imprisoned, enslaved, or executed until representatives from the city had presented their case at Athens.
_	He was employed at an axe handle factory and, when the Bowling Green town band was organized in 1907, he was accepted on the condition that he play valve trombone, a trombone with a fixed slide and valves such as a euphonium.
_	Since Ungar was a known card counter, the casino managers agreed on the condition that his betting would have a high and a low limit (a limited spread), which, they presumed would render useless Ungar's card counting ability.
_	After Archbishop Rojo died in January 1764, the British military finally recognised Simón de Anda y Salazar as the legitimate Governor of the Philippines, sending him a letter addressed to the “Real Audiencia Gobernadora y Capitanía General”, after which Anda agreed to an armistice on the condition that the British forces withdraw from Manila by March.
_	Group buying, also known as collective buying, offers products and services at significantly reduced prices on the condition that a minimum number of buyers would make the purchase.
_	In 1963 Marie Cuttoli engaged Cauquil-Prince to weave Picasso tapestries, under the condition that she would remain in the background and never meet the artist personally.
_	The tough-talking GoGo Tomago, able to transubstantiate her body into a fiery force blast by uttering her code name, was released from prison on the condition that she serve on the team.
_	However, on January 18, 2010, the government legalized the service under the condition that adequate privacy protection would be realized.
_	The writers express their reluctance in doing product placements for GE (even though during the scene the cast talk about how great Snapple's White Green Tea tastes), but Liz agrees on the condition that Jack appears in the sketch.
_	It was reported that Marseille agreed to terminate Sparagna's contract prematurely in order for him to join Boavista, with the condition that they receive a percentage of any fee received by the Portuguese club for his future sale.
_	Civil society developed around economic interest aggregation that was organized by the clientelistic government; the PRI allowed citizens to collectively bargain under the condition that they would continue to provide political loyalty to the party.
_	Miyazaki initially refused, but agreed on the condition that he could direct.
_	In 867, Charles the Bald signed the Treaty of Compiègne, by which he agreed to yield the Cotentin Peninsula to the Breton king Salomon, on the condition that Salomon would take an oath of fidelity and fight as an ally against the Vikings.
_	When Redding takes the Homeboys to work as telemarketers, Glynn gives back control of the kitchen to Pancamo under the condition that he stays away from the Aryans.
_	The Ramos fight proved controversial, because the WBC's president proclaimed at first that the punch with which Ortiz had beaten Ramos with had been illegal, but he later reconsidered and gave Ortiz the title, and the knockout victory, back, with the condition that a rematch be fought in the future.
_	They donated the house to the city in 1950 on the condition that it be operated as a public museum.
_	Periodontitis is the condition that arises after leaving gingivitis untreated.
_	In December 1969, the local authority gave notification that it would grant the Erith Theatre Guild a 21-year lease on the theatre building, on the condition that improvements were made to the premises.
_	After an abortive project in the 1980s to renovate the building as an information station, the building was given to the DUP on the condition that it be moved off the LDS church property.
_	$3.4 million was appropriated to the project under the condition that Hines provided an additional $1.6 million.
_	The parent church's bishop said the local church had promised to build a new sanctuary on that spot, so he agreed to drop the lawsuit on the condition that the home be demolished.
_	Before permitting him to leave, however, Dionysius had extracted a promise that he would return when hostilities ceased and Plato had agreed on the condition that Dion be recalled from exile.
_	There they were informed that the attempted coup had already failed, and were sent to convince their comrades to lay down the arms on the condition that their lives would be respected.
_	The amusements were saved from the 1981 demolition by the 'Friends of Luna Park' action group, who purchased them for $9,200, on the condition that they remain in the heritage-listed building.
_	Richey accepted, and thus became the seventh rector of Mount Calvary, on the condition that he should be accompanied by his friend from seminary days, the "zealous ritualist" Rev. Calbraith Bourn Perry.
_	In response, Coventry 's new Technical Institute was opened in 1888 in an old textile warehouse in Earl Street which David Spencer had dedicated to the City Council on the condition that it should be used for technical schools and a school of science.
_	Upon learning of his brother's assassination, Frank James surrenders his gun and turns himself in to Rixley, but only on the condition that he can first attend his brother's funeral.
_	On 14 March, Salvini nonetheless offered to govern with the M5S, imposing the condition that League ally Forza Italia, led by former Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi, must also take part in any coalition.
_	Each constituency was entitled to an initial minimum of 20 seats, with the remaining 39 allocated among the constituencies in proportion to their populations on the condition that the seat to population ratio in any given province did not exceed three times that of any other.
_	Most of these people were Catholics, but were given their freedom on the condition that they joined the Dutch Reformed Church, and the converts were known as Mardijker or the liberated ones.
_	On another occasion he signed a band on the condition that they get rid of their lead singer: a 16-year-old Rod Stewart.
_	Attunga however, almost forty years after he gained it, was offered to the Burnside Council free of charge in 1944 for use as a hospital, on the condition that the house and grounds be maintained.
_	Facing odds of more than 10 to one, the Union commander of the fort agreed to surrender on the condition that the white officers be treated as prisoners of war.
_	They were granted a six-month extension for the implementation deadline by the CRTC in order to address these issues, under the condition that they inform customers that they cannot receive public alerts unless they update their hardware, and must present bi-weekly progress reports to the CRTC.
_	Lord Bullingdon will grant Barry an annuity of five hundred guineas a year on the condition that he leave England, with payments ending the moment should Barry ever return.
_	Beckett gave permission to Mabou Mines to stage "The Lost Ones" through the playwright Jean Reavey, who was a close friend of the author, on the condition that it was only a "straight reading".
_	Israel agreed, but on the condition that U.S., rather than International Atomic Energy Agency, inspectors be used, and that Israel would receive advance notice of all inspections.
_	However, the Church does allow the ordination of men who may have, in the past, experienced same-sex attraction, but only on the condition that they have lived without engaging in "homosexual culture" or acts for several years, and that have no "deep-seated homosexual tendencies".
_	Turkey ceded the region to Bolsheviks on the condition that it would be granted autonomy, for the sake of the Muslims among Adjara's mixed population.
_	Aftran is safe, but in order to keep her alive without access to the Kandrona, the Animorphs allow her to morph a humpback whale—on the condition that she stays in that form as a "nothlit".
_	Guthrie grudgingly agreed, on the condition that if Goodman bought him a beer, Guthrie would listen to him play for as long as it took to drink the beer.
_	McCartney agreed, but only on the condition that Lisa stay a vegetarian and not revert.
_	Three weeks later, when no evidence of collaboration with the enemy surfaced, Seward had Berret released and returned to Washington—on the condition that he immediately resign as mayor.
_	Even so, the employment was approved on the condition that there was no publicity attached to the recruitment.
_	After the Thaksin family sold its shares in Shin Corp to Singapore's Temasek Holdings, the company offered to drop the lawsuit on the condition that Supinya apologize for her comments.
_	Morales agrees to this with the condition that they murder Burr.
_	Verwey had given this gift in 1984 with the condition that a proper home for it needed to be created.
_	In June 1739 war seemed imminent with France, and a "Petition for great guns" was sent to the Government by the Corporation of Penzance, which was answered on the condition that a battery was built to house them.
_	On his death, Rusiñol left the building of the Cau Ferrat and all the collections it contained to the town of Sitges, with the condition that it be made a public museum, which was inaugurated on 16 April 1933.
_	Le Fay agreed on the condition that Doom become the general of her army, undead warriors of those slain by the sword Excalibur against her half-brother King Arthur.
_	His 1597 will bequeathed his territory between his nephew, Maurice of Hesse-Kassel and Louis V of Hesse-Darmstadt, on the condition that it would remain Lutheran.
_	The withdrawal of the Greek veto, resulted in the European Union approving on June 27 the start of accession talks with the Republic of Macedonia, which are expected in 2019, under the condition that the Prespa deal is implemented and Macedonia's constitutional name is changed to Republic of North Macedonia.
_	AT&T had been granted a tax break of $42 million, under the condition that the company would keep its headquarters at 550 Madison Avenue and not rent out the space to other tenants.
_	It is sometimes useful to drop the condition that a blocking set does not contain a line.
_	Apologists say that if Jehoiakim had not been killed by his own people, on the condition that this supposition is true (see preceding paragraph), in all likelihood, Jehoiakim would have been put to death by the Babylonians.
